Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5630.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) âAverage daily attendanceâ, for the purposes of complying with federal law, means 92% of the pupils counted in membership on the pupil membership count day, as defined in section 6(7). (2) âBoardâ means the governing body of a district or public school academy. (3) âCenterâ means the center for educational performance and information created in section 94a. (4) âCommunity districtâ means a school district organized under part 5b of the revised school code, MCL 380.381 to 380.396. (5) âCooperative education programâ means a written voluntary agreement between and among districts to provide certain educational programs for pupils in certain groups of districts. The written agreement must be approved by all affected districts at least annually and must specify the educational programs to be provided and the estimated number of pupils from each district who will participate in the educational programs. (6) âDepartmentâ, except as otherwise provided in this article, means the department of education. (7) âDistrictâ means, except as otherwise specifically provided in this act, a local school district established under the revised school code or, except in sections 6(4), 6(6), 11x, 12c, 13, 20, 22a, 22p, 31a, 51a(14), 105, 105c, and 166b, a public school academy. Except in section 20, district also includes a community district. (8) âDistrict of residenceâ, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, means the district in which a pupilâs custodial parent or parents or legal guardian resides. For a pupil described in section 24b, the pupilâs district of residence is the district in which the pupil enrolls under that section. For a pupil described in section 6(4)(d), the pupilâs district of residence is considered to be the district or intermediate district in which the pupil is counted in membership under that section. For a pupil under court jurisdiction who is placed outside the district in which the pupilâs custodial parent or parents or legal guardian resides, the pupilâs district of residence is considered to be the educating district or educating intermediate district. (9) âDistrict superintendentâ means the superintendent of a district or the chief administrator of a public school academy. Sec. 6. (1) âCenter programâ means a program operated by a district or by an intermediate district for special education pupils from several districts in programs for pupils with autism spectrum disorder, pupils with severe cognitive impairment, pupils with moderate cognitive impairment, pupils with severe multiple impairments, pupils with hearing impairment, pupils with visual impairment, and pupils with physical impairment or other health impairment. Programs for pupils with emotional impairment housed in buildings that do not serve regular education pupils also qualify. Unless otherwise approved by the department, a center program either serves all constituent districts within an intermediate district or serves several districts with less than 50% of the pupils residing in the operating district. In addition, special education center program pupils placed part-time in noncenter programs to comply with the least restrictive environment provisions of section 1412 of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1412, may be considered center program pupils for pupil accounting purposes for the time scheduled in either a center program or a noncenter program. (2) âDistrict and high school graduation rateâ means the annual completion and pupil dropout rate that is calculated by the center pursuant to nationally recognized standards. (3) âDistrict and high school graduation reportâ means a report of the number of pupils, excluding adult education participants, in the district for the immediately preceding school year, adjusted for those pupils who have transferred into or out of the district or high school, who leave high school with a diploma or other credential of equal status. (4) âMembershipâ, except as otherwise provided in this article, means for a district, a public school academy, or an intermediate district the sum of the product of .90 times the number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district, public school academy, or intermediate district on the pupil membership count day for the current school year, plus the product of .10 times the final audited count from the supplemental count day of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district, public school academy, or intermediate district for the immediately preceding school year. A districtâs, public school academyâs, or intermediate districtâs membership is adjusted as provided under section 25e for pupils who enroll after the pupil membership count day in a strict discipline academy operating under sections 1311b to 1311m of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311b to 380.1311m. All pupil counts used in this subsection are as determined by the department and calculated by adding the number of pupils registered for attendance plus pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as corrected by a subsequent department audit. The amount of the foundation allowance for a pupil in membership is determined under section 20. In making the calculation of membership, all of the following, as applicable, apply to determining the membership of a district, a public school academy, or an intermediate district: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, and pursuant to subsection (6), a pupil is counted in membership in the pupilâs educating district or districts. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual pupil must not be counted for more than a total of 1.0 full-time equated membership. (b) If a pupil is educated in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence, if the pupil is not being educated as part of a cooperative education program, if the pupilâs district of residence does not give the educating district its approval to count the pupil in membership in the educating district, and if the pupil is not covered by an exception specified in subsection (6) to the requirement that the educating district must have the approval of the pupilâs district of residence to count the pupil in membership, the pupil is not counted in membership in any district. (c) A special education pupil educated by the intermediate district is counted in membership in the intermediate district. (d) A pupil placed by a court or state agency in an on-grounds program of a juvenile detention facility, a child caring institution, or a mental health institution, or a pupil funded under section 53a, is counted in membership in the district or intermediate district approved by the department to operate the program. (e) A pupil enrolled in the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind is counted in membership in the pupilâs intermediate district of residence. (f) A pupil enrolled in a career and technical education program supported by a millage levied over an area larger than a single district or in an area vocational-technical education program established under section 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.690, is counted in membership only in the pupilâs district of residence. (g) A pupil enrolled in a public school academy is counted in membership in the public school academy. (h) For the purposes of this section and section 6a, for a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, that is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a, a pupilâs participation in the cyber schoolâs educational program is considered regular daily attendance, and for a district or public school academy, a pupilâs participation in a virtual course as that term is defined in section 21f is considered regular daily attendance. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subdivision is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. For the purposes of this subdivision, for a pupil enrolled in a cyber school, all of the following apply with regard to the participation requirement as described in this subdivision: (i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the pupil shall participate in each scheduled course on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable. If the pupil is absent on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, the pupil must attend and participate in class during the next 10 consecutive school days if the absence was unexcused, or during the next 30 calendar days if the absence was excused. (ii) For a pupil who is not learning sequentially, 1 or more of the following must be met on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, for each scheduled course to satisfy the participation requirement under this subdivision: (A) The pupil attended a live lesson from the teacher. (B) The pupil logged into a lesson or lesson activity and the login can be documented. (C) The pupil and teacher engaged in a subject-oriented telephone conversation. (D) There is documentation of an email dialogue between the pupil and teacher. (E) There is documentation of activity or work between the learning coach and pupil. (F) An alternate form of attendance as determined and agreed upon by the cyber school and the pupil membership auditor was met. (iii) For a pupil using sequential learning, the participation requirement under this subdivision is satisfied if either of the following occurs: (A) Except as otherwise provided in this sub-subparagraph, the pupil and the teacher of record or mentor complete a 2-way interaction for 1 course during the week on which pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, occurs, and the 3 consecutive weeks following that week. However, if a school break is scheduled during any of the weeks described in this sub-subparagraph that is 4 or more days in length or instruction has been canceled districtwide during any of the weeks described in this sub-subparagraph for 3 or more school days, the district is not required to ensure that the pupil and the teacher of record or mentor completed a 2-way interaction for that week. As used in this sub-subparagraph: (I) â2-way interactionâ means the communication that occurs between the teacher of record or mentor and pupil, where 1 party initiates communication and a response from the other party follows that communication. Responses as described in this sub-sub-subparagraph must be to the communication initiated by the teacher of record or mentor, and not some other action taken. This interaction may occur through, but is not limited to, means such as email, telephone, instant messaging, or face-to-face conversation. A parent- or legal-guardian-facilitated 2-way interaction is considered a 2-way interaction if the pupil is in any of grades K to 5 and does not yet possess the skills necessary to participate in 2-way interactions unassisted. The interactions described in this sub-sub-subparagraph must relate to a virtual course on the pupilâs schedule and pertain to course content or progress. (II) âMentorâ means a professional employee of the district who monitors the pupilâs progress, ensures the pupil has access to needed technology, is available for assistance, and ensures access to the teacher of record. A mentor may also be the teacher of record if the mentor meets the definition of a teacher of record under this sub-subparagraph and the district is the provider for the course. (III) âTeacher of recordâ means a teacher to whom all of the following apply: (1) The teacher is responsible for providing instruction, determining instructional methods for each pupil, diagnosing learning needs, assessing pupil learning, prescribing intervention strategies and modifying lessons, reporting outcomes, and evaluating the effects of instruction and support strategies. The teacher of record may coordinate the distribution and assignment of the responsibilities described in this sub-sub-sub-subparagraph with other teachers participating in the instructional process for a course. (2) The teacher is certified for the grade level or is working under a valid substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department. (3) The teacher has a personnel identification code provided by the center. (IV) âWeekâ means a period that starts on Wednesday and ends the following Tuesday. (B) The pupil completes a combination of 1 or more of the following activities for each scheduled course on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable: (I) Documented attendance in a virtual course where synchronous, live instruction occurred with the teacher. (II) Documented completion of a course assignment. (III) Documented completion of a course lesson or lesson activity. (IV) Documented pupil access to an ongoing lesson, which does not include a login. (V) Documented physical attendance on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, in each scheduled course, if the pupil will attend at least 50% of the instructional time for each scheduled course on-site, face-to-face with the teacher of record. As used in this sub-sub-subparagraph, âteacher of recordâ means that term as defined in subparagraph (iii)(A). (iv) For purposes of subparagraph (iii), each scheduled course currently being attempted by the pupil, rather than every course on the pupilâs schedule for the entire term, is considered a part of each scheduled course for the pupil. (i) For a new district or public school academy beginning its operation after December 31, 1994, membership for the first 2 full or partial fiscal years of operation is determined as follows: (i) If operations begin before the pupil membership count day for the fiscal year, membership is the average number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the pupil membership count day for the current school year and on the supplemental count day for the current school year, as determined by the department and calculated by adding the number of pupils registered for attendance on the pupil membership count day plus pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as corrected by a subsequent department audit, plus the final audited count from the supplemental count day for the current school year, and dividing that sum by 2. (ii) If operations begin after the pupil membership count day for the fiscal year and not later than the supplemental count day for the fiscal year, membership is the final audited count of the number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the supplemental count day for the current school year. (j) If a district is the authorizing body for a public school academy, then, in the first school year in which pupils are counted in membership on the pupil membership count day in the public school academy, the determination of the districtâs membership excludes from the districtâs pupil count for the immediately preceding supplemental count day any pupils who are counted in the public school academy on that first pupil membership count day who were also counted in the district on the immediately preceding supplemental count day. (k) For an extended school year program approved by the superintendent, a pupil enrolled, but not scheduled to be in regular daily attendance, on a pupil membership count day, is counted in membership. (l) To be counted in membership, a pupil must meet the minimum age requirement to be eligible to attend school under section 1147 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1147, and must be less than 20 years of age on September 1 of the school year except as follows: (i) A special education pupil who is enrolled and receiving instruction in a special education program or service approved by the department, who does not have a high school diploma, and who is less than 26 years of age as of September 1 of the current school year is counted in membership. (ii) A pupil who is determined by the department to meet all of the following may be counted in membership: (A) Is enrolled in a public school academy or an alternative education high school diploma program, that is primarily focused on educating pupils with extreme barriers to education, such as being homeless as that term is defined under 42 USC 11302. (B) Had dropped out of school. (C) Is less than 22 years of age as of September 1 of the current school year. (iii) If a child does not meet the minimum age requirement to be eligible to attend school for that school year under section 1147 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1147, but will be 5 years of age not later than December 1 of that school year, the district may count the child in membership for that school year if the parent or legal guardian has notified the district in writing that the parent or legal guardian intends to enroll the child in kindergarten for that school year. (m) An individual who has achieved a high school diploma is not counted in membership unless the individual is enrolled in a state-approved early middle college and at least 1 college course is transcribed for high school credit each membership count during the individualâs fifth year. An individual who has achieved a high school equivalency certificate is not counted in membership unless the individual is a student with a disability as that term is defined in R 340.1702 of the Michigan Administrative Code. An individual participating in a job training program funded under former section 107a, as repealed by 2004 PA 351, or a jobs program funded under former section 107b, administered by the department of labor and economic opportunity, or participating in any successor of either of those 2 programs, is not counted in membership. (n) If a pupil counted in membership in a public school academy is also educated by a district or intermediate district as part of a cooperative education program, the pupil is counted in membership only in the public school academy unless a written agreement signed by all parties designates the party or parties in which the pupil is counted in membership, and the instructional time scheduled for the pupil in the district or intermediate district is included in the full-time equated membership determination under subdivision (q) and section 101. However, for pupils receiving instruction in both a public school academy and in a district or intermediate district but not as a part of a cooperative education program, the following apply: (i) If the public school academy provides instruction for at least 1/2 of the class hours required under section 101, the public school academy receives as its prorated share of the full-time equated membership for each of those pupils an amount equal to 1 times the product of the hours of instruction the public school academy provides divided by the number of hours required under section 101 for full-time equivalency, and the remainder of the full-time membership for each of those pupils is allocated to the district or intermediate district providing the remainder of the hours of instruction. (ii) If the public school academy provides instruction for less than 1/2 of the class hours required under section 101, the district or intermediate district providing the remainder of the hours of instruction receives as its prorated share of the full-time equated membership for each of those pupils an amount equal to 1 times the product of the hours of instruction the district or intermediate district provides divided by the number of hours required under section 101 for full-time equivalency, and the remainder of the full-time membership for each of those pupils is allocated to the public school academy. (o) An individual less than 16 years of age as of September 1 of the current school year who is being educated in an alternative education program is not counted in membership if there are also adult education participants being educated in the same program or classroom. (p) The department shall give a uniform interpretation of full-time and part-time memberships. (q) The number of class hours used to calculate full-time equated memberships must be consistent with section 101. In determining full-time equated memberships for pupils who are enrolled in a postsecondary institution or for pupils engaged in an internship or work experience under section 1279h of the revised school code, MCL 380.1279h, a pupil is not considered to be less than a full-time equated pupil solely because of the effect of the pupilâs postsecondary enrollment or engagement in the internship or work experience, including necessary travel time, on the number of class hours provided by the district to the pupil. (r) Full-time equated memberships for pupils in kindergarten are determined by dividing the number of instructional hours scheduled and provided per year per kindergarten pupil by the same number used for determining full-time equated memberships for pupils in grades 1 to 12. However, to the extent allowable under federal law, for a district or public school academy that provides evidence satisfactory to the department that it used federal title I money in the 2 immediately preceding school fiscal years to fund full-time kindergarten, full-time equated memberships for pupils in kindergarten are determined by dividing the number of class hours scheduled and provided per year per kindergarten pupil by a number equal to 1/2 the number used for determining full-time equated memberships for pupils in grades 1 to 12. The change in the counting of full-time equated memberships for pupils in kindergarten that took effect for 2012-2013 is not a mandate. (s) For a district or a public school academy that has pupils enrolled in a grade level that was not offered by the district or public school academy in the immediately preceding school year, the number of pupils enrolled in that grade level to be counted in membership is the average of the number of those pupils enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the pupil membership count day and the supplemental count day of the current school year. Membership is calculated by adding the number of pupils registered for attendance in that grade level on the pupil membership count day plus pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as corrected by subsequent department audit, plus the final audited count from the supplemental count day for the current school year, and dividing that sum by 2. (t) A pupil enrolled in a cooperative education program may be counted in membership in the pupilâs district of residence with the written approval of all parties to the cooperative agreement. (u) If, as a result of a disciplinary action, a district determines through the districtâs alternative or disciplinary education program that the best instructional placement for a pupil is in the pupilâs home or otherwise apart from the general school population, if that placement is authorized in writing by the district superintendent and district alternative or disciplinary education supervisor, and if the district provides appropriate instruction as described in this subdivision to the pupil at the pupilâs home or otherwise apart from the general school population, the district may count the pupil in membership on a pro rata basis, with the proration based on the number of hours of instruction the district actually provides to the pupil divided by the number of hours required under section 101 for full-time equivalency. For the purposes of this subdivision, a district is considered to be providing appropriate instruction if all of the following are met: (i) The district provides at least 2 nonconsecutive hours of instruction per week to the pupil at the pupilâs home or otherwise apart from the general school population under the supervision of a certificated teacher. (ii) The district provides instructional materials, resources, and supplies that are comparable to those otherwise provided in the districtâs alternative education program. (iii) Course content is comparable to that in the districtâs alternative education program. (iv) Credit earned is awarded to the pupil and placed on the pupilâs transcript. (v) If a pupil was enrolled in a public school academy on the pupil membership count day, if the public school academyâs contract with its authorizing body is revoked or the public school academy otherwise ceases to operate, and if the pupil enrolls in a district within 45 days after the pupil membership count day, the department shall adjust the districtâs pupil count for the pupil membership count day to include the pupil in the count. (w) For a public school academy that has been in operation for at least 2 years and that suspended operations for at least 1 semester and is resuming operations, membership is the sum of the product of .90 times the number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the first pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, whichever is first, occurring after operations resume, plus the product of .10 times the final audited count from the most recent pupil membership count day or supplemental count day that occurred before suspending operations, as determined by the superintendent. (x) Except for 2026-2027, if a districtâs membership for a particular fiscal year, as otherwise calculated under this subsection, would be less than 1,550 pupils, the district has 4.5 or fewer pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, and the district does not receive funding under section 22d(2), the districtâs membership is considered to be the membership figure calculated under this subdivision. If a district educates and counts in its membership pupils in grades 9 to 12 who reside in a contiguous district that does not operate grades 9 to 12 and if 1 or both of the affected districts request the department to use the determination allowed under this sentence, the department shall include the square mileage of both districts in determining the number of pupils per square mile for each of the districts for the purposes of this subdivision. If a district has established a community engagement advisory committee in partnership with the department of treasury, is required to submit a deficit elimination plan or an enhanced deficit elimination plan under section 1220 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1220, and is located in a city with a population between 9,000 and 11,000, as determined by the department, that is in a county with a population between 150,000 and 160,000, as determined by the department, the districtâs membership is considered to be the membership figure calculated under this subdivision. For 2026-2027 only, every districtâs membership is considered to be the membership figure calculated under this subdivision. The membership figure calculated under this subdivision is the greater of the following: (i) The average of the districtâs membership for the 3-fiscal-year period ending with that fiscal year, calculated by adding the districtâs actual membership for each of those 3 fiscal years, as otherwise calculated under this subsection, and dividing the sum of those 3 membership figures by 3. (ii) The districtâs actual membership for that fiscal year as otherwise calculated under this subsection. (y) Full-time equated memberships for special education pupils who are not enrolled in kindergarten but are enrolled in a classroom program under R 340.1754 of the Michigan Administrative Code are determined by dividing the number of class hours scheduled and provided per year by 450. Full-time equated memberships for special education pupils who are not enrolled in kindergarten but are receiving early childhood special education services under R 340.1755 or R 340.1862 of the Michigan Administrative Code are determined by dividing the number of hours of service scheduled and provided per year per pupil by 180. (z) A pupil of a district that begins its school year after Labor Day who is enrolled in an intermediate district program that begins before Labor Day is not considered to be less than a full-time pupil solely due to instructional time scheduled but not attended by the pupil before Labor Day. (aa) For the first year in which a pupil is counted in membership on the pupil membership count day in a middle college program, the membership is the average of the full-time equated membership on the pupil membership count day and on the supplemental count day for the current school year, as determined by the department. If a pupil described in this subdivision was counted in membership by the operating district on the immediately preceding supplemental count day, the pupil is excluded from the districtâs immediately preceding supplemental count for the purposes of determining the districtâs membership. (bb) A district or public school academy that educates a pupil who attends a United States Olympic Education Center may count the pupil in membership regardless of whether or not the pupil is a resident of this state. (cc) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence under section 1148(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1148, is counted in the educating district. (dd) For a pupil enrolled in a dropout recovery program that meets the requirements of section 23a, the pupil must be counted as 1/12 of a full-time equated membership for each month that the district operating the program reports that the pupil was enrolled in the program and was in full attendance or based on the number of successfully completed courses by the pupil, with each successfully completed course equivalent to 1/12 of a full-time equated membership. A district may claim more than 1/12 of a full-time equated membership within a month for an enrolled pupil who was in full attendance and successfully completed more than 1 required course. If the special membership counting provisions under this subdivision result in a pupil being counted as more than 1.0 FTE in a fiscal year, the entire FTE amount, including any amount in excess of 1.0 FTE, must be funded under sections 22a and 22b. A district may generate more than 1.0 FTE for a pupil enrolled in a program under section 23a. The district operating the program shall report to the center the number of pupils who were enrolled in the program and were in full attendance for a month not later than 30 days after the end of that month. A district shall not report a pupil as being in full attendance for a month unless both of the following are met: (i) A personalized learning plan is in place on or before the first school day of the month for the first month the pupil participates in the program. (ii) Either of the following is met: (A) The pupil meets the districtâs definition under section 23a of satisfactory monthly progress for that month or, if the pupil does not meet that definition of satisfactory monthly progress for that month, the pupil did meet that definition of satisfactory monthly progress in the immediately preceding month and appropriate interventions, as defined by the district, are implemented within 10 school days after it is determined that the pupil does not meet that definition of satisfactory monthly progress. (B) For the first 2 months that the pupil participates in the program, the pupil earns 0.25 credit by the end of the second month. A pupil described in this sub-subparagraph may be retroactively reported as being in full attendance for the first month that the pupil participated in the program. (ee) A pupil participating in a virtual course under section 21f is counted in membership in the district enrolling the pupil. (ff) If a public school academy that is not in its first or second year of operation closes at the end of a school year and does not reopen for the next school year, the department shall adjust the membership count of the district or other public school academy in which a former pupil of the closed public school academy enrolls and is in regular daily attendance for the next school year to ensure that the district or other public school academy receives the same amount of membership aid for the pupil as if the pupil were counted in the district or other public school academy on the supplemental count day of the preceding school year. (gg) If a special education pupil is expelled under section 1311 or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311 and 380.1311a, and is not in attendance on the pupil membership count day because of the expulsion, and if the pupil remains enrolled in the district and resumes regular daily attendance during that school year, the districtâs membership is adjusted to count the pupil in membership as if the pupil had been in attendance on the pupil membership count day. (hh) A pupil enrolled in a community district is counted in membership in the community district. (ii) A part-time pupil enrolled in a nonpublic school in grades K to 12 in accordance with section 166b must not be counted as more than 0.75 of a full-time equated membership. (jj) A district that borders another state or a public school academy that operates at least grades 9 to 12 and is located within 20 miles of a border with another state may count in membership a pupil who is enrolled in a course at a college or university that is located in the bordering state and within 20 miles of the border with this state if all of the following are met: (i) The pupil would meet the definition of an eligible student under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, if the course were an eligible course under that act. (ii) The course in which the pupil is enrolled would meet the definition of an eligible course under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, if the course were provided by an eligible postsecondary institution under that act. (iii) The department determines that the college or university is an institution that, in the other state, fulfills a function comparable to a state university or community college, as those terms are defined in section 3 of the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.513, or is an independent nonprofit degree-granting college or university. (iv) The district or public school academy pays for a portion of the pupilâs tuition at the college or university in an amount equal to the eligible charges that the district or public school academy would pay to an eligible postsecondary institution under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, as if the course were an eligible course under that act. (v) The district or public school academy awards high school credit to a pupil who successfully completes a course as described in this subdivision. (kk) A pupil enrolled in a middle college program may be counted for more than a total of 1.0 full-time equated membership for any of the school years in which the pupil is enrolled in the middle college program, but the total full-time equated membership for that pupil for all of the school years in which the pupil is enrolled in high school must not be greater than 5.00 full-time equated membership if the pupil is enrolled in more than the minimum number of instructional days and hours required under section 101 and the pupil is expected to complete the 5‑year program with both a high school diploma and at least 60 transferable college credits or is expected to earn an associateâs degree in fewer than 5 years. A pupil who graduates with both a high school diploma and at least 60 transferable college credits or an associate degree at least 1 semester early is considered to have completed the middle college program in fewer than 5 years. (ll) If a districtâs or public school academyâs membership for a particular fiscal year, as otherwise calculated under this subsection, includes pupils counted in membership who are enrolled under section 166b, all of the following apply for the purposes of this subdivision: (i) If the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils counted under section 166b equals or exceeds 5% of the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils not counted in membership under section 166b in the immediately preceding fiscal year, then the growth in the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils counted under section 166b must not exceed 10%. (ii) If the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils counted under section 166b is less than 5% of the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils not counted in membership under section 166b in the immediately preceding fiscal year, then the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils counted under section 166b must not exceed the greater of the following: (A) Five percent of the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils not counted in membership under section 166b. (B) Ten percent more than the districtâs or public school academyâs membership for pupils counted under section 166b in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (iii) If 1 or more districts consolidate or are parties to an annexation, then the calculations under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) must be applied to the combined total membership for pupils counted in those districts for the fiscal year immediately preceding the consolidation or annexation. (5) âPublic school academyâ means that term as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, MCL 380.5. (6) âPupilâ means an individual in membership in a public school. A district must have the approval of the pupilâs district of residence to count the pupil in membership, except approval by the pupilâs district of residence is not required for any of the following: (a) A nonpublic part-time pupil enrolled in grades K to 12 in accordance with section 166b. (b) A pupil receiving 1/2 or less of the pupilâs instruction in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence. (c) A pupil enrolled in a public school academy. (d) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence if the pupil is enrolled in accordance with section 105 or 105c. (e) A pupil who has made an official written complaint or whose parent or legal guardian has made an official written complaint to law enforcement officials and to school officials of the pupilâs district of residence that the pupil has been the victim of a criminal sexual assault or other serious assault, if the official complaint either indicates that the assault occurred at school or that the assault was committed by 1 or more other pupils enrolled in the school the pupil would otherwise attend in the district of residence or by an employee of the district of residence. A person who intentionally makes a false report of a crime to law enforcement officials for the purposes of this subdivision is subject to section 411a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.411a, which provides criminal penalties for that conduct. As used in this subdivision: (i) âAt schoolâ means in a classroom, elsewhere on school premises, on a school bus or other school-related vehicle, or at a school-sponsored activity or event whether or not it is held on school premises. (ii) âSerious assaultâ means an act that constitutes a felony violation of chapter XI of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81 to 750.90g, or that constitutes an assault and infliction of serious or aggravated injury under section 81a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81a. (f) A pupil whose district of residence changed after the pupil membership count day and before the supplemental count day and who continues to be enrolled on the supplemental count day as a nonresident in the district in which the pupil was enrolled as a resident on the pupil membership count day of the same school year. (g) A pupil enrolled in an alternative education program operated by a district other than the pupilâs district of residence who meets 1 or more of the following: (i) The pupil has been suspended or expelled from the pupilâs district of residence for any reason, including, but not limited to, a suspension or expulsion under section 1310, 1311, or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1310, 380.1311, and 380.1311a. (ii) The pupil had previously dropped out of school. (iii) The pupil is pregnant or is a parent. (iv) The pupil has been referred to the program by a court. (h) A pupil enrolled in the Michigan Virtual School, for the pupilâs enrollment in the Michigan Virtual School. (i) A pupil who is the child of a person who works at the district or who is the child of a person who worked at the district as of the time the pupil first enrolled in the district but who no longer works at the district due to a workforce reduction. As used in this subdivision, âchildâ includes an adopted child, stepchild, or legal ward. (j) An expelled pupil who has been denied reinstatement by the expelling district and is reinstated by another school board under section 1311 or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311 and 380.1311a. (k) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence in a middle college program if the pupilâs district of residence and the enrolling district are both constituent districts of the same intermediate district. (l) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence who attends a United States Olympic Education Center. (m) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence under section 1148(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1148. (n) A pupil who enrolls in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence as a result of the pupilâs school not making adequate yearly progress under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. However, if a district educates pupils who reside in another district and if the primary instructional site for those pupils is established by the educating district after 2009-2010 and is located within the boundaries of that other district, the educating district must have the approval of that other district to count those pupils in membership. (7) âPupil membership count dayâ of a district or intermediate district means: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), either of the following: (i) The first Wednesday in October each school year. (ii) For a district or building in which school is not in session on the Wednesday described in subparagraph (i) due to conditions not within the control of school authorities, with the approval of the superintendent, the immediately following day on which school is in session in the district or building. (b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for a district or intermediate district maintaining school during the entire school year, the following days: (i) Fourth Wednesday in July. (ii) First Wednesday in October. (iii) Second Wednesday in February. (iv) Fourth Wednesday in April. (c) If a date listed in subdivision (a) or (b) is on a day of religious or cultural significance, as determined by the district or intermediate district, the immediately following day on which school is in session in the district or building. (8) âPupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendanceâ means, except as otherwise provided in this section, pupils in grades K to 12 in attendance and receiving instruction in all classes for which they are enrolled on the pupil membership count day or the supplemental count day, as applicable. Except as otherwise provided in this section and subsection, a pupil who is absent from any of the classes in which the pupil is enrolled on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day and who does not attend each of those classes during the 10 consecutive school days immediately following the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, except for a pupil who has been excused by the district, is not counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a pupil who is excused from attendance on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day and who fails to attend each of the classes in which the pupil is enrolled within 30 calendar days after the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day is not counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership. Except as otherwise provided in this section, in addition, a pupil who was enrolled and in attendance in a district, intermediate district, or public school academy before the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day of a particular year but was expelled or suspended on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day is only counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership if the pupil resumed attendance in the district, intermediate district, or public school academy within 45 days after the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day of that particular year. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a pupil not counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership due to an absence from a class is counted as a prorated membership for the classes the pupil attended. For purposes of this subsection: (a) âAppropriately placedâ means holding a valid Michigan educator credential with the required grade range for the assignment, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction. (b) âClassâ means a period of time in 1 day when pupils and an individual who is appropriately placed or an individual working under a valid substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department are together and instruction is taking place. If a pupil is assigned to a class or instructional setting for which the individual providing instruction is not appropriately placed, the misplacement is subject to the penalties and remedies provided under section 163. (9) âRuleâ means a rule promulgated pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (10) âThe revised school codeâ means the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852. (11) âSchool district of the first classâ, âfirst class school districtâ, and âdistrict of the first classâ mean, for the purposes of this article only, a district that had at least 40,000 pupils in membership for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (12) âSchool fiscal yearâ means a fiscal year that commences July 1 and continues through June 30. (13) âState boardâ means the state board of education. (14) âSuperintendentâ, unless the context clearly refers to a district or intermediate district superintendent, means the superintendent of public instruction described in section 3 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963. (15) âSupplemental count dayâ means the day on which the supplemental pupil count is conducted under section 6a. (16) âTuition pupilâ means a pupil of school age attending school in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence for whom tuition may be charged to the district of residence. Tuition pupil does not include a pupil who is a special education pupil, a pupil described in subsection (6)(d) to (n), or a pupil whose parent or guardian voluntarily enrolls the pupil in a district that is not the pupilâs district of residence. A pupilâs district of residence shall not require a high school tuition pupil, as provided under section 111, to attend another school district after the pupil has been assigned to a school district. (17) âState school aid fundâ means the state school aid fund established in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (18) âTaxable valueâ means, except as otherwise provided in this article, the taxable value of property as determined under section 27a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27a. (19) âTextbookâ means a book, electronic book, or other instructional print or electronic resource that is selected and approved by the governing board of a district and that contains a presentation of principles of a subject, or that is a literary work relevant to the study of a subject required for the use of classroom pupils, or another type of course material that forms the basis of classroom instruction. (20) âTotal state aidâ or âtotal state school aidâ, except as otherwise provided in this article, means the total combined amount of all funds due to a district, intermediate district, or other entity under this article. (21) âWeighted pupil membershipâ means that term as calculated in this subsection. For the purposes of calculations under this subsection, the base weighted pupil membership for a district is 0. All of the following apply to the weighted pupil membership under this subsection: (a) For each full-time English language learner counted in membership in a district in the immediately preceding fiscal year, the weighted pupil membership for that district must be increased as follows: (i) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 1.0 and 1.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase of 0.1940. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph be increased annually until it equals 0.75. (ii) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 2.0 and 2.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase of 0.1339. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph be increased annually until it equals 0.50. (iii) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 3.0 and 3.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase of 0.0219. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph be increased annually until it equals 0.35. (b) For each economically disadvantaged pupil counted in membership in a district, the weighted pupil membership for that district must be increased as follows: (i) For the purpose of this subparagraph, the department shall determine the number of pupils in membership who are economically disadvantaged as the greatest of the following: (A) The number of membership pupils in the district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. (B) If the district is in the community eligibility program, the number of pupils determined to be eligible based on the product of the identified student percentage multiplied by the total number of pupils in the district, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. These calculations must be made at the building level. This sub-subparagraph applies only to an eligible district for the fiscal year immediately following the first fiscal year in which it is in the community eligibility program. As used in this sub-subparagraph, âidentified student percentageâ means the quotient of the number of pupils in an eligible district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in a form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day in the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible district is in the community eligibility program, divided by the total number of pupils counted in an eligible district on the pupil membership count day in the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible district is in the community eligibility program. (C) If the district began operations as a district after the pupil membership count day of the current fiscal year, the number of membership pupils in the district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the current fiscal year. (D) If, for a particular fiscal year, the number of membership pupils in a district who are determined under sub-subparagraph (A) to be economically disadvantaged or to be eligible based on the identified student percentage varies by more than 20 percentage points from the number of those pupils in the district as calculated under sub-subparagraph (A) for the immediately preceding fiscal year caused by an egregious reporting error by the district, the department may choose to have the calculations under sub-subparagraph (A) instead be made using the number of membership pupils in the district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. (ii) Each district must be assigned an opportunity index score each fiscal year, the value of which is the quotient of the number of economically disadvantaged pupils as determined under this subdivision for the district and the total number of pupils in the district in the immediately preceding fiscal year, multiplied by 100 and rounded up to the nearest whole number. Each district must be assigned an opportunity index band as follows: (A) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 0 but less than 20 must be assigned to band 1 and must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1913 and not more than 0.1965 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the districtâs opportunity index score minus 1, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.1913 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph be increased annually until it reaches between 0.35 and 0.36 per economically disadvantaged pupil. (B) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 20 but less than 44 must be assigned to band 2 and must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1968 and not more than 0.2046 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the districtâs opportunity index score minus 20, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.1968 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph be increased annually until it reaches between 0.36 and 0.375 per economically disadvantaged pupil. (C) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 44 but less than 59 must be assigned to band 3 and must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2050 and not more than 0.2126 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the districtâs opportunity index score minus 44, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.2050 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph be increased annually until it reaches between 0.375 and 0.39 per economically disadvantaged pupil. (D) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 59 but less than 73 must be assigned to band 4 and must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2132 and not more than 0.2284 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the districtâs opportunity index score minus 59, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this sub-subparagraph, plus 0.2132 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph be increased annually until it reaches between 0.39 and 0.42 per economically disadvantaged pupil. (E) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 73 but less than 85 must be assigned to band 5 and must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2296 and not more than 0.2546 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the districtâs opportunity index score minus 73, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this sub-subparagraph, plus 0.2296 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph be increased annually until it reaches between 0.42 and 0.47 per economically disadvantaged pupil. (F) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 85 must be assigned to band 6 and must receive an additional weighted pupil membership at a rate of 0.2569 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph will be increased annually until it reaches 0.47 per economically disadvantaged pupil. (G) As used in this subparagraph, âband adjustment factorâ means an amount equal to the difference between the lowest and highest reimbursement bounds for each band, divided by the number of possible opportunity index scores in that band. (c) To assist the legislature in determining necessary funding levels to support foundation allowance payments for weighted pupil membership calculated in this subsection, each revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b, must include estimated pupil counts necessary to determine a weighted pupil membership under this subsection for the current and subsequent 2 fiscal years. (d) As used in this subsection: (i) âEconomically disadvantagedâ means a pupil who has been determined eligible for free or reduced-price meals as determined under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j; who is in a household receiving supplemental nutrition assistance program or temporary assistance for needy families assistance; or who is homeless, migrant, or in foster care, as reported to the center. (ii) âEnglish language learnerâ means limited English proficient pupils who speak a language other than English as their primary language and have difficulty speaking, reading, writing, or understanding English as reported to the center. Sec. 11. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $18,179,025,300.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of $73,151,100.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 from the school consolidation and infrastructure fund created under section 11x, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund created under section 27d, an amount not to exceed $97,037,400.00 from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund created under section 22r, and an amount not to exceed $600,000.00 from the general pupil support reserve fund created under section 22s. For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $18,856,252,300.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of $57,984,900.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $130,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $26,300,000.00 from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed $80,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund created under section 27d, an amount not to exceed $7,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship private provider fund created under section 27e, an amount not to exceed $107,037,400.00 from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund created under section 22r, and an amount not to exceed $600,000.00 from the general pupil support reserve fund created under section 22s. In addition, all available federal funds are appropriated as allocated in this article for the fiscal years ending September 30, 2026 and September 30, 2027. (2) The appropriations under this section are allocated as provided in this article. Money appropriated under this section from the general fund must be expended to fund the purposes of this article before the expenditure of money appropriated under this section from the state school aid fund. (3) Any general fund allocations under this article that are not expended by the end of the fiscal year are transferred to the school aid stabilization fund created under section 11a. Sec. 11a. (1) The school aid stabilization fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the school aid stabilization fund. The state treasurer shall deposit into the school aid stabilization fund all of the following: (a) Unexpended and unencumbered state school aid fund revenue for a fiscal year that remains in the state school aid fund as of the bookclosing for that fiscal year. (b) Money statutorily dedicated to the school aid stabilization fund. (c) Money appropriated to the school aid stabilization fund. (3) Money available in the school aid stabilization fund may not be expended without a specific appropriation from the school aid stabilization fund. Money in the school aid stabilization fund must be expended only for purposes for which state school aid fund money may be expended. (4) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the school aid stabilization fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the school aid stabilization fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (5) Money in the school aid stabilization fund at the close of a fiscal year remains in the school aid stabilization fund and does not lapse to the unreserved school aid fund balance or the general fund. (6) If the maximum amount appropriated under section 11 from the state school aid fund for a fiscal year exceeds the amount available for expenditure from the state school aid fund for that fiscal year, there is appropriated from the school aid stabilization fund to the state school aid fund an amount equal to the projected shortfall as determined by the department of treasury, but not to exceed available money in the school aid stabilization fund. If the money in the school aid stabilization fund is insufficient to fully fund an amount equal to the projected shortfall, the state budget director shall notify the legislature as required under section 296(2) and state payments in an amount equal to the remainder of the projected shortfall must be prorated in the manner provided under section 296(3). (7) For 2026-2027, in addition to the appropriations in section 11, there is appropriated from the school aid stabilization fund to the state school aid fund the amount necessary to fully fund the allocations under this article. Sec. 11j. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $23,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to the school loan bond redemption fund in the department of treasury on behalf of districts and intermediate districts. Notwithstanding section 296 or any other provision of this act, funds allocated under this section are not subject to proration and must be paid in full. Sec. 11k. For 2026-2027, there is appropriated from the general fund to the school loan revolving fund an amount equal to the amount of school bond loans assigned to the Michigan finance authority, not to exceed the total amount of school bond loans held in reserve as long-term assets. As used in this section, âschool loan revolving fundâ means that fund created in section 16c of the shared credit rating act, 1985 PA 227, MCL 141.1066c. Sec. 11m. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for fiscal year cash-flow borrowing costs solely related to the state school aid fund established under section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 11s. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $3,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for the purpose of providing services and programs to children who reside within the boundaries of a district with the majority of its territory located within the boundaries of a city for which an executive proclamation of emergency concerning drinking water is issued in the current or immediately preceding 11 fiscal years under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421, and that has at least 4,500 pupils in membership for the 2016-2017 fiscal year or has at least 2,400 pupils in membership for a fiscal year after 2016-2017. (2) For 2026-2027 only, from the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 to an intermediate district that has a constituent district described in subsection (1) for interventions and supports for students in grades K to 12 who were impacted by an executive proclamation of emergency described in subsection (1) concerning drinking water. Funds under this subsection must be used for behavioral supports, social workers, counselors, psychologists, nursing services, including, but not limited to, vision and hearing services, transportation services, parental engagement, community coordination, and other support services. (3) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 11x. (1) The school consolidation and infrastructure fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund for the purpose of improving student academic outcomes, increasing the efficiency of the stateâs public education system, and creating a healthy and safe space for students in this state. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the school consolidation and infrastructure fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the school consolidation and infrastructure fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the school consolidation and infrastructure fund interest and earnings from school consolidation and infrastructure fund investments. (3) Money in the school consolidation and infrastructure fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the school consolidation and infrastructure fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund or the general fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the school consolidation and infrastructure fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money available in the school consolidation and infrastructure fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (6) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2022-2023 only an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for grants to districts and intermediate districts to support the cost of a feasibility study or analysis of consolidation or the consolidation of services among 1 or more buildings within a district, among 1 or more districts, or among 1 or more intermediate districts. Districts and intermediate districts may apply for a grant under this subsection to the department on a first-come, first-serve basis. The maximum amount of a grant to be distributed under this subsection may not exceed $250,000.00. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department. (7) To be eligible for a grant under subsection (6), a district or intermediate district must demonstrate to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, that it will conduct a feasibility study or analysis and that all of the following will be met: (a) Within 30 days after completion of the study or analysis, the district or intermediate district will make the results of the study or analysis available to all districts and intermediate districts included in the study or analysis. Within 60 days after the completion of the study or analysis, the district or intermediate district will make the results available on a publicly available website. (b) The study or analysis may include, but is not limited to, consolidation opportunities in the following areas: (i) Financial services, which may include, but is not limited to, the following: (A) Budgeting and staffing. (B) Payroll. (C) Employee benefits. (D) State reporting. (E) Software consolidation to achieve common software throughout the intermediate district. (ii) Human resources, which may include, but is not limited to, the following: (A) Onboarding. (B) Title IX administration. (C) Hiring. (D) Software consolidation to achieve common software throughout the intermediate district. (iii) Information technology, which may include, but is not limited to, the following: (A) Software consolidation to achieve common software throughout the intermediate district. (B) Fiber projects. (C) Cybersecurity. (D) One-to-one device management. (iv) Grant management and reporting, which may include, but is not limited to, the following: (A) Management of all state grant sites and databases. (B) Grant reporting. (v) Cash management, which may include, but is not limited to, the opportunities for intermediate districts and districts to contract on cash flow management to maximize interest earnings. (vi) Debt issuance and management, including at least all of the following: (A) Refunding opportunities. (B) New bond issue analysis. (vii) School facility consolidation. (viii) Consolidation of transportation-related activities. (ix) The physical consolidation of districts. (8) An intermediate district that receives a grant under this section shall meet with its constituent districts located within the intermediate district to discuss the results of the study or analysis and to implement changes where feasible. The application for an intermediate district must include a brief description of how the intermediate district will conduct these meetings. (9) To be eligible for the receipt of funding for infrastructure-related projects appropriated from the school consolidation and infrastructure fund created under this section, a district must allow for the facility condition assessments described in former section 11y to be conducted in the district. It is the intent of the legislature that money in the school consolidation and infrastructure fund will not be appropriated for infrastructure projects until the completion of the facility condition assessments described in former section 11y. (10) For 2026-2027, $50,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund must be deposited into the school consolidation and infrastructure fund. Sec. 12d. (1) From the school consolidation and infrastructure fund created under section 11x, there is allocated for 2023-2024 only an amount not to exceed $110,000,000.00 for the purposes of this section. (2) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 for grants to districts and intermediate districts to support costs related to internal consolidation within the district or intermediate district. All of the following apply to grants under this subsection: (a) The department shall allow grants for applicants that have already taken actions for internal consolidation within the previous 2 years and grants for applicants that have not yet begun internal consolidation activities. (b) The department shall prioritize applications from districts and intermediate districts that meet any of the following criteria: (i) Are in an opportunity index band, as determined under section 6(21), of 3 or higher. (ii) Are an intermediate district for which the percentage of pupils in membership who were determined to be economically disadvantaged in the immediately preceding fiscal year is equal to or greater than the minimum percentage for a district or public school academy to be in an opportunity index band, as determined under section 6(21), of 3 or higher. (iii) Are experiencing declining enrollment. (iv) Have no ability to issue bonds for infrastructure needs, or have made a good-faith effort, as determined by the department, to issue bonds for infrastructure needs. (c) Grants may be used for operational expenses related to internal consolidation and for infrastructure needs. Infrastructure needs may include, but are not limited to, the removal of buildings. (3) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), $35,000,000.00 is allocated as follows: (a) $15,000,000.00 to Detroit Public Schools Community District to support the construction of the Cooley High School athletic complex. (b) $10,000,000.00 to Wayne RESA to support the construction of an academic and professional building in the city of Wayne. (c) $5,000,000.00 to Beecher Community School District to support the construction of a high school in the district. (d) $4,000,000.00 to Taylor School District for costs related to a new high school in the district. (e) $1,000,000.00 to the School District of the City of Hamtramck to support the costs of building infrastructure upgrades and maintenance. (4) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, in addition to the money appropriated in section 11, from the state school aid fund, there is appropriated and allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 to Taylor School District for costs related to a new high school in the district or for other infrastructure purposes. The appropriation and allocation under this subsection is contingent on the effective issuance of a directive by the budget director, pursuant to section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a, to lapse $4,000,000.00 of remaining funding from a work project that was established under this section in 2023-2024. The amount allocated under this subsection may not exceed the amount lapsed from the work project referenced in the immediately preceding sentence. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 12e. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount estimated at $50,000,000.00 for grants to districts and intermediate districts for infrastructure needs, including, but not limited to, demolition of vacant buildings as described in this section. (2) Districts and intermediate districts must apply on a competitive basis for funding in a form and manner determined by the department. (3) If the amount allocated under subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund awards under this section, there is appropriated from the school consolidation and infrastructure fund described in section 11x the amount necessary, but not to exceed $50,000,000.00, to fully fund these awards, or the maximum available in the fund, whichever is less. The state budget director shall provide notification to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and the house and senate fiscal agencies regarding any additional appropriation described in this subsection. (4) The department shall prioritize applications from districts and intermediate districts that meet any of the following criteria: (a) Are in an opportunity index band, as determined under section 6(21), of 4 or higher. (b) Are an intermediate district for which the percentage of pupils in membership who were determined to be economically disadvantaged in the immediately preceding fiscal year is equal to or greater than the minimum percentage for a district or public school academy to be in an opportunity index band, as determined under section 6(21), of 4 or higher. (c) Have infrastructure needs identified by the statewide school facilities study under the former section 11y as being critical needs. A district or intermediate district must demonstrate that the needs described in this subdivision affect the health, safety, or well-being of students. (d) Have no ability to issue bonds for infrastructure needs, or have made a good-faith effort, as determined by the department, to issue bonds for infrastructure needs. (5) Funds awarded in subsection (4) may be used only to address infrastructure needs that were identified as critical needs in the statewide school facilities study issued pursuant to the former section 11y. (6) From the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $8,800,000.00 for grants to districts to cover costs associated with the demolition of vacant buildings on property owned by the district. All of the following apply to grants awarded under this subsection: (a) A district shall apply for funding under this section in a form and manner determined by the department. (b) The department shall prioritize applicants that have lost more than 80% of their pupil membership since 2002-2003 with the greatest number of vacant properties. (c) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated for programs described in this subsection may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2029. A recipient of funding for a program described in this subsection must return any unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department by not later than October 30, 2029. (7) A recipient of funds under subsection (6) must not be awarded more than $10,000,000.00 in additional grants under this section. (8) The funds allocated under this section for 2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to fund district and intermediate district infrastructure needs. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2029. (9) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 15. (1) If a district or intermediate district fails to receive its proper apportionment, the department, upon satisfactory proof that the district or intermediate district was entitled justly, shall apportion the deficiency in the next apportionment. Subject to subsections (2) and (3), if a district or intermediate district has received more than its proper apportionment, the department, upon satisfactory proof, shall deduct the excess in the next apportionment. Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, state aid overpayments to a district, other than overpayments in payments for special education or special education transportation, may be recovered from any payment made under this article other than a special education or special education transportation payment, from the proceeds of a loan to the district under the emergency municipal loan act, 1980 PA 243, MCL 141.931 to 141.942, or from the proceeds of millage levied or pledged under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. State aid overpayments made in special education or special education transportation payments may be recovered from subsequent special education or special education transportation payments, from the proceeds of a loan to the district under the emergency municipal loan act, 1980 PA 243, MCL 141.931 to 141.942, or from the proceeds of millage levied or pledged under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. (2) If the result of an audit conducted by or for the department affects the current fiscal year membership, the department shall adjust affected payments in the current fiscal year. A deduction due to an adjustment made as a result of an audit conducted by or for the department, or as a result of information obtained by the department from the district, an intermediate district, the department of treasury, or the office of auditor general, must be deducted from the districtâs apportionments when the adjustment is finalized. At the request of the district and upon the district presenting evidence satisfactory to the department of the hardship, the department may grant up to an additional 4 years for the adjustment and may advance payments to the district otherwise authorized under this article if the district would otherwise experience a significant hardship in satisfying its financial obligations. However, a district that presented satisfactory evidence of hardship and was undergoing an extended adjustment during 2018-2019 may continue to use the period of extended adjustment as originally granted by the department. (3) If, based on an audit by the department or the departmentâs designee or because of new or updated information received by the department, the department determines that the amount paid to a district or intermediate district under this article for the current fiscal year or a prior fiscal year was incorrect, the department shall make the appropriate deduction or payment in the districtâs or intermediate districtâs allocation in the next apportionment after the adjustment is finalized. The department shall calculate the deduction or payment according to the law in effect in the fiscal year in which the incorrect amount was paid. If the district does not receive an allocation for the fiscal year or if the allocation is insufficient to pay the amount of any deduction, the amount of any deduction otherwise applicable must be satisfied from the proceeds of a loan to the district under the emergency municipal loan act, 1980 PA 243, MCL 141.931 to 141.942, or from the proceeds of millage levied or pledged under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, as determined by the department. (4) A membership adjustment must not be made under this section based on an educator misplacement, as that term is defined in section 163, that is subject to a state aid adjustment under section 163. For an educator misplacement described in section 163, the penalties and remedies provided under section 163 are the exclusive state aid adjustment for that misplacement. (5) The department may conduct audits, or may direct audits by designee of the department, for the current fiscal year and the immediately preceding fiscal year of all records related to a program for which a district or intermediate district has received funds under this article. (6) Expenditures made by departments under this article that are caused by the write-off of prior year accruals may be funded by revenue from the write-off of prior year accruals. (7) In addition to funds appropriated in section 11 for all programs and services, there is appropriated for 2026-2027 for obligations in excess of applicable appropriations an amount equal to the collection of overpayments, but not to exceed amounts available from overpayments. Sec. 16. The department may not enter into a state contract with an individual if an employee of the department may financially benefit from the contract. Sec. 18. (1) Except as provided in another section of this article, each district or other entity shall apply the money received by the district or entity under this article to salaries and other compensation of teachers and other employees, tuition, transportation, lighting, heating, ventilation, water service, the purchase of textbooks, other supplies, and any other school operating expenditures defined in section 7. However, not more than 20% of the total amount received by a district under sections 22a and 22b or received by an intermediate district under section 81 may be transferred by the board to either the capital projects fund or to the debt retirement fund for debt service. A district or other entity shall not apply or take the money for a purpose other than as provided in this section. The department shall determine the reasonableness of expenditures and may withhold from a recipient of funds under this article the apportionment otherwise due upon a violation by the recipient. A district must not be prohibited or limited from using funds appropriated or allocated under this article that are permitted for use for noninstructional services to contract or subcontract with an intermediate district, third party, or vendor for the noninstructional services. (2) Subject to subsection (17), a district or intermediate district shall adopt an annual budget in a manner that complies with the uniform budgeting and accounting act, 1968 PA 2, MCL 141.421 to 141.440a. Within 15 days after a district board adopts its annual operating budget for the following school fiscal year, or after a district board adopts a subsequent revision to that budget, the district shall make all of the following available through a link on its website homepage, or may make the information available through a link on its intermediate districtâs website homepage, in a form and manner prescribed by the department: (a) The annual operating budget and subsequent budget revisions. (b) Using data that have already been collected and submitted to the department, a summary of district expenditures for the most recent fiscal year for which they are available, expressed in the following 2 visual displays: (i) A chart of personnel expenditures, broken into the following subcategories: (A) Salaries and wages. (B) Employee benefit costs, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, vision, life, disability, and long-term care benefits. (C) Retirement benefit costs. (D) All other personnel costs. (ii) A chart of all district expenditures, broken into the following subcategories: (A) Instruction. (B) Support services. (C) Business and administration. (D) Operations and maintenance. (c) Links to all of the following: (i) The current collective bargaining agreement for each bargaining unit. (ii) Each health care benefits plan, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, vision, disability, long-term care, or any other type of benefits that would constitute health care services, offered to any bargaining unit or employee in the district. (iii) The audit report of the financial audit conducted under subsection (4) for the most recent fiscal year for which it is available. (iv) The bids required under section 5 of the public employees health benefit act, 2007 PA 106, MCL 124.75. (v) The districtâs written policy governing procurement of supplies, materials, and equipment. (vi) The districtâs written policy establishing specific categories of reimbursable expenses, as described in section 1254(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1254. (vii) Either the districtâs accounts payable check register for the most recent school fiscal year or a statement of the total amount of expenses incurred by board members or employees of the district that were reimbursed by the district for the most recent school fiscal year. (d) The total salary and a description and cost of each fringe benefit included in the compensation package for the superintendent of the district and for each employee of the district whose salary exceeds $100,000.00. (e) The annual amount spent on dues paid to associations. (f) The annual amount spent on lobbying or lobbying services. As used in this subdivision, âlobbyingâ means that term as defined in section 5 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.415. (g) Any deficit elimination plan or enhanced deficit elimination plan the district was required to submit under the revised school code. (h) Identification of all credit cards maintained by the district as district credit cards, the identity of all individuals authorized to use each of those credit cards, the credit limit on each credit card, and the dollar limit, if any, for each individualâs authorized use of the credit card. (i) Costs incurred for each instance of out-of-state travel by the school administrator of the district that is fully or partially paid for by the district and the details of each of those instances of out-of-state travel, including at least identification of each individual on the trip, destination, and purpose. (3) For the information required under subsection (2)(a), (2)(b)(i), and (2)(c), an intermediate district shall provide the same information in the same manner as required for a district under subsection (2). (4) For the purposes of determining the reasonableness of expenditures, whether a district or intermediate district has received the proper amount of funds under this article, and whether a violation of this article has occurred, all of the following apply: (a) The department shall require that each district and intermediate district have an audit of the districtâs or intermediate districtâs financial and pupil accounting records conducted at least annually, and at such other times as determined by the department, at the expense of the district or intermediate district, as applicable. The audits must be performed by a certified public accountant or by the intermediate district superintendent, as may be required by the department, or in the case of a district of the first class by a certified public accountant, the intermediate superintendent, or the auditor general of the city. A district or intermediate district shall retain these records for the current fiscal year and from at least the 3 immediately preceding fiscal years. (b) If a district operates in a single building with fewer than 700 full-time equated pupils, if the district has stable membership, and if the error rate of the immediately preceding 2 pupil accounting field audits of the district is less than 2%, the district may have a pupil accounting field audit conducted biennially but must continue to have desk audits for each pupil count. The auditor must document compliance with the audit cycle in the pupil auditing manual. As used in this subdivision, âstable membershipâ means that the districtâs membership for the current fiscal year varies from the districtâs membership for the immediately preceding fiscal year by less than 5%. (c) A districtâs or intermediate districtâs annual financial audit must include an analysis of the financial and pupil accounting data used as the basis for distribution of state school aid. (d) The pupil and financial accounting records and reports, audits, and management letters are subject to requirements established in the auditing and accounting manuals approved and published by the department. (e) All of the following must be done not later than November 1 each year for reporting the prior fiscal year data: (i) A district shall file the annual financial audit reports with the intermediate district and the department. If the issuance of single audits is delayed for the 2024-25 school year due to a late issuance of a Compliance Supplement, the single audit portion of that audit must be filed within 30 days of the issuance of the Compliance Supplement by OMB. (ii) The intermediate district shall file the annual financial audit reports for the intermediate district with the department. If the issuance of single audits is delayed for the 2024-25 school year due to a late issuance of a Compliance Supplement, the single audit portion of that audit must be filed within 30 days of the issuance of the Compliance Supplement by OMB. (iii) The intermediate district shall enter the pupil membership audit reports, known as the audit narrative, for its constituent districts and for the intermediate district, for the pupil membership count day and supplemental count day, in the Michigan student data system. (f) The annual financial audit reports and pupil accounting procedures reports must be available to the public in compliance with the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (g) Not later than January 31 of each year, the department shall notify the state budget director and the legislative appropriations subcommittees responsible for review of the school aid budget of districts and intermediate districts that have not filed an annual financial audit and pupil accounting procedures report required under this section for the school year ending in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (5) By the first business day in November of each fiscal year, each district and intermediate district shall submit to the center, in a manner prescribed by the center, annual comprehensive financial data consistent with the districtâs or intermediate districtâs audited financial statements and consistent with accounting manuals and charts of accounts approved and published by the department. For an intermediate district, the report must also contain the website address where the department can access the report required under section 620 of the revised school code, MCL 380.620. The department shall ensure that the prescribed Michigan public school accounting manual chart of accounts includes standard conventions to distinguish expenditures by allowable fund function and object. The functions must include at minimum categories for instruction, pupil support, instructional staff support, general administration, school administration, business administration, transportation, facilities operation and maintenance, facilities acquisition, and debt service; and must include object classifications of salary, benefits, including categories for active employee health expenditures, purchased services, supplies, capital outlay, and other. A district shall report the required level of detail consistent with the manual as part of the comprehensive annual financial report. (6) By the last business day in September of each year, each district and intermediate district shall file with the center the special education actual cost report, known as âSE-4096â, on a form and in the manner prescribed by the center. An intermediate district shall certify the audit of a districtâs report. (7) By not later than 1 week after the last business day in September of each year, each district and intermediate district shall file with the center the audited transportation expenditure report, known as âSE-4094â, on a form and in the manner prescribed by the center. An intermediate district shall certify the audit of a districtâs report. (8) The department shall review its pupil accounting and pupil auditing manuals at least annually and shall periodically update those manuals to reflect changes in this article. Any changes to the pupil accounting manual that are applicable for the school year that begins after March 31 of a fiscal year must be published by not later than March 31 of that fiscal year. However, if legislation is enacted that necessitates adjustments to the pupil accounting manual after March 31 of a fiscal year, and a district incurs a violation of the amended pupil accounting manual in the subsequent fiscal year, the department must notify the district of that violation and allow the district 30 days to correct the violation before the department is allowed to impose financial penalties under this act related to the violation. (9) If a district that is a public school academy purchases property using money received under this article, the public school academy shall retain ownership of the property unless the public school academy sells the property at fair market value. (10) If a district or intermediate district does not comply with subsections (4), (5), (6), (7), and (12), or if the department determines that the financial data required under subsection (5) are not consistent with audited financial statements, the department shall withhold all state school aid due to the district or intermediate district under this article, beginning with the next payment due to the district or intermediate district, until the district or intermediate district complies with subsections (4), (5), (6), (7), and (12). If the district or intermediate district does not comply with subsections (4), (5), (6), (7), and (12) by the end of the fiscal year, the district or intermediate district forfeits the amount withheld. (11) Subject to subsection (17), if a district or intermediate district does not comply with subsection (2), the department may withhold up to 10% of the total state school aid due to the district or intermediate district under this article, beginning with the next payment due to the district or intermediate district, until the district or intermediate district complies with subsection (2). If the district or intermediate district does not comply with subsection (2) by the end of the fiscal year, the district or intermediate district forfeits the amount withheld. (12) By November 1 of each year, if a district or intermediate district offers virtual learning under section 21f, or for a school of excellence that is a cyber school, as defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, the district or intermediate district shall submit to the department a report that details the per-pupil costs of operating the virtual learning by vendor type and virtual learning model. The report must include information concerning the operation of virtual learning for the immediately preceding school fiscal year, including information concerning summer programming. Information must be collected in a form and manner determined by the department and must be collected in the most efficient manner possible to reduce the administrative burden on reporting entities. (13) By March 31 of each year, the department shall submit to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on state school aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies a report summarizing the per-pupil costs by vendor type of virtual courses available under section 21f and virtual courses provided by a school of excellence that is a cyber school, as defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551. (14) As used in subsections (12) and (13), âvendor typeâ means the following: (a) Virtual courses provided by the Michigan Virtual University. (b) Virtual courses provided by a school of excellence that is a cyber school, as defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551. (c) Virtual courses provided by third party vendors not affiliated with a public school in this state. (d) Virtual courses created and offered by a district or intermediate district. (15) An allocation to a district or another entity under this article is contingent upon the districtâs or entityâs compliance with this section. (16) The department shall annually submit to the senate and house subcommittees on school aid and to the senate and house standing committees on education an itemized list of allocations under this article to any association or consortium consisting of associations in the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report must detail the recipient or recipients, the amount allocated, and the purpose for which the funds were distributed. (17) If the legislature has not enacted and the governor has not approved the general appropriations act for state school aid for the upcoming fiscal year on or before July 1, the department shall not withhold funds or impose any penalty under subsection (11) against a district or intermediate district for failure to comply with subsection (2) until 30 days after the enactment of the general appropriations act for state school aid for that fiscal year. Sec. 18a. (1) This subsection applies only to grant funds awarded and allotted from appropriations in this article that have not been designated as a work project appropriation under section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 1451a. Except as otherwise provided in this article, grant funds described in this subsection that are awarded and allotted to a district, intermediate district, or other entity, unless otherwise specified in this article, must be expended by the grant recipient before the end of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the funds are received. Except as otherwise provided in this article, if a grant recipient does not expend the funds received under this article before the end of the fiscal year in which the funds are received, the grant recipient shall submit a report to the department not later than November 1 after the fiscal year in which the funds are received indicating whether it expects to expend those funds during the fiscal year in which the report is submitted. Except as otherwise provided in this article, a recipient of a grant shall return any unexpended grant funds to the department in the manner prescribed by the department not later than September 30 after the fiscal year in which the funds are received. (2) This subsection applies only to grant funds awarded and allotted from appropriations in this article that have been designated as a work project appropriation under section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. Except as otherwise provided in this article, grant funds described in this subsection that are awarded and allotted to a district, intermediate district, or other entity, unless otherwise specified in this article, must be expended by the grant recipient before the end of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the work project is closed under section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. Except as otherwise provided in this article, a recipient of a grant shall return any unexpended grant funds to the department in the manner prescribed by the department not later than September 30 after the fiscal year in which the work project is closed. Sec. 19. (1) A district or intermediate district shall comply with all applicable reporting requirements specified in state and federal law. Data provided to the center, in a form and manner prescribed by the center, must be aggregated and disaggregated as required by state and federal law. In addition, a district or intermediate district shall cooperate with all measures taken by the center to establish and maintain a statewide P-20 longitudinal data system. (2) Each district shall furnish to the center not later than 5 weeks after the pupil membership count day and by the last business day in June of the school fiscal year ending in the fiscal year, in a manner prescribed by the center, the information necessary for the preparation of the district and high school graduation report, information regarding completion of early middle college credentials obtained and postsecondary credits obtained in any college acceleration program, and information necessary for the preparation of the state and federal accountability reports. This information must meet requirements established in the pupil auditing manual approved and published by the department. The center shall calculate an annual graduation and pupil dropout rate for each high school, each district, and this state, in compliance with nationally recognized standards for these calculations. The center shall report all graduation and dropout rates to the senate and house education committees and appropriations committees, the state budget director, and the department not later than 30 days after the publication of the list described in subsection (5). Before reporting these graduation and dropout rates, the department shall allow a school or district to appeal the calculations. The department shall consider and act upon the appeal within 30 days after it is submitted and shall not report these graduation and dropout rates until after all appeals have been considered and decided. (3) By the first business day in December and by the last business day in June of each year, and within 30 days of any change in employment or assignment status, a district shall furnish to the center, in a manner prescribed by the center, information related to educational personnel and personnel vacancies as necessary for reporting required by state and federal law. For the purposes of this subsection, the center shall only require districts and intermediate districts to report information that is not already available from the office of retirement services in the department of technology, management, and budget, including, but not limited to, vacancy start and end dates, reasons for the vacancy, and reasons for the vacancy termination. (4) If a district or intermediate district fails to meet the requirements of this section, the department shall withhold 5% of the total funds for which the district or intermediate district qualifies under this article until the district or intermediate district complies with this section. If the district or intermediate district does not comply with this section by the end of the fiscal year, the department shall place the amount withheld in an escrow account until the district or intermediate district complies with this section. (5) Before publishing a list of school or district accountability designations as required by the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95, and utilizing data that were certified as accurate and complete after districts and intermediate districts adhered to deadlines, data quality reviews, and correction processes leading to local certification of final student data in subsection (2), the department shall allow a school or district to appeal any calculation errors used in the preparation of accountability metrics. The department shall consider and act upon the appeal within 30 days after it is submitted and shall not publish the list until after all appeals have been considered and decided. (6) The department shall implement statewide standard reporting requirements for education data approved by the department in conjunction with the center. The department shall work with the center, intermediate districts, districts, and other interested stakeholders to implement this policy change. A district or intermediate district shall implement the statewide standard reporting requirements not later than 2017-2018 or when a district or intermediate district updates its education data reporting system, whichever is later. (7) A district or intermediate district shall collect and submit to the center tribal affiliation data for all students and staff and the identification of student participation in federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and participation in federal programs funded under the Johnson-OâMalley supplemental Indian education program modernization act, Public Law 115-404. The data must be reported in a form and manner prescribed by the center in consultation with the federally recognized Indian tribes in this state and the department in adherence to the departmentâs tribal consultation policy. A district or intermediate district shall begin completion of the reporting requirement under this subsection by not later than the 2024-2025 fiscal year. Sec. 20. (1) For 2026-2027, the target foundation allowance is $10,300.00. (2) The department shall calculate the amount of each districtâs foundation allowance as provided in this section, using a target foundation allowance in the amount specified in subsection (1). (3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall calculate the amount of a districtâs foundation allowance as follows, using in all calculations the total amount of the districtâs foundation allowance as calculated before any proration: (a) For a district that had a foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year that was equal to the target foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the district receives a foundation allowance in an amount equal to the target foundation allowance described in subsection (1) for the current fiscal year. (b) For a district that had a foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year that was greater than the target foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the districtâs foundation allowance is an amount equal to the lesser of (the sum of the districtâs foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year plus any per pupil amount calculated under section 20m(2) in the immediately preceding fiscal year plus the increase in the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, as compared to the immediately preceding fiscal year) or (the product of the districtâs foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year times the percentage increase in the United States Consumer Price Index in the calendar year ending in the immediately preceding fiscal year as reported by the May revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b). (c) For a district that had a foundation allowance in the immediately preceding fiscal year that was less than the target foundation allowance in effect for that fiscal year, the districtâs foundation allowance is an amount equal to the lesser of (the sum of districtâs foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year plus any per pupil amount calculated under section 20m(2) in the immediately preceding fiscal year plus the increase in the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, as compared to the immediately preceding fiscal year) or (the product of the districtâs foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year times the percentage increase in the United States Consumer Price Index in the calendar year ending in the immediately preceding fiscal year as reported by the May revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b). (d) For a district that has a foundation allowance that is not a whole dollar amount, the department shall round the districtâs foundation allowance up to the nearest whole dollar. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state portion of a districtâs foundation allowance is an amount equal to the districtâs foundation allowance or the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, whichever is less, minus the local portion of the districtâs foundation allowance. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for a district described in subsection (3)(b) and (c), the state portion of the districtâs foundation allowance is an amount equal to the target foundation allowance minus the districtâs foundation allowance supplemental payment per pupil calculated under section 20m and minus the local portion of the districtâs foundation allowance. For a district that has a millage reduction required under section 31 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, the department shall calculate the state portion of the districtâs foundation allowance as if that reduction did not occur. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes continue to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the receiving district used for the purposes of this subsection does not include the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the dissolved district. Before the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, for a community district, if school operating taxes continue to be levied by a qualifying school district under section 12b of the revised school code, MCL 380.12b, with the same geographic area as the community district, the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the community district to be used for the purposes of this subsection does not include the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the community district. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, it is the intent of the legislature that the previous sentence no longer applies and the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the community district used for the purposes of this subsection includes the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the community district on or after July 1, 2026 and thereafter. (5) The allocation calculated under this section for a pupil is based on the foundation allowance of the pupilâs district of residence. For a pupil enrolled under section 105 or 105c in a district other than the pupilâs district of residence, the allocation calculated under this section is based on the lesser of the foundation allowance of the pupilâs district of residence or the foundation allowance of the educating district. For a pupil in membership in a K-5, K-6, or K-8 district who is enrolled in another district in a grade not offered by the pupilâs district of residence, the allocation calculated under this section is based on the foundation allowance of the educating district if the educating districtâs foundation allowance is greater than the foundation allowance of the pupilâs district of residence. The calculation under this subsection must take into account a districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m. (6) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for pupils in membership, other than special education pupils, in a public school academy, the allocation calculated under this section is an amount per membership pupil other than special education pupils in the public school academy equal to the target foundation allowance specified in subsection (1), or, for a public school academy that was issued a contract under section 552 of the revised school code, MCL 380.552, to operate as a school of excellence that is a cyber school, $10,300.00. Notwithstanding section 101, for a public school academy that begins operations after the pupil membership count day, the amount per membership pupil calculated under this subsection must be adjusted by multiplying that amount per membership pupil by the number of hours of pupil instruction provided by the public school academy after it begins operations, as determined by the department, divided by the minimum number of hours of pupil instruction required under section 101(3). The result of this calculation must not exceed the amount per membership pupil otherwise calculated under this subsection. (7) For pupils in membership, other than special education pupils, in a community district, the allocation calculated under this section is an amount per membership pupil other than special education pupils in the community district equal to the foundation allowance of the qualifying school district, as described in section 12b of the revised school code, MCL 380.12b, that is located within the same geographic area as the community district. (8) Subject to subsection (4), for a district that is formed or reconfigured after June 1, 2002 by consolidation of 2 or more districts or by annexation, the resulting districtâs foundation allowance under this section beginning after the effective date of the consolidation or annexation is the lesser of the sum of the average of the foundation allowances of each of the original or affected districts, calculated as provided in this section, weighted as to the percentage of pupils in total membership in the resulting district who reside in the geographic area of each of the original or affected districts plus $100.00 or the highest foundation allowance among the original or affected districts. This subsection does not apply to a receiving district unless there is a subsequent consolidation or annexation that affects the district. The calculation under this subsection must take into account a districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m. (9) The department shall round each fraction used in making calculations under this section to the fourth decimal place and shall round the dollar amount of an increase in the target foundation allowance to the nearest whole dollar. (10) State payments related to payment of the foundation allowance for a special education pupil are not calculated under this section but are instead calculated under section 51e. (11) To assist the legislature in determining the target foundation allowance for the subsequent fiscal year, each revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b, must calculate a pupil membership factor, a revenue adjustment factor, and an index as follows: (a) The pupil membership factor is computed by dividing the estimated membership in the school year ending in the current fiscal year, excluding intermediate district membership, by the estimated membership for the school year ending in the subsequent fiscal year, excluding intermediate district membership. If a consensus membership factor is not determined at the revenue estimating conference, the principals of the revenue estimating conference shall report their estimates to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid appropriations not later than 7 days after the conclusion of the revenue conference. (b) The revenue adjustment factor is computed by dividing the sum of the estimated total state school aid fund revenue for the subsequent fiscal year plus the estimated total state school aid fund revenue for the current fiscal year, adjusted for any change in the rate or base of a tax the proceeds of which are deposited in that fund and excluding money transferred into that fund from the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund under the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, by the sum of the estimated total school aid fund revenue for the current fiscal year plus the estimated total state school aid fund revenue for the immediately preceding fiscal year, adjusted for any change in the rate or base of a tax the proceeds of which are deposited in that fund. If a consensus revenue factor is not determined at the revenue estimating conference, the principals of the revenue estimating conference shall report their estimates to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid appropriations not later than 7 days after the conclusion of the revenue conference. (c) The index is calculated by multiplying the pupil membership factor by the revenue adjustment factor. If a consensus index is not determined at the revenue estimating conference, the principals of the revenue estimating conference shall report their estimates to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for state school aid appropriations not later than 7 days after the conclusion of the revenue conference. (12) Payments to districts and public school academies are not made under this section. Rather, the calculations under this section are used to determine the amount of state payments under section 22b. (13) If an amendment to section 2 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963 allowing state aid to some or all nonpublic schools is approved by the voters of this state, each foundation allowance or per-pupil payment calculation under this section may be reduced. (14) As used in this section: (a) âCertified millsâ means the lesser of 18 mills or the number of mills of school operating taxes levied by the district in 1993-94. (b) âCurrent fiscal yearâ means the fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (c) âDissolved districtâ means a district that loses its organization, has its territory attached to 1 or more other districts, and is dissolved as provided under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (d) âImmediately preceding fiscal yearâ means the fiscal year immediately preceding the current fiscal year. (e) âLocal portion of the districtâs foundation allowanceâ means an amount that is equal to the difference between (the sum of the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of all property in the district that is nonexempt property times the districtâs certified mills and, for a district with certified mills exceeding 12, the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the district that is commercial personal property times the certified mills minus 12 mills) and (the quotient of the product of the captured assessed valuation under tax increment financing acts times the districtâs certified mills divided by the districtâs membership excluding special education pupils). (f) âMembershipâ means the definition of that term under section 6 as in effect for the particular fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (g) âNonexempt propertyâ means property that is not a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, or property occupied by a public school academy. (h) âPrincipal residenceâ, âqualified agricultural propertyâ, âqualified forest propertyâ, âsupportive housing propertyâ, âindustrial personal propertyâ, and âcommercial personal propertyâ mean those terms as defined in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. (i) âReceiving districtâ means a district to which all or part of the territory of a dissolved district is attached under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (j) âSchool operating purposesâ means the purposes included in the operation costs of the district as prescribed in sections 7 and 18 and purposes authorized under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. (k) âSchool operating taxesâ means local ad valorem property taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, and retained for school operating purposes. (l) âTax increment financing actsâ means parts 2, 3, 4, and 6 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4201 to 125.4420 and 125.4602 to 125.4629, or the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. (m) âTaxable value per membership pupilâ means taxable value, as certified by the county treasurer and reported to the department, for the calendar year ending in the current state fiscal year divided by the districtâs membership excluding special education pupils for the school year ending in the current state fiscal year. Sec. 20d. In making the final determination required under former section 20a of a districtâs combined state and local revenue per membership pupil in 1993-94 and in making calculations under section 20 for 2026-2027, the department and the department of treasury shall comply with all of the following: (a) For a district that had combined state and local revenue per membership pupil in the 1994-95 fiscal year of $6,500.00 or more and served as a fiscal agent for a state board designated area vocational education center in the 1993-94 school year, total state school aid received by or paid on behalf of the district under this act in 1993‑94 excludes payments made under former section 146 and under section 147 on behalf of the districtâs employees who provided direct services to the area vocational education center. Not later than June 30, 1996, the department shall make an adjustment under this subdivision to the districtâs combined state and local revenue per membership pupil in the 1994-95 fiscal year and the department of treasury shall make a final certification of the number of mills that may be levied by the district under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, as a result of the adjustment under this subdivision. (b) If a district had an adjustment made to its 1993-94 total state school aid that excluded payments made under former section 146 and under section 147 on behalf of the districtâs employees who provided direct services for intermediate district center programs operated by the district under former section 51 and sections 51a to 56, if nonresident pupils attending the center programs were included in the districtâs membership for purposes of calculating the combined state and local revenue per membership pupil for 1993-94, and if there is a signed agreement by all constituent districts of the intermediate district agreeing to an adjustment under this subdivision, the department shall calculate the foundation allowances for 1995-96 and 1996-97 of all districts that had pupils attending the intermediate district center program operated by the district that had the adjustment as if their combined state and local revenue per membership pupil for 1993-94 included resident pupils attending the center program and excluded nonresident pupils attending the center program. Sec. 21b. (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3), a district shall use funds received under this section, section 22a, or section 22b to support the attendance of a district pupil who is an eligible student at an eligible postsecondary institution under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, or under the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1901 to 388.1913, by paying eligible charges on behalf of the district pupil as required under those acts. (2) A district is not required to pay transportation costs, parking costs, or activity fees on behalf of an eligible student for attendance at an eligible postsecondary institution as described in subsection (1). (3) A district may pay more money to an eligible postsecondary institution on behalf of an eligible student than required under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, or the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1901 to 388.1913, and may use local school operating revenue for that purpose. An eligible student is responsible for payment of the remainder of the costs associated with the eligible studentâs postsecondary enrollment that exceed the amount the district is required to pay under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, or the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1901 to 388.1913, and that are not paid by the district. As used in this subsection, âlocal school operating revenueâ means that term as defined in section 22b. (4) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $40,000,000.00 for reimbursements to eligible districts supporting eligible charges on behalf of eligible students as described in subsection (1). All of the following apply to payments made under this subsection: (a) To be considered an eligible district under this section, a district must be assigned to an opportunity index band, as described in section 6(21), of 4 or higher. (b) Payments must not exceed the amount the eligible district is required to pay under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, and the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1901 to 388.1913. (c) If the amount allocated in this subsection is not sufficient to fully reimburse all eligible districts, payments to eligible districts must be adjusted as follows: (i) Payments to any individual district that exceed 25% of the allocation under this subsection must be reduced to an amount equal to 25% of the allocation under this subsection. (ii) If, after the operation of subparagraph (i), the amount allocated under this subsection is still insufficient to fully reimburse all eligible districts, the payment to each eligible district must be prorated on an equal percentage basis. (d) If the amount allocated in this subsection exceeds the amount necessary to fully reimburse all eligible districts, the department shall provide payments to districts assigned to an opportunity index band, as described in section 6(21), of 3. If the remaining funds are insufficient to fully fund all eligible districts described in this subdivision, the payment to each eligible district described in this subdivision must be prorated on an equal percentage basis. (e) If, after the operation of subdivision (d), the amount allocated in this subsection exceeds the amount necessary to fully reimburse all eligible districts, the department shall provide payments to districts assigned to an opportunity index band, as described in section 6(21), of 2. If the remaining funds are insufficient to fully fund all eligible districts described in this subdivision, the payment to each eligible district described in this subdivision must be prorated on an equal percentage basis. (f) If, after the operation of subdivision (e), the amount allocated in this subsection exceeds the amount necessary to fully reimburse all eligible districts, the department shall provide payments to districts assigned to an opportunity index band, as described in section 6(21), of 1. If the remaining funds are insufficient to fully fund all eligible districts described in this subdivision, the payment to each eligible district described in this subdivision must be prorated on an equal percentage basis. (g) Funds under this section may be used to support CTE dual enrollment programs authorized under section 61b. (h) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department. (5) As used in this section, âeligible chargesâ, âeligible studentâ, and âeligible postsecondary institutionâ mean those terms as defined in section 3 of the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, or in section 3 of the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1903, as applicable. Sec. 21f. (1) A primary district shall enroll an eligible pupil in virtual courses in accordance with the provisions of this section. A primary district shall not offer a virtual course to an eligible pupil unless the virtual course is published in the primary districtâs catalog of board-approved courses or in the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University pursuant to section 98. The primary district shall also provide on its publicly accessible website a link to the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University. Unless the pupil is at least age 18 or is an emancipated minor, a pupil must not be enrolled in a course that meets virtually for more than 6 days in a school year without the consent of the pupilâs parent or legal guardian. (2) Subject to subsection (3), a primary district shall enroll an eligible pupil in up to 2 virtual courses as requested by the pupil during an academic term, semester, or trimester. (3) A pupil may be enrolled in more than 2 virtual courses in a specific academic term, semester, or trimester if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The primary district has determined that it is in the best interest of the pupil. (b) The pupil agrees with the recommendation of the primary district. (4) If the number of applicants eligible for acceptance in a virtual course does not exceed the capacity of the provider to provide the virtual course, the provider shall accept for enrollment all of the applicants eligible for acceptance. If the number of applicants exceeds the providerâs capacity to provide the virtual course, the provider shall use a random draw system, subject to the need to abide by state and federal antidiscrimination laws and court orders. A primary district that is also a provider shall determine whether or not it has the capacity to accept applications for enrollment from nonresident applicants in virtual courses and may use that limit as the reason for refusal to enroll a nonresident applicant. (5) A primary district may not establish additional requirements beyond those specified in this subsection that would prohibit a pupil from taking a virtual course. A pupilâs primary district may deny the pupil enrollment in a virtual course if any of the following apply, as determined by the district: (a) The pupil is enrolled in any of grades K to 5. (b) The pupil has previously gained the credits that would be provided from the completion of the virtual course. (c) The virtual course is not capable of generating academic credit. (d) The virtual course is inconsistent with the remaining graduation requirements or career interests of the pupil. (e) The pupil has not completed the prerequisite coursework for the requested virtual course or has not demonstrated proficiency in the prerequisite course content. (f) The pupil has failed a previous virtual course in the same subject during the 2 most recent academic years. (g) The virtual course is of insufficient quality or rigor. A primary district that denies a pupil enrollment request for this reason shall enroll the pupil in a virtual course in the same or a similar subject that the primary district determines is of acceptable rigor and quality. (h) The cost of the virtual course exceeds the amount identified in subsection (10), unless the pupil or the pupilâs parent or legal guardian agrees to pay the cost that exceeds this amount. (i) The request for a virtual course enrollment did not occur within the same timelines established by the primary district for enrollment and schedule changes for regular courses. (j) The request for a virtual course enrollment was not made in the academic term, semester, trimester, or summer preceding the enrollment. This subdivision does not apply to a request made by a pupil who is newly enrolled in the primary district. (6) If a pupil is denied enrollment in a virtual course by the pupilâs primary district, the primary district shall provide written notification to the pupil of the denial, the reason or reasons for the denial under subsection (5), and a description of the appeal process. The pupil may appeal the denial by submitting a letter to the superintendent of the intermediate district in which the pupilâs primary district is located. The letter of appeal must include the reason provided by the primary district for not enrolling the pupil and the reason why the pupil is claiming that the enrollment should be approved. The intermediate district superintendent or designee shall respond to the appeal within 5 days after it is received. If the intermediate district superintendent or designee determines that the denial of enrollment does not meet 1 or more of the reasons specified in subsection (5), the primary district shall enroll the pupil in the virtual course. (7) To provide a virtual course to an eligible pupil under this section, a provider must do all of the following: (a) Ensure that the virtual course has been published in the pupilâs primary districtâs catalog of board-approved courses or published in the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University. (b) Assign to each pupil a teacher of record and provide the primary district with the personnel identification code assigned by the center for the teacher of record. If the provider is a community college, the virtual course must be taught by an instructor employed by or contracted through the providing community college. (c) Offer the virtual course on an open entry and exit method, or aligned to a semester, trimester, or accelerated academic term format. (d) If the virtual course is offered to eligible pupils in more than 1 district, the following additional requirements must also be met: (i) Provide the Michigan Virtual University with a course syllabus that meets the definition under subsection (14)(g) in a form and manner prescribed by the Michigan Virtual University for inclusion in a statewide catalog of virtual courses. (ii) Not later than October 1 of each fiscal year, provide the Michigan Virtual University with an aggregated count of enrollments for each virtual course the provider delivered to pupils under this section during the immediately preceding school year, and the number of enrollments in which the pupil earned 60% or more of the total course points for each virtual course. (8) To provide a virtual course under this section, a community college shall ensure that each virtual course it provides under this section generates postsecondary credit. (9) For any virtual course a pupil enrolls in under this section, the pupilâs primary district must assign to the pupil a mentor and shall supply the provider with the mentorâs contact information. (10) For a pupil enrolled in 1 or more virtual courses, the primary district shall use foundation allowance or per-pupil funds calculated under section 20 to pay for the expenses associated with the virtual course or courses. A primary district is not required to pay toward the cost of a virtual course an amount that exceeds 6.67% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year as calculated under section 20. (11) A virtual learning pupil has the same rights and access to technology in the pupilâs primary districtâs school facilities as all other pupils enrolled in the pupilâs primary district. The department shall establish standards for hardware, software, and internet access for pupils who are enrolled in more than 2 virtual courses under this section in an academic term, semester, or trimester taken at a location other than a school facility. (12) If a pupil successfully completes a virtual course, as determined by the pupilâs primary district, the pupilâs primary district shall grant appropriate academic credit for completion of the course and shall count that credit toward completion of graduation and subject area requirements. A pupilâs school record and transcript must identify the virtual course title as it appears in the virtual course syllabus. (13) The enrollment of a pupil in 1 or more virtual courses must not result in a pupil being counted as more than 1.0 full-time equivalent pupils under this article. The minimum requirements to count the pupil in membership are those established by the pupil accounting manual as it was in effect for the 2015-2016 school year or as subsequently amended by the department if the department notifies the legislature about the proposed amendment at least 60 days before the amendment becomes effective. (14) Subject to the requirements of this subsection, a district may provide virtual instruction under this subsection for not more than 6 days in a school year. If a district plans to provide instruction under this subsection, the districtâs plan must be approved by the board of the district, and the district must provide notice of the plan to impacted pupils and their parents or legal guardians before enactment of the plan. Instruction may be provided synchronously or asynchronously, as determined by the department. Days of instruction under this subsection may be used only for the following purposes, as defined by the department: (a) A maximum of 3 days may be designated as testing days, during which students are released from regular classroom instruction to participate in state or federally mandated assessments. Days of virtual instruction provided under this subdivision are limited to buildings and grade levels impacted by assessments. (b) A maximum of 3 days of virtual instruction may be provided due to conditions not within control of the district, including, but not limited to, closures due to snow, ice, or other extreme weather events or unforeseen emergencies. Days of virtual instruction under this subdivision may be used only after a district has exhausted all emergency closure days permitted under section 101. (15) As used in this section: (a) âInstructorâ means an individual who is employed by or contracted through a community college. (b) âMentorâ means a professional employee of the primary district who monitors the pupilâs progress, ensures the pupil has access to needed technology, is available for assistance, and ensures access to the teacher of record. A mentor may also serve as the teacher of record if the primary district is the provider for the virtual course and the mentor meets the requirements under subdivision (e). (c) âPrimary districtâ means the district that enrolls the pupil and reports the pupil for pupil membership purposes. (d) âProviderâ means the district, intermediate district, community college, or other third-party vendor that the primary district pays to provide the virtual course or the Michigan Virtual University if it is providing the virtual course. (e) âTeacher of recordâ means a teacher who meets all of the following: (i) Is appropriately placed under a valid Michigan teaching certificate or a teaching permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department. As used in this subparagraph, âappropriately placedâ means holding a valid Michigan educator credential with the required grade range and discipline or subject area for the assignment, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction. (ii) Is responsible for providing instruction, determining instructional methods for each pupil, diagnosing learning needs, assessing pupil learning, prescribing intervention strategies and modifying lessons, reporting outcomes, and evaluating the effects of instruction and support strategies. (iii) Has a personnel identification code provided by the center. (iv) If the provider is a community college, is an instructor employed by or contracted through the providing community college. (f) âVirtual courseâ means a course of study that is capable of generating a credit or a grade and that is provided in an interactive learning environment where any portion of the curriculum is delivered using the internet and in which pupils may be separated from their instructor or teacher of record by time or location, or both. (g) âVirtual course syllabusâ means a document that includes all of the following: (i) An alignment document detailing how the course meets applicable state standards or, if the state does not have state standards, nationally recognized standards. (ii) The virtual course content outline. (iii) The virtual course required assessments. (iv) The virtual course prerequisites. (v) Expectations for actual instructor or teacher of record contact time with the virtual learning pupil and other communications between a pupil and the instructor or teacher of record. (vi) Academic support available to the virtual learning pupil. (vii) The virtual course learning outcomes and objectives. (viii) The name of the institution or organization providing the virtual content. (ix) The name of the institution or organization providing the instructor or teacher of record. (x) The course titles assigned by the provider and the course titles and course codes from the National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) school codes for the exchange of data (SCED). (xi) The number of eligible pupils that will be accepted by the provider in the virtual course. A primary district that is also the provider may limit the enrollment to those pupils enrolled in the primary district. (xii) The results of the virtual course quality review using the guidelines and model review process published by the Michigan Virtual University. (h) âVirtual learning pupilâ means a pupil enrolled in 1 or more virtual courses. Sec. 21h. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $6,137,400.00 for 2026-2027 for assisting districts assigned by the superintendent to participate in a partnership district agreement to improve student achievement and district financial stability. It is the intent of the legislature that the appropriation in this section will be funded with state school aid pupil support reserve fund money through 2027-2028. The superintendent shall identify any conditions that may be contributing to low academic performance within a district being considered for assignment to a partnership district agreement. The purpose of the partnership district agreement is to identify district needs, develop intervention plans, and partner with public, private, and nonprofit organizations to coordinate resources and improve student achievement. Assignment of a district to a partnership district agreement is made by the superintendent. (2) A district described in subsection (1) is eligible for funding under this section if the district includes at least 1 school that has been identified as low performing under the approved federal accountability system. A district described in this subsection must do all of the following to be eligible for funding under this section: (a) Within 90 days of assignment to the partnership district agreement described in this section, complete a comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation in collaboration with an intermediate district, community members, education organizations, and postsecondary institutions, as applicable, that is approved by the superintendent. The comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation must include at least all of the following: (i) A review of the districtâs implementation and utilization of a multi-tiered system of supports to ensure that it is used to appropriately inform instruction. (ii) A review of the district and school building leadership and educator capacity to substantially improve student outcomes. (iii) A review of classroom, instructional, and operational practices and curriculum to ensure alignment with research-based instructional practices and state curriculum standards. (b) Develop a district continuous improvement plan that has been approved by the superintendent and that addresses the needs identified in the comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation completed under subdivision (a). The district continuous improvement plan must include at least all of the following: (i) Specific actions that will be taken by the district and each of its partners to improve student achievement. (ii) Specific measurable benchmarks that will be met within 18 months to improve student achievement and identification of expected student achievement outcomes to be attained within 3 years after assignment to the partnership. (iii) Measurable benchmarks that put pupils on track to meet or exceed grade level proficiency, increase high school graduation rates, reduce class sizes in grades K to 3, and improve attendance rates. (c) Provide access to training for district leadership, including, but not limited to, the superintendent or chief administrator and school board or board of directors members, on areas of education fiscal and policy matters. The department may require training for district leadership and all board members under this subdivision at a rate and frequency needed to support measurable academic outcomes for the district. (3) Upon approval of the district continuous improvement plan developed under subsection (2), the department shall assign a team of individuals with expertise in comprehensive school and district reform to partner with the district, the intermediate district, community organizations, education organizations, and postsecondary institutions identified in the district continuous improvement plan to review the districtâs use of existing financial resources to ensure that those resources are being used as efficiently and effectively as possible to improve student academic achievement and to ensure district financial stability. The superintendent of public instruction may waive burdensome administrative rules for a partnership district for the duration of the partnership district agreement. (4) Funds allocated under this section, excluding funds allocated under subsection (5), may be used to pay for district expenditures approved by the superintendent to improve student achievement. Funds may be used for professional development for teachers or district or school leadership, increased instructional time, teacher mentors, literacy, numeracy, reducing K-3 class sizes, reducing chronic absenteeism, or other expenditures that directly impact student achievement and cannot be paid from existing district financial resources. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to districts under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (5) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $137,400.00 for the purchase of a data analytics tool to be used by districts described in subsection (1). The superintendent of public instruction shall require districts described in subsection (1) to purchase a data analytics tool funded under this subsection as part of the agreements described in this section. (6) The department shall annually report to the legislature on the activities funded under this section and how those activities impacted student achievement in districts that received funds under this section. To the extent possible, participating districts receiving funding under this section shall participate in the report. Sec. 22a. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,726,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,562,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to districts and qualifying public school academies to guarantee each district and qualifying public school academy an amount equal to its 1994-95 total state and local per-pupil revenue for school operating purposes under section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Pursuant to section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, this guarantee does not apply to a district in a year in which the district levies a millage rate for school district operating purposes less than it levied in 1994. However, subsection (2) applies to calculating the payments under this section. Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under sections 22b and 51c to fully fund those allocations for the same fiscal year. (2) To ensure that a district receives an amount equal to the districtâs 1994-95 total state and local per-pupil revenue for school operating purposes, there is allocated to each district a state portion of the districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance in an amount calculated as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state portion of a districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance is an amount equal to the districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance or $6,500.00, whichever is less, minus the difference between the sum of the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of all property in the district that is nonexempt property times the districtâs certified mills and, for a district with certified mills exceeding 12, the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the district that is commercial personal property times the certified mills minus 12 mills and the quotient of the ad valorem property tax revenue of the district captured under tax increment financing acts divided by the districtâs membership. For a district that has a millage reduction required under section 31 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, the department shall calculate the state portion of the districtâs foundation allowance as if that reduction did not occur. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, taxable value per membership pupil of all property in the receiving district that is nonexempt property and taxable value per membership pupil of property in the receiving district that is commercial personal property do not include property within the geographic area of the dissolved district; ad valorem property tax revenue of the receiving district captured under tax increment financing acts does not include ad valorem property tax revenue captured within the geographic boundaries of the dissolved district under tax increment financing acts; and certified mills do not include the certified mills of the dissolved district. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, for a community district, the department shall reduce the allocation as otherwise calculated under this section by an amount equal to the amount of local school operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, and the amount of this reduction is offset by the increase in funding under section 22b(2). Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, it is the intent of the legislature that the previous sentence no longer applies and the allocation for a community district under this section shall not be reduced by the amount of local school operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, and no offset is provided by increased funding under section 22b(2). Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, for a qualifying school district that has entered into a qualified debt agreement, all of the following apply: (i) The qualifying school district is presumed to have paid the unpaid obligations of the qualifying school district under the qualified debt agreement and repaid all outstanding operating obligations of the qualifying school district. (ii) Section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, is presumed to no longer apply to the community district. (iii) The qualifying school district is presumed, after payment under subdivision (a), to have remitted to the community district any remaining money in any revenue fund established under the qualified debt agreement. (b) For a district that had a 1994-95 foundation allowance greater than $6,500.00, the state payment under this subsection is the sum of the amount calculated under subdivision (a) plus the amount calculated under this subdivision. The amount calculated under this subdivision must be equal to the difference between the districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance minus $6,500.00 and the current year hold harmless school operating taxes per pupil. If the result of the calculation under subdivision (a) is negative, the negative amount is an offset against any state payment calculated under this subdivision. If the result of a calculation under this subdivision is negative, there is not a state payment or a deduction under this subdivision. The taxable values per membership pupil used in the calculations under this subdivision are as adjusted by ad valorem property tax revenue captured under tax increment financing acts divided by the districtâs membership. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, ad valorem property tax revenue captured under tax increment financing acts do not include ad valorem property tax revenue captured within the geographic boundaries of the dissolved district under tax increment financing acts. (3) For pupils in membership in a qualifying public school academy, there is allocated under this section to the authorizing body that is the fiscal agent for the qualifying public school academy for forwarding to the qualifying public school academy an amount equal to the 1994-95 per-pupil payment to the qualifying public school academy under section 20. (4) A district or qualifying public school academy may use funds allocated under this section in conjunction with any federal funds for which the district or qualifying public school academy otherwise would be eligible. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for a district that is formed or reconfigured after June 1, 2000 by consolidation of 2 or more districts or by annexation, the resulting districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance under this section beginning after the effective date of the consolidation or annexation is the average of the 1994‑95 foundation allowances of each of the original or affected districts, calculated as provided in this section, weighted as to the percentage of pupils in total membership in the resulting district in the fiscal year in which the consolidation takes place who reside in the geographic area of each of the original districts. If an affected districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance is less than the 1994-95 basic foundation allowance, the amount of that districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance is considered for the purpose of calculations under this subsection to be equal to the amount of the 1994-95 basic foundation allowance. This subsection does not apply to a receiving district unless there is a subsequent consolidation or annexation that affects the district. (6) As used in this section: (a) â1994-95 foundation allowanceâ means a districtâs 1994-95 foundation allowance calculated and certified by the department of treasury or the superintendent under former section 20a as enacted in 1993 PA 336 and as amended by 1994 PA 283. (b) âCertified millsâ means the lesser of 18 mills or the number of mills of school operating taxes levied by the district in 1993-94. (c) âCurrent fiscal yearâ means the fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (d) âCurrent year hold harmless school operating taxes per pupilâ means the per-pupil revenue generated by multiplying a districtâs 1994-95 hold harmless millage by the districtâs current year taxable value per membership pupil. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, taxable value per membership pupil does not include the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (e) âDissolved districtâ means a district that loses its organization, has its territory attached to 1 or more other districts, and is dissolved as provided under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (f) âHold harmless millageâ means, for a district with a 1994-95 foundation allowance greater than $6,500.00, the number of mills by which the exemption from the levy of school operating taxes on a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, and property occupied by a public school academy could be reduced as provided in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, and the number of mills of school operating taxes that could be levied on all property as provided in section 1211(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, as certified by the department of treasury for the 1994 tax year. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, school operating taxes do not include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (g) âMembershipâ means the definition of that term under section 6 as in effect for the particular fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (h) âMichigan finance authorityâ means the public body corporate and politic created within the department of treasury by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2010-2, MCL 12.194. (i) âNonexempt propertyâ means property that is not a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, or property occupied by a public school academy. (j) âObligationsâ means that term as defined in a qualified debt agreement. (k) âPrincipal residenceâ, âqualified agricultural propertyâ, âqualified forest propertyâ, âsupportive housing propertyâ, âindustrial personal propertyâ, and âcommercial personal propertyâ mean those terms as defined in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. (l) âQualified debt agreementâ means a master debt indenture settlement agreement between a qualifying school district and 1 or more other parties, including without limitation, the state treasurer and the Michigan finance authority. (m) âQualifying public school academyâ means a public school academy that was in operation in the 1994-95 school year and is in operation in the current fiscal year. (n) âQualifying school districtâ means a school district described in section 12b of the revised school code, MCL 380.12b. (o) âReceiving districtâ means a district to which all or part of the territory of a dissolved district is attached under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (p) âSchool operating taxesâ means local ad valorem property taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, and retained for school operating purposes as defined in section 20. (q) âTax increment financing actsâ means parts 2, 3, 4, and 6 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4201 to 125.4420 and 125.4602 to 125.4629, or the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. (r) âTaxable value per membership pupilâ means each of the following divided by the districtâs membership: (i) For the number of mills by which the exemption from the levy of school operating taxes on a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, and property occupied by a public school academy may be reduced as provided in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, the taxable value of principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, and property occupied by a public school academy for the calendar year ending in the current fiscal year. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, mills do not include mills within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (ii) For the number of mills of school operating taxes that may be levied on all property as provided in section 1211(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, the taxable value of all property for the calendar year ending in the current fiscal year. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, school operating taxes do not include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of the dissolved district. Sec. 22b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for discretionary nonmandated payments to districts under this section, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $6,783,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $6,914,450,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in section 11, and there is additionally allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $56,100,000.00 from the state school aid fund appropriation in section 11. In addition, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $124,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund appropriation in section 11, and there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $130,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund appropriation in section 11. Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under sections 22a and 51c to fully fund those allocations for the same fiscal year. (2) Subject to subsection (4) and section 296, the allocation to a district under subsection (1) is an amount equal to the sum of the amounts calculated under sections 20, 20m, 51a(2), 51a(3), 51a(11), and 51e, minus the sum of the allocations to the district under sections 22a and 51c. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for a community district, the allocation as otherwise calculated under this section is increased by an amount equal to the amount of local school operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, to offset the absence of local school operating revenue in a community district in the funding of the state portion of the foundation allowance under section 20(4). Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, it is the intent of the legislature that the previous sentence no longer applies. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, for a qualifying school district that has entered into a qualifying debt agreement, all of the following apply: (a) The qualifying school district is presumed to have paid the unpaid obligations of the qualifying school district under the qualified debt agreement and repaid all outstanding operating obligations of the qualifying school district. (b) Section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, is presumed to no longer apply to the community district. (c) The qualifying school district is presumed, after payment under subdivision (a), to have remitted to the community district any remaining money in any revenue fund established under the qualified debt agreement. (3) To receive an allocation under this section, each district must do all of the following: (a) Comply with section 1280b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280b. (b) Comply with sections 1278a and 1278b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1278a and 380.1278b. (c) Furnish data and other information required by state and federal law to the center and the department in the form and manner specified by the center or the department, as applicable. (d) Comply with section 1230g of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230g. (e) Comply with section 21f. (f) For a district that has entered into a partnership district agreement with the department, comply with section 22p. (g) Comply with 1 of the following, as applicable: (i) If Senate Bill No. 903 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law, section 1280h of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280h. (ii) If subparagraph (i) does not apply, section 164m. (h) Comply with section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, if a district is not using a curriculum from the departmentâs evidence-based curriculum list required under section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f, the district must provide a notification to all parents or legal guardians of students in grades K to 5 receiving instruction with that curriculum that includes all of the following: (i) A statement informing parents or legal guardians that the curriculum used by the district is not evidence-based or not aligned to state standards, which could negatively impact student academic outcomes. (ii) A statement explaining why the district is not using a curriculum that is evidence-based or aligned to state standards. (iii) A plan, including a projected timeline, for when a new curriculum will be adopted that is evidence-based and aligned to state standards. (4) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), and subject to subsection (3) and section 296, from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $1,627,665,100.00 for a weighted foundation payment to districts in an amount equal to the target foundation allowance multiplied by the weighted pupil membership for the district. (5) Districts are encouraged to use funds allocated under this section for the purchase and support of payroll, human resources, and other business function software that is compatible with that of the intermediate district in which the district is located and with other districts located within that intermediate district. (6) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this state related to commercial or industrial property tax appeals, including, but not limited to, appeals of classification, that impact revenues dedicated to the state school aid fund. (7) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this state associated with lawsuits filed by 1 or more districts or intermediate districts against this state. If the allocation under this section is insufficient to fully fund all payments required under this section, the payments under this subsection must be made in full before any proration of remaining payments under this section. (8) It is the intent of the legislature that all constitutional obligations of this state have been fully funded under sections 22a, 31d, 51a, 51c, 51e, and 152a. If a claim is made by an entity receiving funds under this article that challenges the legislative determination of the adequacy of this funding or alleges that there exists an unfunded constitutional requirement, the state budget director may escrow or allocate from the discretionary funds for nonmandated payments under this section the amount as may be necessary to satisfy the claim before making any payments to districts under subsection (2). If funds are escrowed, the escrowed funds are a work project appropriation and the funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The purpose of the work project is to provide for any payments that may be awarded to districts as a result of litigation. The work project is completed upon resolution of the litigation. (9) If the local claims review board or a court of competent jurisdiction makes a final determination that this state is in violation of section 29 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 regarding state payments to districts, the state budget director shall use work project funds under subsection (8) or allocate from the discretionary funds for nonmandated payments under this section the amount as may be necessary to satisfy the amount owed to districts before making any payments to districts under subsection (2). (10) If a claim is made in court that challenges the legislative determination of the adequacy of funding for this stateâs constitutional obligations or alleges that there exists an unfunded constitutional requirement, any interested party may seek an expedited review of the claim by the local claims review board. If the claim exceeds $10,000,000.00, this state may remove the action to the court of appeals, and the court of appeals has and shall exercise jurisdiction over the claim. (11) If payments resulting from a final determination by the local claims review board or a court of competent jurisdiction that there has been a violation of section 29 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 exceed the amount allocated for discretionary nonmandated payments under this section, the legislature shall provide for adequate funding for this stateâs constitutional obligations at its next legislative session. (12) If a lawsuit challenging payments made to districts related to costs reimbursed by federal title XIX Medicaid funds is filed against this state, then, for the purpose of addressing potential liability under such a lawsuit, the state budget director may place funds allocated under this section in escrow or allocate money from the funds otherwise allocated under this section, up to a maximum of 50% of the amount allocated in subsection (1). If funds are placed in escrow under this subsection, those funds are a work project appropriation and the funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The purpose of the work project is to provide for any payments that may be awarded to districts as a result of the litigation. The work project is completed upon resolution of the litigation. In addition, this state reserves the right to terminate future federal title XIX Medicaid reimbursement payments to districts if the amount or allocation of reimbursed funds is challenged in the lawsuit. As used in this subsection, âtitle XIXâ means title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-6. (13) As used in this section: (a) âDissolved districtâ means that term as defined in section 20. (b) âLocal school operating revenueâ means school operating taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, local school operating revenue does not include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (c) âMichigan finance authorityâ means the public body corporate and politic created within the department of treasury by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2010-2, MCL 12.194. (d) âObligationsâ means that term as defined in a qualified debt agreement. (e) âQualified debt agreementâ means a master debt indenture settlement agreement between a qualifying school district and 1 or more other parties, including without limitation, the state treasurer and the Michigan finance authority. (f) âQualifying school districtâ means a school district described in section 12b of the revised school code, MCL 380.12b. (g) âReceiving districtâ and âschool operating taxesâ mean those terms as defined in section 20. Sec. 22d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, an amount not to exceed $14,184,400.00 is allocated for 2026-2027 for supplemental payments to rural districts under this section. (2) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $4,304,100.00 for payments under this subsection to eligible districts. A district that meets all of the following is an eligible district under this subsection: (a) Operates grades K to 12. (b) Has fewer than 250 pupils in membership. (c) Each school building operated by the district meets at least 1 of the following: (i) Is located in the Upper Peninsula at least 30 miles from any other public school building. (ii) Is located on an island that is not accessible by bridge. (3) The amount of the additional funding to each eligible district under subsection (2) is determined under a spending plan developed as provided in this subsection and approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The spending plan must be developed cooperatively by the intermediate superintendents of each intermediate district in which an eligible district is located. The intermediate superintendents shall review the financial situation of each eligible district, determine the minimum essential financial needs of each eligible district, and develop and agree on a spending plan that distributes the available funding under subsection (2) to the eligible districts based on those financial needs. The intermediate superintendents shall submit the spending plan to the superintendent of public instruction for approval. Upon approval by the superintendent of public instruction, the amounts specified for each eligible district under the spending plan are allocated under subsection (2) and must be paid to the eligible districts in the same manner as payments under section 22b. (4) Subject to subsection (7), from the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $9,269,000.00 for payments under this subsection to districts that have fewer than 10.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, or that have greater than 250 square miles. (5) The funds allocated under subsection (4) are allocated as follows: (a) An amount equal to $7,022,900.00 is allocated to districts with fewer than 8.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, on an equal per-pupil basis. (b) The balance of the funding under subsection (4) is allocated as follows: (i) For districts with at least 8.0 but fewer than 9.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, the allocation is an amount per pupil equal to 75% of the per-pupil amount allocated to districts under subdivision (a). (ii) For districts with at least 9.0 but fewer than 10.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, the allocation is an amount per pupil equal to 50% of the per-pupil amount allocated to districts under subdivision (a). (iii) For districts that have greater than 250 square miles, have at least 10.0 pupils per square mile, and do not receive funding under subsection (2), as determined by the department, the allocation is an amount per pupil equal to 100% of the per-pupil amount allocated to districts under subdivision (a). (c) If the total funding allocated under subdivision (b) is insufficient to fully fund payments as calculated under that subdivision, the department shall prorate payments to districts under subdivision (b) on an equal per-pupil basis. If funding allocated under subdivision (b) remains unallocated after making calculations under that subdivision, the department may provide the remaining unallocated funding on an equal per-pupil basis to districts receiving funding under subdivision (b)(i) and (ii). (6) Subject to subsection (7), from the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $611,300.00 for payments under this subsection to districts where each school building operated by the district is located on an island that is accessible by bridge. (7) A district receiving funds allocated under subsection (2) is not eligible for funding allocated under subsection (4) or (6). A district receiving funds allocated under subsection (6) is not eligible for funding under subsection (2) or (4). Sec. 22l. (1) From the school transportation fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 to districts and intermediate districts for transportation costs. Funding for each district or intermediate district is as follows: (a) The department must assign each district and intermediate district to an octile based on the number of riders per square mile and calculate the median cost per rider for each octile. (b) Funds must be distributed to each district and intermediate district as follows: (i) An initial amount at the lesser of the octileâs median cost per rider or the actual transportation cost per general education rider at the district or intermediate district. (ii) An additional amount for districts and intermediate districts that have outlier costs per rider that are deemed reasonable, as determined by the department. (c) If funds are insufficient to fully fund payments under this section, payments may be prorated on an equal percentage basis. (2) To remain eligible for funding under subsection (1), by not later than December 1 of the current fiscal year, a school district must submit, in a form and manner determined by the department, to their intermediate district, and a public school academy must submit, in a form and manner determined by the department, to the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located, the number of nonpublic school students the district expects to transport as required under section 1321 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1321. Intermediate districts shall submit this information to the department by not later than February 1. (3) The department shall compile the reports provided by intermediate districts under subsection (2) into 1 legislative report. The department shall provide this report not later than March 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director. (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 22m. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $3,500,000.00 for supporting the integration of local data systems into the Michigan data hub network based on common standards and applications that are in compliance with section 19(6). (2) An entity that is the fiscal agent for no more than 5 consortia of intermediate districts that previously received funding from the technology readiness infrastructure grant under former section 22i for the purpose of establishing regional data hubs that are part of the Michigan data hub network is eligible for funding under this section. (3) The center shall work with an advisory committee composed of representatives from intermediate districts within each of the data hub regions to coordinate the activities of the Michigan data hub network. (4) The center, in collaboration with the Michigan data hub network, shall determine the amount of funds distributed under this section to each participating regional data hub within the network, based upon a competitive grant process. The center shall ensure that the entities receiving funding under this section represent geographically diverse areas in this state. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the center. (6) To receive funding under this section, a regional data hub must have a governance model that ensures local control of data, data security, and student privacy issues. The integration of data within each of the regional data hubs must provide for the actionable use of data by districts and intermediate districts through common reports and dashboards and for efficiently providing information to meet state and federal reporting purposes. (7) Participation in a data hub region in the Michigan data hub network under this section is voluntary and is not required. (8) Entities receiving funding under this section shall use the funds for all of the following: (a) Creating an infrastructure that effectively manages the movement of data between data systems used by intermediate districts, districts, and other educational organizations in Michigan based on common data standards to improve student achievement. (b) Utilizing the infrastructure to put in place commonly needed integrations, reducing cost and effort to do that work while increasing data accuracy and usability. (c) Promoting the use of a more common set of applications by promoting systems that integrate with the Michigan data hub network. (d) Promoting 100% district adoption of the Michigan data hub network. (e) Ensuring local control of data, data security, and student data privacy. (f) Utilizing the infrastructure to promote the actionable use of data through common reports and dashboards that are consistent statewide. (g) Creating a governance model to facilitate sustainable operations of the infrastructure in the future, including administration, legal agreements, documentation, staffing, hosting, and funding. (h) Evaluating future data initiatives at all levels to determine whether the initiatives can be enhanced by using the standardized environment in the Michigan data hub network. (9) By not later than January 1 of each fiscal year, the center shall prepare a summary report of information provided by each entity that received funds under this section that includes measurable outcomes based on the objectives described under this section and a summary of compiled data from each entity to provide a means to evaluate the effectiveness of the project. The center shall submit the report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and to the house and senate fiscal agencies. Sec. 22s. (1) The general pupil support reserve fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund to fund programs described in sections 30d, 31aa, and 99h. It is the intent of the legislature that money in the general pupil support reserve fund will be used to support the above programs for 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-2028. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the general pupil support reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the general pupil support reserve fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the general pupil support reserve fund interest and earnings from general pupil support reserve fund investments. (3) Money in the general pupil support reserve fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the general pupil support reserve fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the general pupil support reserve fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money available in the general pupil support reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (6) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 only, $12,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship private provider fund under section 27e is deposited into the general pupil support reserve fund. Sec. 24. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $7,650,000.00 for payments to the educating district or intermediate district for educating pupils assigned by a court or the department of health and human services to reside in or to attend a juvenile detention facility or child caring institution licensed by the department of health and human services and approved by the department to provide an on-grounds education program. The amount of the payment under this section to a district or intermediate district is calculated as prescribed under subsection (2). (2) The department shall allocate the total amount allocated under this section by paying to the educating district or intermediate district an amount equal to the lesser of the districtâs or intermediate districtâs added cost or the departmentâs approved per-pupil allocation for the district or intermediate district. For the purposes of this subsection: (a) âAdded costâ means 100% of the added cost each fiscal year for educating all pupils assigned by a court or the department of health and human services to reside in or to attend a juvenile detention facility or child caring institution licensed by the department of health and human services or the department of licensing and regulatory affairs and approved by the department to provide an on-grounds education program. Added cost is computed by deducting all other revenue received under this article for pupils described in this section from total costs, as approved by the department, in whole or in part, for educating those pupils in the on-grounds education program or in a program approved by the department that is located on property adjacent to a juvenile detention facility or child caring institution. Costs reimbursed by federal funds are not included. (b) âDepartmentâs approved per-pupil allocationâ for a district or intermediate district is determined by dividing the total amount allocated under this section for a fiscal year by the full-time equated membership total for all pupils approved by the department to be funded under this section for that fiscal year for the district or intermediate district. (3) A district or intermediate district educating pupils described in this section at a residential child caring institution may operate, and receive funding under this section for, a department-approved on-grounds educational program for those pupils that is longer than 181 days, but not longer than 233 days, if the child caring institution was licensed as a child caring institution and offered in 1991-92 an on-grounds educational program that was longer than 181 days but not longer than 233 days and that was operated by a district or intermediate district. (4) Special education pupils funded under section 53a are not funded under this section. Sec. 24a. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,355,700.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to intermediate districts for pupils who are placed in juvenile justice service facilities operated by the department of health and human services. The amount of the payment to each intermediate district is an amount equal to the state share of those costs that are clearly and directly attributable to the educational programs for pupils placed in facilities described in this section that are located within the intermediate districtâs boundaries. The intermediate districts receiving payments under this section shall cooperate with the department of health and human services to ensure that all funding allocated under this section is utilized by the intermediate district and department of health and human services for educational programs for pupils described in this section. Pupils described in this section are not eligible to be funded under section 24. However, a program responsibility or other fiscal responsibility associated with these pupils must not be transferred from the department of health and human services to a district or intermediate district unless the district or intermediate district consents to the transfer. Sec. 25f. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to strict discipline academies and qualified districts, as provided under this section. (2) To receive funding under this section, a strict discipline academy or qualified district must first comply with section 25e and use the pupil transfer process described in that section for changes in enrollment as prescribed under that section and apply annually for funding under section 24. (3) The total amount allocated to a strict discipline academy or qualified district under this section is equal to the strict discipline academyâs or qualified districtâs pupil membership in the immediately preceding year multiplied by an amount calculated by dividing the total allocation under this section by the total pupil membership for eligible strict discipline academies and qualified districts in the immediately preceding year. However, the sum of the amounts received by a strict discipline academy or qualified district under this section and under section 24 must not exceed the product of the strict discipline academyâs or qualified districtâs per-pupil allocation calculated under section 20 multiplied by the strict discipline academyâs or qualified districtâs full-time equated membership. The department shall allocate funds to strict discipline academies and qualified districts under this section on a monthly basis. (4) Special education pupils funded under section 53a are not funded under this section. (5) The department shall make payments to strict discipline academies and qualified districts under this section according to the payment schedule under section 17b. (6) For purposes of this section, the pupil membership for the current fiscal year for a qualified district is the actual number of pupils that are in the custody of a county juvenile agency as described in subsection (7)(a). (7) As used in this section: (a) âQualified districtâ means a public school academy that is not a strict discipline academy that enrolls individuals who are in the custody of a county juvenile agency to which both of the following are applicable: (i) The agency had custody of individuals who were enrolled in a strict discipline academy in the 2020-2021 school year. (ii) The strict discipline academy that the individuals described in subparagraph (i) were enrolled in subsequently closed. (b) âStrict discipline academyâ means a public school academy established under sections 1311b to 1311m of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311b to 380.1311m. Sec. 26a. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $14,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 to reimburse districts and intermediate districts under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692, for taxes levied in 2025. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $14,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 to reimburse districts and intermediate districts under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692, for taxes levied in 2026. The department shall pay the allocations by not later than 60 days after the department of treasury certifies to the department and to the state budget director that the department of treasury has received all necessary information to properly determine the amounts due to each eligible recipient. Sec. 26b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $5,549,000.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to districts, intermediate districts, and community college districts for the portion of the payment in lieu of taxes obligation that is attributable to districts, intermediate districts, and community college districts under section 2154 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.2154. (2) If the amount appropriated under this section is insufficient to fully pay obligations under this section, payments are prorated on an equal basis among all eligible districts, intermediate districts, and community college districts. Sec. 26c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $48,300,000.00 for 2026-2027 to the promise zone fund created in subsection (3). The funds allocated under this section reflect the amount of revenue from the collection of the state education tax captured under section 17 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1677. (2) Funds allocated to the promise zone fund under this section must be used solely for payments to eligible districts and intermediate districts, in accordance with section 17 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1677, that have a promise zone development plan approved by the department of treasury under section 7 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1667. Eligible districts and intermediate districts shall use payments made under this section for reimbursement for qualified educational expenses as that term is defined in section 3 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1663. (3) The promise zone fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund to be used solely for the purposes of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1661 to 390.1679. All of the following apply to the promise zone fund: (a) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the promise zone fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the promise zone fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (b) Money in the promise zone fund at the close of a fiscal year remains in the promise zone fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) Subject to subsection (2), the state treasurer may make payments from the promise zone fund to eligible districts and intermediate districts under the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1661 to 390.1679, to be used for the purposes of a promise zone authority created under that act. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 26d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $19,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 and an amount not to exceed $21,800,000.00 for 2026-2027 for reimbursements to intermediate districts as required under section 15b of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2665b. (2) The amounts reimbursed under subsection (1) must be used by the intermediate district only for the purposes for which the property taxes were originally levied. (3) The Michigan strategic fund and the Michigan economic development corporation shall work with the department of treasury in identifying the amount of tax revenues that are to be reimbursed under subsection (1). (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of treasury shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of treasury. Sec. 27a. (1) From the educator fellowship public provider fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00, from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00, and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for the MI future educator fellowship program. The funds allocated under this section must be used to offset tuition costs for individuals who are working toward earning their initial teacher certification. At the close of the fiscal year, money allocated under this section that is unspent must be deposited as follows: (a) For state school aid fund money, into the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d. (b) For general fund money, into the educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e. (2) To establish initial eligibility for an award from funding under this section, an individual must meet all of the following conditions by the date of enrollment described in subdivision (a): (a) Be admitted to an eligible educator preparation program; be working toward a teacher certification; be enrolled in enough coursework to be considered enrolled full-time during the academic year, as determined by the studentâs educator preparation program, or the equivalent of full-time participation for individuals enrolled in an alternative certification program, as defined by the department; and, for students at institutions of higher education, be considered at least a junior-level student, as determined by the institution of higher education. (b) Not have previously earned a teacher certification. (c) Timely complete a grant application in a form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (d) Timely file the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the enrollment period described in subdivision (a). (e) Timely apply for all available gift aid for the enrollment period described in subdivision (a). (f) Agree to repay any funds received from funding under this section if the individual does not maintain enrollment in their educator preparation program, the individual does not successfully complete their educator program, or the individual does not complete the work requirement described in subsection (7). (g) Have a high school or college grade point average of at least 3.0. (h) Be a resident of this state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (3) To establish continuing eligibility for an award under this section at an eligible educator preparation program, an individual must meet all of the following conditions: (a) Maintain full-time continuous enrollment in an eligible educator preparation program, as determined by the educator preparation program, or the equivalent of full-time participation for individuals enrolled in an alternative certification program, as defined by the department, excluding any period of time missed due to a medical or other emergency, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) Maintain satisfactory academic progress, including a grade point average of at least 3.0, in courses provided by the eligible educator preparation program and meet requirements established by the eligible educator preparation program. (c) Participate in relevant academic and career advising programs offered by the eligible educator preparation program. (d) Timely file the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for each academic year in which the individual receives an award from funding under this section. (e) Timely apply for all available gift aid for each academic year in which the individual applies for funding under this section. (f) Maintain residency in this state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (4) An award under this section must not exceed $10,000.00 per academic year or the cost of tuition at the eligible educator preparation program attended, whichever is less. As used in this subsection, the cost of tuition at an educator preparation program that is an institution of higher education is the in-district resident rate plus other required fees, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential; and the cost of tuition at an educator preparation program that is an alternative certification provider is the cost of tuition plus other required fees, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (5) Awards under this section must be distributed to eligible educator preparation programs on behalf of an eligible recipient on a timeline determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (6) Pending available funds, applicants may renew their award for up to 3 years, or until program completion, whichever comes first. (7) To be an eligible recipient of fellowship funding under this section, an individual must pledge to work as a certified teacher in a public school, a nonpublic school, a qualifying public preschool program, or a qualifying nonpublic preschool program in this state and must meet 1 of the following work requirements: (a) For a recipient of funding under this section who received an award for 1 academic year, 3 years of work as a certified teacher in a public school, a nonpublic school, a qualifying public preschool program, or a qualifying nonpublic preschool program in this state. (b) For a recipient of funding under this section who received an award for 2 academic years, 4 years of work as a certified teacher in a public school, a nonpublic school, a qualifying public preschool program, or a qualifying nonpublic preschool program in this state. (c) For a recipient of funding under this section who received an award for 3 academic years, 5 years of work as a certified teacher in a public school, a nonpublic school, a qualifying public preschool program, or a qualifying nonpublic preschool program in this state. (d) For a recipient working in a critical needs district, 3 years of work as a certified teacher. As used in this subdivision, âcritical needs districtâ means a district with a median household income in the lowest quartile in each prosperity region, as determined by the department. (8) If an award recipient does not maintain enrollment in their educator preparation program as required under subsection (3)(a), does not successfully complete their educator preparation program, or does not meet the work requirement described in subsection (7), any amount received from funds under this section converts to a 0% interest loan that must be repaid to this state within 10 years, plus any deferment period as determined and approved by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The amount of repayment must be reduced proportionate to the number of years worked in public schools, nonpublic schools, qualifying public preschool programs, or qualifying nonpublic preschool programs in this state as a certificated teacher out of 5 years. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall develop guidance to enforce this subsection. (9) An individual may not concurrently receive funding through programs funded under this section and programs funded under section 27b. (10) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund awards under this section, there is appropriated from the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d or the educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e, as applicable, the amount necessary to fully fund these programs. The state budget director shall provide notification to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on K to 12 school aid and the house and senate fiscal agencies for any additional appropriation described under this subsection. (11) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (12) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall report to the chairpersons of the house appropriations subcommittee on school aid and education and the senate appropriations subcommittee on pre-K to 12 by February 15 of the current fiscal year. The report must include the following: (a) The number and amount of awards granted in the previous fiscal year. (b) The number of recipients in the previous fiscal year that had their awards converted to loans under subsection (8). (13) As used in this section, âeligible educator preparation programâ means a public or nonpublic institution of higher education or an alternative route provider that meets all of the following, as applicable: (a) Is approved by the department to offer teacher preparation programming. (b) Enrolls 1 or more future educator fellowship recipients. (c) Has not been deemed as ineligible to receive Michigan achievement scholarship funding under section 248 as a result of exceeding tuition restraint requirements described in section 248. (d) Includes, as part of its required educator preparation coursework, pedagogical methods grounded in the science of reading. If an educator preparation program does not include pedagogical methods grounded in the science of reading, the program may maintain eligibility by providing to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential a detailed public plan, in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, to comply with section 1531e of the revised school code, MCL 380.1531e, by not later than September 30, 2027. Sec. 27b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $70,000,000.00 to districts, intermediate districts, and consortia of intermediate districts for grow your own programs and educator development programs as described in this section and subject to subsection (5), and there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $25,000,000.00 to districts, intermediate districts, and consortia of intermediate districts for grow your own programs, educator workforce innovation programs, and educator development and retention programs as described in this section. (2) The department shall establish a competitive grant process to distribute funds under this section. A district, intermediate district, or consortium of intermediate districts must apply for funds in a form and manner prescribed by the department. As part of the application described in this subsection, a district, intermediate district, or consortium of intermediate districts must submit the following information and assurances: (a) Demonstrated need for funding in the district, intermediate district, or consortium of intermediate districts or the broader community, including projected workforce needs, and a proposed spending plan on how the funds will be used that includes, but is not limited to, administrative costs, expected tuition, fees, and books for the program. Funds used for administrative costs must not exceed 10% of funds received through an award under this section. As used in this subdivision, âadministrative costsâ includes only costs associated with teacher recruitment, retention, development, innovation, and evaluation. (b) Number of support staff projected to participate in a program described in this section. (c) The planned activities for programs described in this section. (d) Projected outcomes of programs described in this section, which must include, but are not limited to, the following: (i) Teacher and school leader retention and satisfaction. (ii) Teacher and school leader efficacy. (iii) Anticipated school or district partners, evidenced by signed partnership agreements. (iv) Beginning in 2026-2027, demonstration of addressing projected workforce needs. (e) Assurances that the programs described in this section will be no cost for participants and that participants will be compensated as an employee for the duration of their training, including a paid residency, fellowship, or student teaching. (f) Beginning in 2026-2027, assurances that any educator preparation program partnering with the district, intermediate district, or consortium of intermediate districts to support a grow your own program under this section satisfies at least 1 of the following: (i) Is approved by the department for the preparation of teachers in this state. (ii) Satisfies both of the following: (A) Holds national accreditation from the Council for the Accreditation of Education Preparation or the Association for Advancing Quality in Educator Preparation. (B) Leads to licensure in this state. (3) Recipients of grants under this section must submit performance reports to the department not less than twice per year. Each report must include the following information: (a) The number of program participants served and retention in the program or district. (b) Qualitative and quantitative participant feedback. (c) Evidence of efficacy and progress toward projected outcomes. (4) The department shall ensure that all performance reports required under subsection (3) are made publicly available on the departmentâs website. (5) For 2025-2026 only, grant awards under this section must be structured into 3 tiers, as described in subsections (6), (8), and (11). Beginning in 2026-2027, grant awards under this section must be structured into 4 tiers, as described in subsections (6), (8), (11), and (14), or be used for the purposes described in subsection (17). All programs funded under this section must address a measurable and critical problem related to the health and efficacy of this stateâs education talent working in Michigan schools and be data- and research-driven, demonstrating effectiveness against intended and measurable outcomes. (6) For 2025-2026 only, funding for tier 1 grant awards must not exceed $50,000,000.00, unless otherwise directed by the legislature. In 2025-2026, the department shall allocate at least 1 tier 1 grant of not less than $40,000,000.00. For 2026-2027 only, funding for tier 1 grant awards must not exceed $8,000,000.00. Tier 1 grants must sustain or further scale programs that meet all of the following criteria, as applicable: (a) For 2025-2026 only, have been in operation in this state for at least 5 years, and evaluated for at least 2 years by a rigorous, independent Michigan-based evaluator, and results of the program have been made publicly available. (b) For 2025-2026 only, have at least 2 consecutive years of public financial audits of the program with no material findings. (c) For 2025-2026 only, demonstrate broad geographic reach and investment into teachers and school leaders at every experience level, in partnerships established with not fewer than 15 local education agencies across both urban and rural regions, that extend back to the start of the 2023-2024 school year, bound by written agreements that include data sharing with an independent evaluator for evaluation purposes. (d) For 2025-2026 only, generate private matching funds. (e) For 2026-2027, have been in operation at least 3 years. (f) For 2026-2027, demonstrate a proven track record of success, as evidenced by internal data showing both of the following: (i) High rates of educator retention within the program, the profession, or participating districts after program completion. (ii) Active and ongoing engagement and formal partnership with school districts in each of the stateâs intermediate districts. (g) For 2026-2027, operate as a statewide program, demonstrating the ability to serve a geographically diverse population, including both urban and rural areas. (h) For 2026-2027, have a demonstrated track record of receiving private philanthropic or corporate funding. (7) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated in 2025-2026 for programs described in subsection (6) may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2029. A recipient of funding for a program described in subsection (6) must return any unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department by not later than October 30, 2029. (8) Tier 2 grants must scale or sustain programs that meet all of the following criteria, as applicable: (a) For 2025-2026 only, have been in operation for at least 3 years. (b) For 2025-2026 only, demonstrate promising internal results, but are not yet supported by an independent evaluation. (c) For 2025-2026 only, serve a geographically diverse population, including both urban and rural areas. (d) Have a demonstrated track record of receiving private philanthropic or corporate funding. (e) For 2026-2027, have been in operation for at least 4 years. (f) For 2026-2027, be a Michigan-based nonprofit organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501. (g) For 2026-2027, serve both K to 12 and the early childhood educator pipelines in a geographically diverse population, including both urban and rural areas. (h) For 2026-2027, demonstrate promising internal results and have contracted with a third-party research agency. (i) For 2026-2027, have a demonstrated track record of launching grow your own programs with more than 100 participants in geographically diverse areas of the state. (j) For 2026-2027, have partnered with at least 9 districts and a national nonprofit strategic staffing organization to adopt innovative staffing models, including strategic staffing. (k) For 2026-2027, have led at least 1 program that develops school district talent leaders with national best practices and is degree-granting. (l) For 2026-2027, have partnered with at least 5 of this stateâs educator preparation programs to improve teacher preparation, teacher candidate experience, and outcomes. (9) For 2025-2026 only, grant awards for programs described in subsection (8) must not exceed $12,500,000.00 per year. For 2026-2027 only, funding for tier 2 grant awards must not exceed $8,000,000.00. (10) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated in 2025-2026 for programs described in subsection (8) may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2027. A recipient of funding in 2025-2026 for a program described in subsection (8) must return any unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department by not later than October 30, 2027. (11) Tier 3 grants must scale or sustain programs that meet all of the following criteria, as applicable: (a) For 2025-2026 only, have been in operation for fewer than 2 years. (b) For 2025-2026 only, do not yet have independent evaluation data available. (c) For 2025-2026 only, are limited in scope or geography. (d) For 2025-2026 only, include a documented path to scale or expand the program to serve more educators or additional districts. (e) For 2026-2027, have been in operation for at least 3 years. (f) For 2026-2027, have an independent evaluation partnership with promising results. (g) For 2026-2027, are a regional consortium model led by an intermediate district serving between 97,000 and 103,000 students, partnering with not fewer than 35 districts and a regional educator preparation program approved by the department for the preparation of teachers in this state. (h) For 2026-2027, include a documented path to deepen regional impact or support replication of the program model in additional regions of the state. (12) For 2025-2026 only, grant awards for programs described in subsection (11) must not exceed $5,000,000.00 per year. For 2026-2027 only, funding for tier 3 grant awards must not exceed $3,000,000.00. (13) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated in 2025-2026 for programs described in subsection (11) may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2027. A recipient of funding for a program described in subsection (11) must return any unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department by not later than October 30, 2027. (14) Beginning in 2026-2027, tier 4 grants must fund pilot-stage, early-stage, or small programs that meet both of the following criteria: (a) Do not yet have independent evaluation data available. (b) Are limited in scope or geography. (15) An individual may not concurrently receive funding for programs under this section and programs funded under sections 27a and 27c. (16) From the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1) for 2026-2027, an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 may be awarded by the department for school librarian specialist certification grants. These grants may be awarded to eligible programs that provide a pathway for individuals to receive a school librarian specialist (NQ) endorsement from the department. In awarding grants under this subsection, the department shall prioritize awards for applicants serving in schools that have libraries but do not have staff with a school librarian or equivalent endorsement. (17) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section by not later than December 15, 2026. Sec. 27c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $30,000,000.00 for 2026-2027, from the educator fellowship public provider fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $20,000,000.00 for 2026-2027, and from the educator fellowship private provider fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $7,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for the MI future educator student teacher stipend program. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the funds allocated under this section must be paid to eligible educator preparation programs for payments to eligible student teachers working in a district. At the close of the fiscal year, state school aid fund money allocated under this section that is unspent must be deposited into the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d. (2) An eligible student teacher under this subsection must meet all of the following: (a) The individual must be admitted to an eligible educator preparation program, be working toward a teacher certification, and be participating in required student teaching coursework. As used in this subdivision, ârequired student teaching courseworkâ means credit hours, or the program equivalent, required by an eligible educator preparation program for successful completion of the program. This coursework must include regular placement in a district or nonpublic school where the student gains real-world, first-hand experience working in a classroom, teaching students, engaging in the day-to-day activities of a certified teacher, and working daily under the guidance of a certified teacher. (b) The individual must timely complete an application in a form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The application must include the district or nonpublic school in which the individual is working as a student teacher and must include a certification by the district or nonpublic school and the individualâs eligible educator preparation program that the student is working as a student teacher. If the individualâs eligible educator preparation program is not provided by a public institution of higher education, the district or nonpublic school in which the individual is working must also provide an assurance that they will forward any amount received under this section from the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for purposes of the program described in this section to the individualâs eligible educator preparation program. (c) The individual must not have received a payment from funds under this subsection previously, unless the individual is enrolled in an eligible educator preparation program that requires multiple semesters of student teaching. An individual may receive not more than 2 awards under this section. (d) If an individual is employed by their district or nonpublic school as a teacher of record, they are not eligible for payment under this section. (e) An individual that is a current City Year corps member enrolled in an eligible educator preparation program is eligible for payment under this section. (3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall pay each eligible educator preparation program an amount not to exceed $9,600.00 per academic semester for each eligible student teacher working in a district or nonpublic school. If the individualâs eligible educator preparation program is not provided by a public institution of higher education, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall pay an amount not to exceed $9,600.00 per academic semester to the district or nonpublic school in which the individual is working as a student teacher, and that district or nonpublic school must forward the amount received to the individualâs eligible educator preparation program. It is intended that payments under this subsection are made at the beginning of the semester in 1 lump sum for eligible student teachers. (4) Eligible educator preparation programs shall pay funds received under this section, in entirety, to the eligible student teacher. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (6) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund awards under this section, there is appropriated from the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d and from the educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e the amount necessary to fully fund the programs described in this section. The state budget director shall notify the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on K to 12 school aid and the house and senate fiscal agencies of any additional appropriation described in this subsection. (7) Any funds provided to or on behalf of an individual who is completing the required placement under subsection (2) at a nonpublic school must be paid from the educator fellowship private provider fund created under section 27e. (8) As used in this section, âeligible educator preparation programâ means an institution of higher education that meets all of the following: (a) Is a public or private institution of higher education in this state. (b) Has an established school of education with an educator preparation program approved by the department. (c) Has not been deemed as ineligible to receive Michigan achievement scholarship funding under section 248 as a result of exceeding tuition restraint requirements described in section 248. (d) Includes, as part of its required educator preparation coursework, pedagogical methods grounded in the science of reading. If an educator preparation program does not meet this standard, the program may maintain eligibility by providing to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential a detailed public plan, in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, to comply with section 1531e of the revised school code, MCL 380.1531e, by not later than September 30, 2027. Sec. 27d. (1) The educator fellowship public provider fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund for the purpose of improving the educator workforce through recruitment efforts for students attending public educator preparation programs and through the provision of professional learning as described under section 35a(10). (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the educator fellowship public provider fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the educator fellowship public provider fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the educator fellowship public provider fund interest and earnings from educator fellowship public provider fund investments. (3) Money in the educator fellowship public provider fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the educator fellowship public provider fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the educator fellowship public provider fund for auditing purposes. (5) The department of treasury shall expend money from the educator fellowship public provider fund, upon appropriation, for the purposes described in section 27a for students admitted to public educator preparation programs, for the purposes described in section 27c, and for the purposes described in section 35a(4). Sec. 27j. (1) The student loan repayment assistance reserve fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund interest and earnings from student loan repayment assistance reserve fund investments. (3) Money in the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund at the close of the fiscal year lapses to the state school aid fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money available in the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. Sec. 27l. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $150,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only to districts and intermediate districts in an equal amount per pupil. Subject to subsection (2), a district or intermediate district shall use all of the funding allocated under this subsection to increase compensation for educators in the district or intermediate district. (2) If there are 1 or multiple labor unions representing educators in the district or intermediate district, the district or intermediate district shall bargain any increases in compensation under subsection (1) with those unions. All payments to educators made by districts or intermediate districts with funds allocated under subsection (1) shall be in addition to any existing compensation negotiated in a collective bargaining agreement. (3) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (4) The funds appropriated under this section for payments to educators are 1-time bonus payments. Pursuant to section 3a(3) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1303a, payments under this section are not considered compensation for retirement purposes and are not subject to member or employer contribution requirements under the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system (MPSERS). (5) As used in this section, âEducatorâ includes, but is not limited to, teachers, librarians, speech therapists, language therapists, physical therapists, occupational therapists, school counselors, school social workers, school psychologists, school nurses, paraprofessionals aids, food service workers, custodians, bus drivers, and literacy coaches. Educator also includes any other school employee covered under a collective bargaining agreement. Sec. 27m. (1) Subject to the provisions in this subsection, and in addition to the funds appropriated in section 11, from the state school aid fund, there is appropriated and allocated an amount not to exceed $2,500,000.00 to districts and intermediate districts to fund financial awards to eligible teachers who hold National Board Certification. The appropriation and allocation under this subsection is contingent on the effective issuance of a directive by the budget director, pursuant to section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a, to lapse the remaining funding from a work project that was established under this section in 2023-2024. The amount allocated under this subsection may not exceed the amount lapsed from the work project referenced in the immediately preceding sentence. (2) A district or intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department. Awards must be granted as $4,000.00 to all eligible teachers who hold National Board Certification, and an additional $6,000.00 for eligible teachers who hold National Board Certification and serve in Title I schools. (3) The department shall grant awards under this section on a first-come, first-served basis. An eligible teacher shall not receive more than 1 award in a single fiscal year. (4) The funds allocated under this section for 2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to enable and encourage teachers to get National Board Certification. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2029. (5) The funds appropriated under this section are 1-time bonus payments. Pursuant to section 3a(3) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1303a, these payments are not considered compensation for retirement purposes and are not subject to member or employer contribution requirements under the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system (MPSERS). (6) As used in this section, âeligible teacherâ includes individuals who hold a valid or expired Michigan teaching certificate and are employed by the district or intermediate district as teachers, including those in teacher leadership roles as a peer assistance and review coach, mentor, or other teacher support provider if the position does not require a school administrator certificate. Sec. 27o. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $3,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only to an intermediate district to support a statewide digital credentialing initiative for students in CTE programs and educators. The digital credentialing initiative must provide students and instructional staff with access to a verifiable, portable, and accessible digital record of skills, competencies, and achievements that may be securely shared with employers, postsecondary institutions, and workforce partners across this state, supporting Michiganâs economic workforce competitiveness by improving skills transparency and portability statewide. (2) Funds received under this section must be awarded to an intermediate district to partner with a nonprofit organization with demonstrated experience in digital credentialing and workforce-aligned talent record systems. (3) The digital credentialing initiative must enable CTE students statewide, including program completers and individuals demonstrating proficiency in Perkins V-aligned competencies, to earn verified, portable digital credentials documenting career pathway achievements, workforce readiness, and postsecondary readiness. Credentials must be aligned to department-approved CTE programs and statewide competency frameworks to ensure consistency and portability across regions. (4) The digital credentialing initiative must include, at a minimum, both of the following: (a) Development of digital credentials for CTE program completion, work-based learning, youth apprenticeship, and soft skills. All credentials must be stored, including industry-recognized credits. Credentials must be maintained within a statewide credential library to support consistent issuance, validation, and recognition across this state. These achievements must be showcased in a digital, portable portfolio that organizes and displays verified credentials, skills, competencies, and achievements and can be securely shared. (b) Digital credentials for educators that track literacy professional development for educators, including the completion of LETRS training or other science of reading-based training. Credentials issued for the completion of LETRS training must be competency based, verifiable, and electronically shareable by the educator. Each credential must document the specific level or unit completed and the date of completion. (5) The development of digital credentials for CTE program completion described in subsection (4)(a) must align with state and regional workforce and education systems to support Michiganâs economic workforce competitiveness and regional talent pipeline needs, while ensuring statewide consistency and portability of credentials. The administering nonprofit organization shall provide statewide implementation support and submit an annual report to the department detailing adoption, credential issuance by type and region, and progress toward improving statewide CTE-to-workforce outcomes. (6) The administering nonprofit organization shall provide participant-level data in a form and manner prescribed by the department to support credential issuance, registry reporting, and integration with statewide education data systems. Data submitted under this section must align with statewide education data infrastructure standards, including coordination with MiDataHub and MiGreatDataLake. (7) The digital credentialing initiative must annually report to the department, to the extent not otherwise collected through existing reporting systems, the name, personnel identification code, employing district or entity, level or unit completed, date of completion, and credential status for each educator participating in LETRS training funded under section 35a. The department may incorporate this information into a statewide educator workforce profile system. (8) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (9) As used in this section: (a) âCTE programâ means a career and technical education program. (b) âCTE studentâ means a pupil enrolled in a career and technical education program. Sec. 27t. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 to 1 or more districts or intermediate districts participating in the educator-on-loan program established by the department. Permissible uses of funds under this section include, but are not limited to, paying additional costs associated with hiring an employee in the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system and other employment-related costs, such as employee benefits. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 28. (1) To recognize differentiated instructional costs for different types of pupils as well as additional costs to provide essential services in 2026-2027, the following sections provide a weighted foundation allocation or an additional payment of some type in the following amounts, as allocated under those sections: (a) Section 22b, weighted foundation payment, $1,627,655,100.00. (b) Section 22d, isolated and rural districts, $14,184,400.00. (c) Section 22l, transportation reimbursement, $125,000,000.00. (d) Section 32d, great start readiness program, $730,356,100.00. (e) Section 51c, special education, mandated percentages, $1,141,700,000.00. (f) Section 54d, early on, $26,081,900.00. (g) Section 61a, career and technical education, standard reimbursement, $45,985,000.00. (h) Section 61b, career and technical education, early middle college and career and technical education, $9,220,400.00. (2) The funding described in subsection (1) is not a separate allocation of any funding but is instead a listing of funding allocated in the sections listed in subsection (1). Sec. 30d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $200,000,000.00 for 2026-2027, and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of making payments to participating entities to provide free school lunch and breakfast to public school and nonpublic school pupils in grades pre-K to 12. (2) To receive funding under this section, a participating entity must participate in the National School Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program and must do all of the following: (a) Provide reimbursable breakfasts and reimbursable lunches at no cost to all students for any school breakfast program or school lunch program operated by the participating entity. (b) Submit information regarding the number of reimbursable breakfasts and reimbursable lunches served in a manner prescribed by the department. (c) Maximize federal reimbursement for reimbursable breakfasts and reimbursable lunches by operating under the CEP if the participating entity has an identified student percentage greater than or equal to the minimum requirement to be eligible to participate in the CEP. For purposes of this subdivision, all eligible participating entities must elect CEP on behalf of a single school, a group or groups of schools, or all schools in the participating entity, as applicable, in a manner that maximizes federal reimbursement. (d) Meet all applicable state and federal standards in its school breakfast and lunch programs, as determined by the department. (e) Take all efforts to maximize and implement policies that require parents or guardians to fill out relevant family income information, in a manner prescribed by the department, for the purposes of determining student eligibility for federal free or reduced cost meal reimbursement rates and CEP eligibility determinations. (f) Forgive all school meal debt related to federally reimbursable meals, as determined by the department. (3) Participating entities are encouraged to offer meals that meet studentsâ dietary restrictions, including the provision of gluten-free meals, vegetarian meals, vegan meals, and, upon request, kosher meals, halal meals, and meals meeting any allergy restrictions as confirmed by a doctorâs note. Participating entities are encouraged to purchase food from Michigan growers when possible and practical. (4) For each eligible participating entity, the department shall pay an amount equal to the following: (a) The amount equal to the federal rate per student paid per pupil per free breakfast and lunch under the child nutrition act of 1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to 1793, and the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, multiplied by the number of breakfasts and lunches provided by the participating entity to students, less the federal revenue received by the participating entity under the school breakfast program and the school lunch program under the child nutrition act of 1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to 1793, and the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, and other state lunch payments received under section 31d. (b) The amount equal to the federal rate per student paid per pupil per free breakfast and lunch under the child nutrition act of 1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to 1793, and the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, multiplied by the number of breakfasts and lunches provided by the participating entity, as applicable, to children participating in the Great Start Readiness Program under section 32d at the participating entity, less all other federal and state lunch payments made for those children. For purposes of this subdivision, compliance with 7 CFR 226.9 is required. The department shall assign rates of reimbursement pursuant to 7 CFR 226.9, at least annually, on the basis of family size and income information reported by each eligible participating entity. Assigned rates of reimbursement must be adjusted annually to reflect changes in the national average payment rates. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department may make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (6) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully reimburse districts for meals as required in this section, there is appropriated from the school meals reserve fund created in section 30e the amount necessary to fully fund these reimbursements. (7) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully reimburse nonpublic schools for meals as required in this section, there is appropriated from the general pupil support reserve fund created in section 22s the amount necessary, not to exceed $1,000,000.00, to fund these reimbursements. (8) As used in this section: (a) âCEPâ means the Community Eligibility Provision under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j. (b) âParticipating entityâ means a district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. Sec. 31a. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $33,000,000.00, to support primary health care services provided to children and adolescents up to age 21. These funds must be expended in a form and manner determined jointly by the department and the department of health and human services. When making funding decisions for new adolescent health centers under this subsection, the department and department of health and human services shall prioritize support for primary health care services in unserved and underserved counties as determined by the department of health and human services. An amount equal to 4% of the funds allocated under this subsection must be made available for technical support and coordination services from a nonprofit organization exclusively dedicated to serving adolescent health centers in this state and that has a membership that includes federally qualified health centers, local public health departments, hospital systems, and public school districts. As a requirement of being awarded the funds under this subsection as prescribed under this subsection, a nonprofit organization described in this subsection shall make readily available technical support and coordination services to all child and adolescent health centers in this state. (2) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,150,000.00 for the state portion of the hearing and vision screenings as described in part 93 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9301 to 333.9329, and, from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for the state portion of the dental screenings as described in part 93 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9301 to 333.9329. A local public health department shall pay at least 50% of the total cost of the screenings. The frequency of the vision screenings must be as required under R 325.13091 to R 325.13096 of the Michigan Administrative Code and the frequency of the hearing screenings must be as required under R 325.3271 to R 325.3276 of the Michigan Administrative Code. Funds must be awarded in a form and manner approved jointly by the department and the department of health and human services. (3) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 31c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $65,000,000.00 for grants to eligible districts for pilot programs to maintain or establish small classes in grades K to 3 in eligible school buildings in the district. (2) To be eligible for a grant under subsection (1), a district must have at least 1 eligible school building and must apply to the department in the form and manner prescribed by the department. A district shall include in its application a projected budget for maintaining or establishing small classes in grades K to 3 and shall demonstrate in the projected budget that at least 10% of the funds received by the district under section 31a will be used to support small classes under this section. (3) For a school building to be considered an eligible school building under subsection (2), the school building must meet all of the following requirements: (a) Operate at least 1 of grades K to 3. (b) Be operated by a district that operates all of grades K to 12 and that receives funds under section 31a. (c) Be located in a district that is in an opportunity index band, as described in section 31a, of 4 or higher. (4) Not more than 25% of the total allocation under this section may be paid to any single district. The department shall make allocations under this section to districts that are geographically diverse, including urban, suburban, and rural districts. Grants issued under this section must be awarded to at least the following districts: (a) Muskegon Heights Public School Academy System. (b) Benton Harbor Area Schools. (c) Flint School District. (d) Wayne-Westland Community School District. (5) A district that receives funds under this section shall use the funds to maintain or establish small classes in grades K to 3 in school buildings of the district for which funds are received under this section. The average class size must be not more than 17 pupils per class, with not more than 19 pupils in any particular class. A district that receives funds under this section shall use at least 10% of the funds the district receives for 2025-2026 under section 31a for the purposes of this section. (6) Funding to districts under this section for 2025-2026 is intended to be for the first of 2 years of funding. (7) The funds allocated in this section are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026 are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to lower class sizes in grades K to 3. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2030. (8) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 31d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $29,553,400.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of making payments to districts and other eligible entities under this section. (2) The amounts allocated from state sources under this section are used to pay the amount necessary to reimburse districts for 6.0127% of the necessary costs of the state mandated portion of lunch programs provided by those districts. The department shall calculate the amount due to each district under this section using the methods of calculation adopted by the Michigan supreme court in the consolidated cases known as Durant v State of Michigan, 456 Mich 175 (1997). (3) The payments made under this section include all state payments made to districts so that each district receives at least 6.0127% of the necessary costs of operating the state mandated portion of the lunch program in a fiscal year. (4) The payments made under this section to districts and other eligible entities that are not required under section 1272a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1272a, to provide a lunch program must be in an amount not to exceed $10.00 per eligible pupil plus 5 cents for each free lunch and 2 cents for each reduced price lunch provided, as determined by the department. (5) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 all available federal funding, estimated at $418,267,600.00 for child nutrition programs and, for 2026-2027, all available federal funding, estimated at $100.00, for food distribution programs. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to eligible entities other than districts under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (7) In purchasing food for a lunch program funded under this section, a district or other eligible entity shall give preference to food that is grown or produced by Michigan businesses if it is competitively priced and of comparable quality. (8) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully reimburse districts for meals as required under this section, there is appropriated from the school meals reserve fund created under section 30e the amount necessary to fully fund these reimbursements. Sec. 31f. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $16,900,000.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of making payments to districts to reimburse for the cost of providing breakfast. (2) The funds allocated under this section for school breakfast programs are made available to all eligible applicant districts that meet all of the following criteria: (a) The district participates in the federal school breakfast program and meets all standards as prescribed by 7 CFR parts 210, 220, 225, 226, and 245. (b) Each breakfast eligible for payment meets the federal standards described in subdivision (a). (3) The payment for a district under this section is at a per meal rate equal to the lesser of the districtâs actual cost or 100% of the statewide average cost of a meal served, as determined and approved by the department, less federal reimbursement, participant payments, and state breakfast reimbursements received under section 30d. The department shall determine the statewide average cost using costs as reported in a manner approved by the department for the preceding school year. (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department may make payments under this section pursuant to an agreement with the department. (5) In purchasing food for a school breakfast program funded under this section, a district shall give preference to food that is grown or produced by Michigan businesses if it is competitively priced and of comparable quality. (6) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully reimburse districts for meals as required under this section, there is appropriated from the school meals reserve fund created under section 30e the amount necessary to fully fund these reimbursements. Sec. 31j. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for a program to support districts in the purchase of locally grown fruits, vegetables, and legumes as described in this section. (2) Funding under this section retained by the department for administration must not exceed 5%. Funding under this section retained by project partners for data collection, outreach, and training must not exceed 2% for each partner. (3) The department shall develop and implement a competitive grant program for districts to assist in paying for the costs incurred by the district to purchase or increase purchases of whole or minimally processed fruits, vegetables, and legumes grown in this state. The maximum amount that may be drawn down on a grant to a district is based on the number of meals served by the district during the previous school year under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j. The department shall collaborate with the Michigan department of agriculture and rural development to provide training to newly participating schools and electronic information on Michigan agriculture. (4) The goals of the program under this section include improving daily nutrition and eating habits for children through the school and child care settings while investing in Michiganâs agricultural and related food business economy. (5) A district that receives a grant under this section shall use those funds for the costs incurred by the district to do both of the following: (a) Purchase whole or minimally processed fruits, vegetables, and legumes that meet both of the following: (i) For each fiscal year, were purchased for use in meals and supportive activities as part of the United States Department of Agriculture child nutrition programs provided between October 1 through September 30 of that fiscal year. (ii) Are grown in this state and, if minimally processed, are also processed in this state. (b) Pay for labor and food transportation of locally grown fruits, vegetables, and legumes that directly support the activities and goals of the program described in this section. The amount paid under this subdivision must not exceed 25% of the grant award. (6) For Michigan-grown fruits, vegetables, and legumes that satisfy the requirements of subsection (5), the department shall make matching reimbursements in an amount not to exceed 10 cents for every school meal that is served as part of the United States Department of Agricultureâs child nutrition programs. (7) In awarding grants under this section, the department shall work in consultation with Michigan-based farm-to-school resource organizations to develop scoring criteria that assess an applicantâs ability to procure Michigan-grown products, prepare and menu Michigan-grown products, promote and market Michigan-grown products, and submit letters of intent from districts on plans for educational activities that promote the goals of the program. (8) The department shall give preference to districts that propose educational activities that meet 1 or more of the following: promote healthy food activities; have clear educational objectives; involve parents or the community; connect to a schoolâs or child care centerâs farm-to-school or farm-to-early-child-care procurement activities; and market and promote the program, leading to increased pupil knowledge and consumption of Michigan-grown products. The department shall give stronger weighting and consideration to applications with robust marketing and promotional activities. (9) In awarding grants, the department shall also consider all of the following: (a) The percentage of children who qualify for free or reduced-price school meals under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j. (b) The variety of school sizes and geographic locations within the identified prosperity regions. (c) Existing or planned collaboration between districts, or with agricultural businesses and essential local food infrastructure, such as farms, farm cooperatives, processors, distributors, and local food hubs. (10) As a condition of receiving a grant under this section, a district shall provide or direct its vendors to provide to the department copies of monthly receipts that show the quantity of different Michigan-grown fruits, vegetables, and legumes purchased, the amount of money spent on each of these products, the name and Michigan location of the farm that grew the products, and the methods or plans to market and promote the program. The district also shall provide to the department monthly United States Department of Agriculture child nutrition reimbursable meal numbers and must retain monthly menus noting when and how Michigan-grown products were used in meals. The district and school food service director or directors also shall agree to respond to brief online surveys and to provide a report that shows the percentage relationship of Michigan spending compared to total food spending. By not later than 60 days after the end of the period in which funds under this section were received, and in which federal child nutrition programs require submission of claims, each district shall submit a report to the department on outcomes and related measurements for economic development and childrenâs nutrition and readiness to learn. The report must include at least both of the following: (a) The extent to which farmers and related businesses, including distributors and processors, saw an increase in market opportunities and income generation through sales of Michigan or local products to districts. All of the following apply for purposes of this subdivision: (i) The data used to determine the amount of this increase are the total dollar amount of Michigan or local fruits, vegetables, and legumes purchased by schools, along with the number of different types of products purchased; school food purchasing trends identified along with products that are of new and growing interest among food service directors; the number of businesses impacted; and the percentage of total food budget spent on Michigan-grown fruits, vegetables, and legumes. (ii) The district shall use purchasing data collected for the program and surveys of school food service directors on the impact and success of the program as the source for the data described in subparagraph (i). (b) The ability to which pupils can access a variety of healthy Michigan-grown foods through schools and increase their consumption of those foods. All of the following apply for purposes of this subdivision: (i) The data used to determine whether this subdivision is met are the number of pupils exposed to Michigan-grown fruits, vegetables, and legumes at schools; the variety of products served; new items taste-tested or placed on menus; and the increase in pupil willingness to try new local healthy foods. (ii) The district shall use purchasing data collected for the project, meal count and enrollment numbers, school menu calendars, and surveys of school food service directors as the source for the data described in subparagraph (i). (11) The department shall compile the reports provided by districts under subsection (10) into 1 legislative report. The department shall provide this report not later than April 1 of each fiscal year following the fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director. (12) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 31n. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 for the purposes of this section an amount not to exceed $106,545,000.00 and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 for the purposes of this section an amount not to exceed $1,300,000.00. The department and the department of health and human services shall continue a program to distribute this funding to add licensed behavioral health providers for general education pupils, and recipients of the funds under subsection (6) shall continue to seek federal Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and support services. (2) The department and the department of health and human services shall maintain an advisory council for programs funded under this section and any other funding under this act to improve or maintain the mental health of pupils, except for programs funded under section 31a(1) and (2). The advisory council shall define goals for implementation of programs, and shall provide feedback on that implementation. At a minimum, the advisory council shall consist of representatives of state associations representing school health, school mental health, school counseling, education, health care, and other organizations, representatives from the department and the department of health and human services, and a representative from the school safety and mental health commission. The department and department of health and human services, working with the advisory council, shall determine an approach to increase capacity for mental health and support services in schools for general education pupils, and shall determine where that increase in capacity qualifies for federal Medicaid match funding. (3) The advisory council shall develop a fiduciary agent checklist for intermediate districts to facilitate development of a plan to submit to the department and to the department of health and human services. The department and department of health and human services shall determine the requirements and format for intermediate districts to submit a plan for possible funding under subsection (6). The department shall make applications for funding for this program available to districts and intermediate districts by not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are allocated under this section and shall award the funding by not later than February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are allocated under this section. (4) The department of health and human services shall ensure that the state Medicaid plan continues to be written in a way sufficient to obtain appropriate Medicaid waivers to generate additional Medicaid match funding for school mental health and support services for general education pupils through the Caring for Students (C4S) expansion. (5) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $14,300,000.00 to be distributed to the network of child and adolescent health centers to place a licensed masterâs level behavioral health provider in schools that do not currently have services available to general education pupils. Child and adolescent health centers that are part of the network described in this subsection shall provide a commitment to maintain services and implement all available federal Medicaid match methodologies. The department of health and human services shall use all existing or additional federal Medicaid match opportunities to maximize funding allocated under this subsection. The department shall provide funds under this subsection to child and adolescent health centers that are part of the network described in this subsection in the same proportion that funding under section 31a(1) is provided to child and adolescent health centers that are part of the network described in this subsection and that are located and operating in those districts. A payment from funding allocated under this subsection must not be paid to an entity that is not part of the network described in this subsection. (6) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $87,245,000.00 to be distributed to intermediate districts for the provision of mental health and support services to general education pupils. Recipients of funds under this subsection shall continue to seek federal Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and support services. If a district or intermediate district is not able to procure the services of a licensed masterâs level behavioral health provider, the district or intermediate district shall notify the department and the department of health and human services and, if the department and department of health and human services verify that the district or intermediate district attempted to procure services from a masterâs level behavioral health provider and was not able to do so, then the district or intermediate district may instead procure services from a provider with less than a masterâs degree in behavioral health. To be able to use the exemption in the immediately preceding sentence, the district or intermediate district must submit evidence satisfactory to the department and department of health and human services demonstrating that the district or intermediate district took measures to procure the services of a licensed masterâs level behavioral health provider but was unable to do so, and the department and department of health and human services must be able to verify this evidence. From the first $56,173,600.00 of the funds allocated under this subsection, the department shall distribute up to $1,003,100.00 for 2026-2027 to each intermediate district that submits a plan approved by the department and the department of health and human services by February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are allocated under this section. The department shall distribute the remaining $31,071,400.00 of the funds allocated under this subsection for 2026-2027 to intermediate districts that submit a plan approved by the department and the department of health and human services by February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are allocated under this section on an equal per-pupil basis based on the combined total number of pupils in membership in the intermediate district and its constituent districts, including public school academies that are considered to be constituent districts under section 705(7) of the revised school code, MCL 380.705. The department and department of health and human services shall work cooperatively in providing oversight and assistance to intermediate districts and shall monitor the program upon implementation. An intermediate district shall use funds awarded under this subsection to provide funding to its constituent districts, including public school academies that are considered to be constituent districts under section 705(7) of the revised school code, MCL 380.705, for the provision of mental health and support services to general education pupils. In addition to the criteria identified under subsection (9), an intermediate district shall consider geography, cost, or other challenges when awarding funding to its constituent districts. Districts receiving funding under this subsection are encouraged to provide suicide prevention and awareness education and counseling. (7) If funding awarded to an intermediate district remains after funds are provided by the intermediate district to its constituent districts, the intermediate district shall notify the department and department of health and human services and submit evidence satisfactory to the department and department of health and human services demonstrating how it would like to use funds for purposes other than hiring licensed behavioral health providers for general education pupils. With permission from the department and department of health and human services, the intermediate district may hire or contract for experts to provide mental health and support services to general education pupils residing within the boundaries of the intermediate district, including, but not limited to, expanding, hiring, or contracting for staff and experts to provide those services directly or to increase access to those services through coordination with outside mental health agencies; the intermediate district may also contract with 1 or more other intermediate districts for coordination and the facilitation of activities related to providing mental health and support services to general education pupils residing within the boundaries of the intermediate district; the intermediate district may also use the funds under this section to create or strengthen school-based behavioral health assessment teams that focus on providing age-appropriate interventions, identifying behaviors that suggest a pupil may be struggling with mental health challenges, providing treatment and support of the pupil, and using disciplinary interventions and the criminal justice system as methods of last resort; and the intermediate district may also use the funds under this section to provide evidence-based trainings that support pupil mental health. (8) If funding awarded to an intermediate district under this section remains unspent, or if the intermediate district submits an application requesting a lower allocation than the maximum amount permitted, the department, in conjunction with the intermediate district, may reallocate the funds to another intermediate district or other intermediate districts capable of expending the funds before the funding deadline in accordance with this section as if those funds were originally allocated to the intermediate district or intermediate districts to which the funds are being reallocated. (9) A district requesting funds under this section from the intermediate district in which it is located shall submit an application for funding for the provision of mental health and support services to general education pupils. A district receiving funding from the application process described in this subsection shall provide services to nonpublic pupils upon request. An intermediate district shall not discriminate against an application submitted by a public school academy simply on the basis of the applicant being a public school academy. The department shall approve grant applications based on the following criteria: (a) The districtâs commitment to maintain mental health and support services delivered by licensed providers into future fiscal years. (b) The districtâs commitment to work with its intermediate district to use funding it receives under this section that is spent by the district for general education pupils toward participation in federal Medicaid match methodologies. A district must provide a local match of at least 20% of the funding allocated to the district under section 31n. (c) The districtâs commitment to adhere to any local funding requirements determined by the department and the department of health and human services. (d) The extent of the districtâs existing partnerships with community health care providers or the ability of the district to establish such partnerships. (e) The districtâs documentation of need, including gaps in current mental health and support services for the general education population. (f) The districtâs submission of a formal plan of action identifying the number of schools and pupils to be served. (g) Whether the district will participate in ongoing trainings. (h) Whether the district will submit an annual report to the state. (i) Whether the district demonstrates a willingness to work with the state to establish program and service delivery benchmarks. (j) Whether the district has developed a school safety plan or is in the process of developing a school safety plan. (k) Any other requirements determined by the department or the department of health and human services. (10) Funding under this section, including any federal Medicaid funds that are generated, must not be used to supplant existing services. (11) Both of the following are allocated to the department of health and human services from the general fund money allocated under subsection (1): (a) For 2026-2027, an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for the purpose of upgrading technology and systems infrastructure and other administrative requirements to support the programs funded under this section. (b) For 2026-2027, an amount not to exceed $300,000.00 for the purpose of administering the programs under this section and working on generating additional Medicaid funds as a result of programs funded under this section. (12) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 to intermediate districts on an equal per intermediate district basis for the purpose of administering programs funded under this section. Recipients of the funds under this subsection shall continue to seek federal Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and support services and participate in all learning collaboratives about C4S required by the department and department of health and human services. (13) The department and the department of health and human services shall work with the advisory council to develop proposed measurements of outcomes and performance. Those measurements must include, at a minimum, the number of pupils served, the number of schools served, and where those pupils and schools were located. The department and the department of health and human services shall compile data necessary to measure outcomes and performance, and districts and intermediate districts receiving funding under this section shall provide data requested by the department and department of health and human services for the measurement of outcomes and performance. The department and department of health and human services shall provide an annual report by not later than December 1 of each year to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and health and human services, to the house and senate fiscal agencies, and to the state budget director. At a minimum, the report must include measurements of outcomes and performance, proposals to increase efficacy and usefulness, proposals to increase performance, and proposals to expand coverage. (14) A district or intermediate district that receives funding directly or indirectly under this section may carry over any unexpended funds received under this section for up to 2 fiscal years beyond the fiscal year in which the funds were received. (15) As used in this section, âgeneral education pupilâ includes children served under sections 32d and 32t. Sec. 31p. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 for grants to intermediate districts to implement a program as described in subsection (2). (2) The program described in this subsection must improve youth access to evidence-based mental health services by training school mental health professionals in effective practices, such as cognitive behavioral therapy and mindfulness. (3) The department shall establish a grant process to distribute funds under this section. (4) The department shall award, in an equal amount, grants under this section to each intermediate district that has an approved grant application for funding under this section. Intermediate districts must forward to the program described in subsection (2) an amount equal to the amount awarded to the intermediate district under this subsection to contract with the program. The program must use funding received from intermediate districts to satisfy the terms of the contracts with the intermediate districts on a statewide basis. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 31aa. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $300,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only, and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $10,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only, to support school safety and mental health. (2) From the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00, and from the general fund money allocated in subsection (1), the amount necessary to provide payments to nonpublic schools as calculated under this subsection may be used to provide payments to districts, intermediate districts, nonpublic schools, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, as applicable, for activities to improve student mental health. The department shall make payments under this subsection to districts, intermediate districts, nonpublic schools, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind in an amount not to exceed $73.53 per pupil. The total amount allocated for nonpublic schools under this subsection must not exceed $7,000,000.00. The allowable expenditures of funds under this subsection are as follows: (a) Hiring or contracting for support staff for student mental health needs, including, but not limited to, school psychologists, social workers, counselors, and school nurses. (b) Purchasing and implementing mental health screening tools. (c) Purchasing a statewide, integrated technology platform that streamlines behavioral health documentation and care coordination. (d) Providing school-based mental health personnel access to consultation with behavioral health clinicians to respond to complex student mental health needs. (e) Purchasing and implementing an online behavioral health tool moderated and led by licensed behavioral health professionals. (f) Hiring or contracting a behavioral health coordinator. (g) Evidence-based trainings to support mental health. (h) Costs associated with collaboration between school employees, families, and community partners to address the academic, behavioral, and social needs of all students through collaborative partnerships, resource coordination, data collection, and data sharing. (i) Costs associated with conducting a systematic school mental health needs assessment and resource mapping that identifies programmatic and systemic needs and helps staff determine priorities and create action plans. (j) Implementing cell-phone-free school policies. As used in this subdivision, âcell-phone-free school policyâ means a policy that prohibits students from accessing or using a personal communication device capable of telecommunication or digital communication during instructional time, as determined by the school. (k) Purchasing and implementing an evidence-based character- and relationship-building education program that includes family engagement, service learning, and project-based character development, and that fosters positive student-educator relationships and whole-school culture. (3) From the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $200,000,000.00 and from the general fund money allocated in subsection (1), the amount necessary to provide payments to nonpublic schools as calculated under this subsection may be used to provide payments to districts, intermediate districts, nonpublic schools, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, as applicable, for activities to improve student safety. Subject to eligibility requirements in subsection (6), the department shall make payments to eligible districts, intermediate districts, nonpublic schools, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind in an amount not to exceed $147.06 per pupil. The total amount allocated for nonpublic schools under this subsection must not exceed $14,000,000.00. The allowable expenditures of funds under this subsection are as follows: (a) Coordination with local law enforcement. (b) Training for school staff on threat assessment. (c) Training for school staff and students on threat response. (d) Training for school staff on crisis communication. (e) Safety infrastructure, including, but not limited to, cameras, door blocks, hardened vestibules, window screening, and technology necessary to operate buzzer systems. This may also include firearm detection software that integrates to existing security cameras to detect and alert school personnel and first responders to visible firearms on school property. (f) Age-appropriate training for students and families on responsible firearm ownership, including safe handling and safe storage of firearms. (g) School resource officers and safety dogs. School resource officers hired under this subsection must be properly licensed and in good standing with the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards, and must be in compliance with all applicable laws. (h) Student Safety Management System, the information technology platform and related services to improve student safety by mitigating cyberbullying, school violence, human trafficking, and self-harm that supports students from grades K to 12. (i) A secure platform, administered by the department of state police, for school officials, emergency responders, and emergency management coordinators to house all school safety-related items, including, but not limited to, EOP templates, EOP guidance, reference documents, and security assessments. The platform should use existing password-protected access control methods schools currently utilize and, to the extent possible, be capable of integrating with existing platforms or technologies used by districts for school safety. Through permissions-based access control, the platform should be able to relay information clearly and in real time to each person or entity necessary to provide a unified response to a safety incident, or to take appropriate action in response to an anticipated disruption to the normal functions of the surrounding community. (j) Emergency infrastructure needs to respond to an immediate threat to the health or safety of students and staff in the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. A district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind shall not expend funds for this purpose without first obtaining approval from the department. In making a determination of approval, the department shall, at a minimum, assess whether the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind is responding to an immediate threat to the health or safety of students and staff, and whether the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind has other sources of funding that should be utilized first. (k) A contract with a vendor for a comprehensive safety and security assessment or a comprehensive safety and security event assessment in schools operated by the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. (l) An emergency response system. (4) Recipients of funding under this section must provide a final expense report to the department by July 1 of each fiscal year. If the department determines that the eligible recipient has misused the funds allocated under this section, the eligible recipient shall reimburse the department for the amount of state funding misused. (5) Districts receiving funds under this section must coordinate with intermediate districts to avoid duplication of services and to streamline delivery of services to students. (6) To receive funding under subsection (3), a district, an intermediate district, a nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind must agree to be subject to a comprehensive investigation after a mass casualty event, must agree to comply with a comprehensive investigation into the mass casualty event and, for the purpose of that investigation, must affirmatively agree to waive any privilege held by the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or Michigan School for the Deaf and Blind that may otherwise protect information from disclosure in the event of a mass casualty event, and must agree to comply with a comprehensive investigation. All of the following apply to a comprehensive investigation described in this subsection: (a) The comprehensive investigation will assess the circumstances surrounding the mass casualty event, including, but not limited to: (i) Emergency response effectiveness. (ii) Compliance with safety protocols. (iii) Communication procedures. (iv) Any factors contributing to the incident. (b) The governor shall designate an appropriate person or investigative entity to conduct the comprehensive investigation. This person or investigative entity may include, but is not limited to, state law enforcement agencies, independent review boards, or specially appointed task forces. The person or designated investigative entity has the authority to do all of the following: (i) Access relevant records and data from the district. (ii) Interview witnesses and district personnel involved. (iii) Issue findings and recommendations based on the investigation. (c) The person or investigative entity designated in subdivision (b) shall prepare a detailed report of its findings and submit the report to the governor and relevant legislative committees within 90 days following the conclusion of the investigation. The report must include recommendations for preventing future incidents and improving school safety protocols. (7) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the general fund money allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund awards to nonpublic schools under subsections (2) and (3), there is appropriated from the general pupil support reserve fund created in section 22s the amount necessary, not to exceed $11,000,000.00, to fund these reimbursements. (8) As used in this section: (a) âMass casualty eventâ means any of the following that occur on school grounds or at a school-sponsored event: (i) An incident resulting in significant physical injuries to not fewer than 3 individuals. As used in this subparagraph, âsignificant physical injuryâ means an injury that involves a risk of death, significant physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or a protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental or sensory faculty. (ii) An incident resulting in 2 or more fatalities. (iii) An incident of such scope that the emergency response resources in the jurisdiction where the incident takes place are not sufficient and resources from surrounding jurisdictions are required. (iv) An incident that results in a sudden surge of injured individuals necessitating emergency services. (b) âSafety dogâ means a dog that is contracted by a law enforcement agency of this state, a local unit of government of this state, or a district or an intermediate district and that is trained for detection of firearms, explosives, narcotics, or vape substances. (c) âSchool groundsâ means all properties owned or operated by the district, including transportation vehicles owned or operated by the district. (d) âSchool-sponsored eventâ means any activity organized or sanctioned by the district. (9) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 32d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated to eligible intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts for great start readiness programs and other purposes described in this section an amount not to exceed $712,356,100.00 for 2026-2027, and from the great start readiness reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $18,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for the purposes of this section. An intermediate district or consortium shall use funds allocated under this section for eligible great start readiness program options. For a child to be eligible to participate in a program under this section, the child must be at least 4, but less than 5, years of age as of September 1 of the school year in which the program is offered and must meet those eligibility and prioritization guidelines. After eligible children who will be 4 years of age as of September 1 are enrolled, a child who is not 4 years of age as of September 1, but who will be 4 years of age by not later than December 1, is eligible to participate if both of the following are met: (a) The childâs parent or legal guardian seeks a waiver from the September 1 eligibility date by submitting a request for enrollment in a program to the responsible intermediate district. (b) The child meets eligibility and prioritization guidelines. (2) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $700,356,100.00 for 2026-2027 is allocated to intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts based on the formula in section 39. An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving funding under this section shall act as the fiduciary for the great start readiness programs. An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving funding under this section may collaborate with local governments to identify children eligible for programs funded under this section and may contract with local governments to provide services. To be eligible to receive funds allocated under this subsection from an intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts, a district, a consortium of districts, a local government, or a public or private for-profit or nonprofit legal entity or agency must comply with this section and section 39. If the amount allocated in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund allocations calculated under section 39, there is appropriated from the great start readiness program reserve fund the amount necessary and available to fully fund those allocations. (3) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (2), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall award a competitive grant to a state public university to continue a longitudinal evaluation of children who have participated in great start readiness programs. (4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), to be eligible for funding under this section, a program must prepare children for success in school through comprehensive part-day programs, school-day programs, GSRP extended programs, GSRP/Head Start school-day blended programs, GSRP/Head Start extended blended programs, or other eligible great start readiness program options that contain all of the following program components, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential: (a) Participation in a collaborative recruitment and enrollment process to ensure that each child is enrolled in the program most appropriate to the childâs needs and to maximize the use of federal, state, and local funds. Programs receiving funding under this section must provide current enrollment data, including slots open for enrollment and slots filled, to the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts from which funding is received for that program. The enrollment process must ensure that children in families with lower income and children with other risk factors, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, are enrolled before children with lesser needs. (b) An age-appropriate educational curriculum that is in compliance with the early childhood standards of quality for birth to kindergarten children adopted by the state board, including, at least, the Connect4Learning curriculum. (c) Nutritional services for all program participants supported by federal, state, and local resources as applicable. (d) Physical and dental health and developmental screening services for all program participants. (e) Referral services for families of program participants to community social service agencies, including mental health services, as appropriate. (f) Active and continuous involvement of the parents or guardians of the program participants. (g) A plan to conduct and report annual great start readiness program evaluations and continuous improvement plans using criteria approved by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (h) Participation in a school readiness advisory committee convened as a workgroup of the great start collaborative that provides for the involvement of classroom teachers, parents or guardians of program participants, and community, volunteer, and social service agencies and organizations, as appropriate. The advisory committee shall annually review and make recommendations regarding the program components listed in this subsection. The advisory committee also shall make recommendations to the great start collaborative regarding other community services designed to improve all childrenâs school readiness. (i) The ongoing articulation of the kindergarten and first grade programs offered by the program provider. (j) Participation in this stateâs great start to quality process with a level of at least enhancing quality level. (5) To help expand access to great start readiness programs, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may waive the requirements under subsection (4) and a program may be eligible for funding under this section for new or expanding programs if the program demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that the program meets all of the following: (a) Is a licensed group or child care center or is a licensed program. (b) Provides the minimum instructional time as required by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (c) Participates in this stateâs quality improvement system at a level determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (d) Implements a professional educator preparation plan, as defined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, for educators not meeting teacher credentialing standards described in subsection (8). (e) Uses a developmentally appropriate curriculum, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (f) Conducts a developmental screening and referral process, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (g) Commits to participating in program financial review and monitoring, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (h) Provides a plan to implement an approved great start readiness program curriculum and meet additional great start readiness program standards, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (6) A waiver under subsection (5) may be granted for up to 3 years for requirements related to program credentialing and may be granted for up to 2 years for all other requirements, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (7) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall provide a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies that summarizes the number and types of exemptions granted under subsection (5) and progress made by programs granted waivers under subsection (5) by September 30 of each fiscal year. It is the intent of the legislature to review the waiver allowability under subsection (5) before the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. (8) Applications for funding under this section must be submitted to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The application must demonstrate, at a minimum, compliance with program requirements described in subsection (4) or (5) and must ensure that recipients will only utilize qualified personnel, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, for eligible great start readiness program options. (9) For a grant recipient that enrolls pupils in an eligible great start readiness program option that blends GSRP and Head Start programming, the grant recipient shall ensure that all Head Start and GSRP policies and regulations are applied to the blended slots, with adherence to the highest standard from either program, to the extent allowable under federal law. A grant recipient may request a waiver from the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to align GSRP policies and regulations with Head Start national standards for quality, including ratios, and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may approve the waiver. Not later than March 1 of each year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential will report to the legislature and post on a publicly available website a list by intermediate district or consortium with the number and type of each waiver requested and approved. (10) To help expand access to great start readiness programs, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may allow great start readiness programs to implement Head Start national performance standards for quality as an alternative to great start readiness program policies and regulations if the great start readiness program demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that the great start readiness program is meeting the requirements of the Head Start national performance standards. (11) An intermediate district or consortia of intermediate districts receiving funding under this section must publish, on an easily accessible website, a data dashboard containing the number of allocations requested from the state, a list of programs offering great start readiness programs in their boundaries, and current enrollment data for each subrecipient, including total slots open for enrollment, slots filled, and waitlist information, if applicable. A link to this website must be provided to families on waitlists for any great start readiness program in their boundaries. (12) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall designate an early childhood coordinator, and may provide services directly or may contract with 1 or more districts or public or private for-profit or nonprofit providers that meet all requirements of subsection (4) or (8), as applicable. (13) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts may retain for administrative services provided by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts an amount not to exceed 4% of the grant amount. Expenses incurred by subrecipients engaged by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts for directly running portions of the program are considered program costs or a contracted program fee for service. Subrecipients operating early childhood programs may include indirect costs, not to exceed the federal de minimis. (14) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts may expend not more than 2% of the total grant amount for outreach, recruiting, and public awareness of the program, if the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts also participates in related statewide marketing and outreach efforts. (15) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall allow parents of eligible children who are residents of the intermediate district or within the consortium to choose a program operated by or contracted with another intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts and shall enter into a written agreement regarding payment, in a manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (16) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall conduct a local process to contract with interested and eligible public and private for-profit and nonprofit community-based providers that meet all requirements of subsection (4) for at least 30% of its total allocation. Children served in a program funded through only Head Start are not counted toward this 30% allocation. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall provide guidance to intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts on counting children served by Head Start programming for the purposes of this 30% allocation. An intermediate district or consortium shall report to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, in a manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, information necessary for the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to determine the intermediate districtâs or consortium of intermediate districtsâ compliance with this subsection. If the intermediate district or consortium is not able to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation, the intermediate district or consortium shall notify the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential and, if the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential verifies that the intermediate district or consortium attempted to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation and was not able to do so, the intermediate district or consortium may retain and use all of its allocation as provided under this section. To be able to use this exemption, the intermediate district or consortium shall demonstrate to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that the intermediate district or consortium increased the percentage of its total allocation for which it contracts with a community-based provider and the intermediate district or consortium shall submit evidence satisfactory to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential must be able to verify this evidence, demonstrating that the intermediate district or consortium took measures to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation as required under this subsection, including, but not limited to, at least all of the following measures: (a) The intermediate district or consortium notified each nonparticipating licensed child care center located in the service area of the intermediate district or consortium regarding the centerâs eligibility to participate, in a manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) The intermediate district or consortium provided to each nonparticipating licensed child care center located in the service area of the intermediate district or consortium information regarding great start readiness program requirements and a description of the application and selection process for community-based providers. (c) The intermediate district or consortium provided to the public and to participating families a list of community-based great start readiness program subrecipients with a great start to quality level of at least enhancing quality level. (17) If an intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section fails to submit satisfactory evidence to demonstrate its effort to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation, as required under subsection (16), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may reduce the allocation to the intermediate district or consortium by a percentage equal to the difference between the percentage of an intermediate districtâs or consortiumâs total allocation awarded to community-based providers and 30% of its total allocation. By not later than September 30, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall submit a report on any intermediate districts impacted by this subsection to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (18) To assist intermediate districts and consortia in complying with the requirement to contract with community-based providers, for at least 30% of their total allocation, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that a great start resource center or the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential provides each intermediate district or consortium receiving a grant under this section with the contact information for each licensed child care center located in the service area of the intermediate district or consortium by March 1 of each year. (b) Ensure that all intermediate district, district, community college or university, Head Start grantee or delegate, private for-profit, and private nonprofit providers are subject to a single great start to quality continuous quality improvement system. The continuous quality improvement system must ensure that regulators process all prospective providers at the same pace on a first-come, first-served basis and must not allow 1 type of provider to receive a great start to quality level ahead of any other type of provider. (c) By not later than March 1 of each year, compile the results of the information reported by each intermediate district or consortium under subsection (16) and report to the legislature and post on a publicly available website a list by intermediate district or consortium with the number and percentage of each intermediate districtâs or consortiumâs total allocation allocated to community-based providers by provider type, including private for-profit, private nonprofit, community college or university, Head Start grantee or delegate, and district or intermediate district. (d) Allow intermediate districts and consortia and eligible community-based providers to utilize materials and supplies purchased for great start readiness programs within their facilities for other early care and education activities, in the following order of priority: (i) Early care and education activities under a federal award. (ii) Early care and education activities under other state awards. (iii) Early care and education activities under local or regional awards. (19) A recipient of funds under this section shall report to the center in a form and manner prescribed by the center the information necessary to derive the number of children participating in the program, the number of eligible children not participating in the program and on a waitlist, and the total number of children participating in the program by various demographic groups and eligibility factors necessary to analyze equitable and priority access to services for the purposes of subsection (3). (20) As used in this section: (a) âChild care centerâ means that term as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (b) âEligible great start readiness program optionsâ means a program option that operates on a school-day, part-day, or extended schedule length, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential must maintain and publish on its website requirements for each eligible schedule length, including the minimum day length, the minimum number of days per week, and the minimum number of weeks per year. These programs may be blended with Head Start programs, if allowable by federal rules and regulations. (c) âFederal poverty guidelinesâ means the guidelines published annually in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under its authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902. (d) âGSRP extended programâ means a program that operates for at least the same length of day as a districtâs first grade program for a minimum of 5 days per week, 36 weeks per year. (e) âGSRP/Head Start extended blended programâ means a program funded under this section and a Head Start program that are combined for an extended program. (f) âGSRP/Head Start school-day blended programâ means a part-day program funded under this section and a Head Start program, which are combined for a school-day program. (g) âLicensed child care centerâ means a child care center that has been issued a license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, to operate a child care center. (h) âPart-day programâ means a program that operates at least 4 days per week, 30 weeks per year, for at least 3 hours of teacher-child contact time per day but for fewer hours of teacher-child contact time per day than a school-day program. (i) âSchool-day programâ means a program that operates for at least the same length of day as a districtâs first grade program for a minimum of 4 days per week, 30 weeks per year. A classroom that offers a school-day program must enroll all children for the school day to be considered a school-day program. (21) From the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 and, from the great start readiness program reserve fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 for reimbursement of transportation costs for children attending great start readiness programs funded under this section. To receive reimbursement under this subsection, by not later than November 1 of each year, a program funded under this section that provides transportation shall submit to the intermediate district that is the fiscal agent for the program a projected transportation budget. The amount of the reimbursement for transportation under this subsection is no more than the projected transportation budget or $500.00 multiplied by the number of children funded for the program under this section. If the amount allocated under this subsection is insufficient to fully reimburse the transportation costs for all programs that provide transportation and submit the required information, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall prorate the reimbursement in an equal amount per child funded. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments to the intermediate district that is the fiscal agent for each program, and the intermediate district shall then reimburse the program provider for transportation costs as prescribed under this subsection. (22) Subject to, and from the funds allocated under, subsection (21), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall allow programs to utilize those funds for costs related to parent- or guardian-provided transportation and for costs related to parent- or guardian-accompanied transportation provided by transportation service companies, buses, or other public transportation services. For payments related to parent- or guardian-provided transportation, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall develop parameters to ensure dollars are utilized in a way that improves access to eligible great start readiness program options for low-income and geographically isolated families. To be eligible to utilize funding under this subsection, a program must submit to the intermediate district or consortia of intermediate districts all of the following: (a) The names of families provided with transportation support along with a documented reason for the need for transportation support and the type of transportation provided. (b) Financial documentation of actual transportation costs incurred by the program, including, but not limited to, receipts and mileage reports, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (c) Any other documentation or information determined necessary by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (23) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall implement a process to review and approve age-appropriate comprehensive classroom level quality assessments for GSRP grantees that support the early childhood standards of quality for birth to kindergarten children adopted by the state board. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make available to intermediate districts at least 2 classroom level quality assessments that have been approved by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (24) An intermediate district that is a GSRP grantee may approve the use of a supplemental curriculum that aligns with and enhances the age-appropriate educational curriculum in the classroom. If the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential objects to the use of a supplemental curriculum approved by an intermediate district, the director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall establish a review committee independent of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The review committee shall meet within 60 days of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential registering its objection in writing and provide a final determination on the validity of the objection within 60 days of the review committeeâs first meeting. (25) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall implement a process to evaluate and approve age-appropriate educational curricula that are in compliance with the early childhood standards of quality for birth to kindergarten children adopted by the state board. (26) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for payments to intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts for professional development and training materials for educators in programs implementing new curricula or child assessment tools approved for use in the great start readiness program. Curricula and child assessment tools purchased with funds received under this subsection must be in compliance with early childhood standards of quality for birth to kindergarten children, including the science of reading, as that term is defined in section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f. (27) A great start readiness program, a GSRP extended program, a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program, a GSRP/Head Start extended blended program, or other eligible great start readiness programs funded under this section are permitted to utilize AmeriCorps Pre-K Reading Corps members in classrooms implementing research-based literacy intervention strategies. (28) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,600,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for classroom start up grants to intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts for new or expanding great start readiness classrooms. All of the following apply to funding allocated under this subsection: (a) To receive funding under this subsection, intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts must apply for the funding in a form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall pay an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for each new or expanded classroom. If funding is insufficient to fully fund all eligible applicants, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential must prorate the per-classroom amount on an equal basis. (c) Funds received under this subsection by intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts must be paid in full to the entity operating the classroom and may be used for 1 or more of the following purposes: (i) Costs associated with attracting, recruiting, retaining, and licensing required classroom education personnel to staff new or expanded classrooms. (ii) Supporting facility improvements or purchasing facility space or modular classroom units necessary to provide a safe, high-quality learning environment for children in each new or expanded classroom, and for costs to become a licensed facility such as architectural drawings, permits, and other prelicensure inspection fees. (iii) Outreach material necessary for public awareness that the great start readiness program has openings in the area and for costs associated with enrolling eligible children in new or expanded classrooms. (iv) Supporting costs in each new or expanded classroom associated with improving a providerâs great start to quality level. (d) Recipients of funds under this subsection must demonstrate that instructional staff have completed, or are in the process of completing, professional learning in the science of reading. Grant funds may be used to support this professional learning and are intended to ensure new classrooms are well equipped to implement evidence-based literacy strategies. (e) The funds allocated under this subsection for 2025-2026 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026 do not lapse to the state school aid fund and are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to continue support for new or expanded great start readiness classrooms. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027. (f) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (29) In addition to the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated from the general fund money appropriated under section 11 for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed $1,950,000.00 for an intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts to partner with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential and community-based organizations to continue implementing statewide outreach and enrollment campaign activities to raise awareness about the availability of services through the great start readiness program, and to promote enrollment. (30) The funds allocated under subsection (29) for 2024-2025 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project is to raise awareness of and participation in great start readiness programming. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027. (31) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under subsection (29) on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. Sec. 32e. (1) The great start readiness program reserve fund is created as a separate account in the state school aid fund for the purpose of supporting the great start readiness program and for the purposes described in section 32v. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the great start readiness program reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the great start readiness program reserve fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the great start readiness program reserve fund interest and earnings from great start readiness program reserve fund investments. (3) Money in the great start readiness program reserve fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the great start readiness program reserve fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund or the general fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the great start readiness program reserve fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money available in the great start readiness program reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (6) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2023 only, $200,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund is deposited into the great start readiness program reserve fund. Sec. 32n. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00, and from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $85,000,000.00 to Clinton County RESA to collaborate with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, for the purposes of this section. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2027-2028, the allocation from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes described in this section will be $100,000,000.00. (2) The funds allocated in subsection (1) must be used for a grant program for eligible applicants to expand access to quality, affordable programming before and after the school day or during the summer for young people. Not more than 40% of the total allocation under subsection (1) may be allocated to statewide or regional grant applications. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall establish competitive grant criteria for the program described in this subsection. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, the applicant must meet, at a minimum, all of the following criteria: (a) Serve children in any of grades K to 12. (b) Be a community-based organization that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501, an institution of higher education, a public library, a city or municipality, or an intermediate district. (c) Provide before-school, after-school, before-and-after-school, or summer school programming to children described in subdivision (a). These programs must be used to support expanded learning opportunities, including, but not limited to, mentoring, leadership, community engagement, agriculture, visual and performing arts, literacy, science, technology, engineering, mathematics, health and wellness, recreation, financial literacy, physical fitness, career and college exploration, youth voice, 21st century skills, conflict resolution, and social engagement programming. (d) Address academic outcomes and not fewer than 2 additional measurable goals, including, but not limited to, improved school attendance, improved attitudes toward school, improved positive behaviors, skill development and retention, higher education aspirations, and improved family engagement and include activities linked to research or quality practices. (e) Be 1 of the following: (i) A licensed child care organization. (ii) An entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organization. (iii) An exempt entity. (f) For entities meeting eligibility requirements under subdivision (e)(ii) and (iii), demonstrate in a form and manner determined by the department that all of the following are in place for staff working with youth: (i) Background checks through the Central Registry Clearance and the Internet Criminal History Access Tool. (ii) First aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training. (iii) Health and Safety Training Courses for Child Care Providers, Modules A, B, and C. (3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall establish a competitive grant process for awarding funding under subsection (2). The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall develop the form and manner for applying for the grants. The application must include a request for information on the applicantâs outreach to children, youth, and families who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j. The application must be open for not less than 30 calendar days. At least 30 days before the application is opened, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential must publish on its public website the criteria that will be used in evaluating the application that must include, but are not limited to, priorities under subsection (5). (4) Subject to subsection (8), in determining award amounts under subsection (2), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall, to the extent practicable, ensure that eligible entities in all geographic regions of this state are represented in the distribution of grant funding under subsection (2). (5) Subject to subsection (8), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall prioritize the distribution of grant funding under subsection (2) based on, at a minimum, the following: (a) An applicantâs demonstrated need. (b) The percentage of low-income families in the geographic area being served. Prioritization must be determined by the average percentage of pupils in the district who are eligible for free and reduced-priced meals as determined under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, where eligible entities will provide before-and-after-school or summer school programs. (c) Whether the application provides services for the full school year. (d) The applicantâs track record for providing quality, affordable before-and-after-school or summer school services. (e) Whether an applicant serving children in any of grades K to 8 is a licensed child care organization, is an entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organization, or has implemented the Michigan Out-of-School Time Standards of Quality if the applicant is an exempt entity and, beginning in 2025-2026, serves at least 15 school-age youth at a single location in grades K to 12. (6) An eligible entity that receives grant funding under subsection (2) shall use the funding only to provide before-school, after-school, before-and-after-school, or summer school programming to children described in subsection (2)(a). The programming offered under subsection (2) must meet all of the following: (a) For programming that is offered by a licensed child care organization, be provided to children and youth in a manner in which the children are physically present at the building or location for which the licensed child care organization received its license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, or, for programming that is offered by an exempt entity serving grades K to 12, be provided to children and youth in a manner in which the children and youth are physically present at a building or location designated by the exempt entity. (b) Provide educational programming in core subject areas, including, but not limited to, mathematics, reading, and science. (c) Provide data to evaluate the program in a form and manner as prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (7) All of the following apply to funding allocated under subsection (2): (a) An amount not to exceed 0.25% of the funding allocated under subsection (2) or $250,000.00, whichever is greater, may be retained by Clinton County RESA for administrative costs. (b) An amount not to exceed $500,000.00 of the funding allocated under subsection (2) must be allocated by Clinton County RESA, as directed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and in collaboration with the center and the Michigan afterschool partnership as needed, to provide statewide evaluation activities of eligible youth served, their families, and programs funded under this section. This evaluation must allow for a comparative analysis between program youth and their peers in grades K to 12. (c) An amount not to exceed 1.5% of the funding allocated under subsection (2) must be allocated by Clinton County RESA, as directed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and in collaboration with the Michigan afterschool partnership, to provide statewide out-of-school time activities and supports including, but not limited to, capacity building initiatives, professional development, and technical assistance to increase the likelihood for implementation of high quality, evidence-based, out-of-school time learning opportunities by eligible entities under subsections (4) and (5). (8) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall award not less than 60% of the funding under subsection (2) to community-based organizations. (9) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section in an amount equal to 1/2 of the grant total upon award of the grant, and the remaining 1/2 of the grant total on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may make payments in full to grantees demonstrating resource needs, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. Grantees that do not comply with reporting requirements, fail to provide the services proposed in their grant application, or close during the grant period may be required to repay the funding they received under this section to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (10) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, in collaboration with the Michigan Afterschool Partnership, shall convene an advisory committee to review the program components listed within this section and make recommendations to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for changes on the program described in this section. The advisory committee shall meet at a schedule set by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, or at least quarterly. The advisory committee shall provide for the involvement of, but not limited to, community-based organizations, regional intermediaries, district administrators, youth, parents, and representatives from the business and philanthropic communities, as appropriate. (11) Subject to subsection (2), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall establish and implement a multi-tiered grant funding structure within its competitive grant process to account for statewide or regional grant applications, as well as midsize grants serving 6 to 14 program sites and smaller grants serving 1 to 5 program sites. (12) As used in this section: (a) âAn entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organizationâ means an entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organization under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, and will be a licensed child care organization before the entity provides services for which a child care organization is required to be licensed under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128. (b) âChild care organizationâ means that term as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (c) âExempt entityâ means an entity described in section 1(1)(i)(i) to (v) of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (d) âLicensed child care organizationâ means a child care organization that has been issued a license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, to operate a child care organization. (e) âSchool-ageâ means a child who is eligible to attend a grade of kindergarten or higher, but is less than 13 years of age. A child is considered to be school age on the first day of the school year in which the child is eligible under section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (f) âStatewide or regional grantâ means a grant to 2 or more entities, community-based organizations, statewide network affiliations, or any combination of those entities working together with the objective of serving more than 2,000 children across at least 15 program sites statewide, or to serve more than 2,000 children across at least 15 program sites within a publicly defined boundary region, and that have a demonstrated track record of success in providing or organizing a statewide or regional system of out-of-school time programs. If an applicant applies for a statewide or regional grant, the applicant and the program sites included on their application may not appear on any other grant application submitted for funding under subsection (2). Sec. 32p. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 to create and implement statewide early learning partnerships. It is the intent of the legislature that these early learning partnerships will provide centralized access points to families for trusted entry into the early childhood system, family and community outreach to build awareness, trust, and referral networks, outreach through child health providers to engage pediatric professionals for early detection of developmental delays or other health needs, and data collection and analysis to provide real-time insights necessary to improve services and systems. (2) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall award at least $16,900,000.00 to eligible intermediate districts for the purposes of this subsection. All of the following apply to funds awarded under this subsection: (a) Intermediate districts must apply for funding in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall award funding to eligible intermediate districts in a way that ensures that families statewide have equitable access to services provided by an early learning partnership. The amount awarded to an eligible intermediate district must not be less than the amount received by the intermediate district in 2024-2025 for local great start collaboratives. At least $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to eligible intermediate districts in a manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to support MiFamily engagement regional centers. To be eligible for funds awarded under this subdivision, intermediate districts must partner with an entity with expertise in family leadership, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (c) Intermediate districts must use funding received under this subsection for the following purposes: (i) Convening early learning partnerships on a regular basis to ensure early childhood system building and the development of implementation strategies through active partnerships with families and multiple community organizations. (ii) Improving family access, leadership, and engagement in early childhood education. (iii) Enhancing child development, learning, and well-being. (iv) Creating strong, efficient community systems. (v) Providing universal developmental screening and follow-up support through care coordinators. (vi) Participating in a coordinated, statewide enrollment system that increases child participation in early care and education programs as described in subsection (5). (vii) Supporting the following staffing costs in each early learning partnership: (A) At least 0.8 FTE for a lead position to provide system-building capacity by facilitating the implementation of program components and activities, ensuring initiatives are data-driven, completing annual program assessments, connecting families to developmental screening, and ensuring intermediate districts have dedicated care coordinators. (B) At least 0.5 FTE for a care coordinator within each intermediate district. Care coordinators are responsible for answering questions from families, providing follow-up services related to developmental screenings and referrals, tracking data, and providing cross-sector coordination to ensure families are seamlessly connected to the full scope of services within the intermediate district region. (3) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $3,900,000.00 for evidence-based, family-centered, data-driven family support services, including, but not limited to, home visiting programs that comply with the requirements of 2012 PA 291, MCL 400.791 to 400.798. Funds allocated under this subsection must be expended in a form and manner determined jointly by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential and the department of health and human services. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this subsection to an intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent for these funds on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall award at least $4,000,000.00 to eligible intermediate districts for the purpose of improving access to books and other literacy materials for children from birth to age 5. An intermediate district must apply for these funds in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential and may use the funding to support programs, including, but not limited to, the Dolly Parton Imagination Library, Reach Out and Read Michigan, or any other program that provides books and literacy materials to children from birth to age 5 and educates families on the importance of frequently reading aloud with children. If funding available under this subsection is insufficient to fully fund all interested intermediate districts and families, funding to each intermediate district must prioritize enrollment to those families with the highest levels of economic need. (5) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for an intermediate district to partner with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential and community-based organizations to raise awareness about the availability of services through early learning partnerships and to develop systems to identify and reach out to families. All of the following apply to funding under this subsection: (a) Funding under this subsection must be used for the following purposes: (i) Organizing community events and outreach activities to inform parents about early learning partnerships, the positive impacts of early childhood education, and additional early childhood programs available to families. (ii) Developing and implementing a coordinated statewide enrollment system that allows providers to advertise available services and allows families to enroll in early education programs. The system described in this subparagraph must include information about additional early childhood programs for families to increase participation in early care and education. (b) Families are not required to participate in early learning partnerships. (6) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may award up to $1,200,000.00 to intermediate districts to administer or provide services, programs, or resources required by this section that would otherwise be administered or provided by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. Funds awarded under this subsection may be distributed as follows: (a) Up to $50,000.00 to Oakland Schools to provide strategic leadership in collaboration with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to ensure accountability, efficacy, and consistent implementation of programs under this section to a national fidelity standard, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) Up to $1,150,000.00 to Clinton County RESA to collaborate with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to provide statewide leadership, technical assistance, a central access point, community outreach, and administrative support. (7) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. Sec. 32v. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $21,700,000.00, and from the great start readiness reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $8,300,000.00 to implement early childhood workforce development initiatives. (2) The department must award funding under this section to an intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts to serve as a fiscal agent. In collaboration with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, the department shall direct funds allocated to an intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts for initiatives that will support any of the following objectives: (a) Increasing the number of early childhood workers in the great start readiness program, child care, and Head Start. (b) Enhancing professional development and career advancement opportunities for early childhood workers. (c) Implementing early childhood worker recruitment and retention strategies, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) Stipends, grants, or reimbursements for eligible postsecondary costs, travel, or housing expenses, as determined by the department. (ii) Bonus or incentive payments, or implementation of compensation structures intended to recruit, retain, or reward eligible early childhood workers. (iii) Payment of costs associated with the provision of health care, retirement, or paid leave benefits to early childhood workers. (iv) Matching costs for any other funds allocated to enhance or supplement the implementation of initiatives eligible under this section. (d) Administering the funds under this section and data collection efforts in partnership with at least 1 public university located in this state. At a minimum, data collection efforts must evaluate the effectiveness of early childhood workforce initiatives funded. Total administration and data collection costs must not exceed 5% of the funds allocated under this section. (3) Funds allocated under this section for 2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to support the implementation of early childhood workforce development initiatives. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2029. (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 35a. (1) From the appropriations in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $77,500,000.00 from the state school aid fund and an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund for the purposes of this section. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2027-2028, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes described in this section will be $52,500,000.00. The superintendent shall designate staff or contracted employees funded under this section as critical shortage. For each fiscal year in which funding is allocated under this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall do both of the following: (a) Report in person to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid regarding progress on literacy and be available for questioning as prescribed through a process developed by the chairs of the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid. (b) Submit a written report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid regarding progress on literacy. The report described in this subdivision must include the number of literacy coaches supported by funding provided under subsection (2), including the number of coaches supported in each intermediate district, and the percentage of supported coaches that have received, or are in the process of receiving, professional learning by the approved provider described in subsection (5). (2) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $52,500,000.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of providing literacy coaches at intermediate districts to assist teachers in developing and implementing instructional strategies for pupils in grades pre-K to 5 so that pupils are reading at grade level by the end of grade 3. All of the following apply to funding under this subsection: (a) The department shall develop an application process consistent with the provisions of this subsection. An application must provide assurances that literacy coaches funded under this subsection are knowledgeable about at least the following: (i) Current state literacy standards for pupils in grades pre-K to 3. (ii) Implementing an instructional delivery model based on frequent use of formative, screening, and diagnostic tools, known as a multi-tiered system of supports, to determine individual progress for pupils in grades pre-K to 5 so that pupils are reading at grade level by the end of grade 3. (iii) The use of data from diagnostic tools to determine the necessary additional supports and interventions needed by individual pupils in grades pre-K to 5 to read at grade level. (b) From the allocation under this subsection, the department shall award grants to intermediate districts for the support of literacy coaches. The department shall provide this funding in the following manner: (i) The department shall award each intermediate district grant funding to support the cost of 4 literacy coaches in an equal amount per literacy coach, not to exceed $125,000.00. (ii) After distribution of the grant funding under subparagraph (i), the department shall distribute grant funding for additional literacy coaches in an amount not to exceed $125,000.00 per literacy coach. The department shall ensure that each intermediate district receives funding for at least 1 additional literacy coach compared to the number of coaches funded under this section in 2025-2026. (iii) If funding under this subsection remains available after the distributions in subparagraphs (i) and (ii), the department shall distribute the remaining funds based on the percentage of the total statewide number of pupils in grades K to 3 who meet the income eligibility standards for the federal free and reduced-price lunch programs who are enrolled in districts in the intermediate district. Funds may be distributed under this section only after the department ensures that no intermediate district receives funding for fewer literacy coaches in 2026-2027 compared to the number of coaches for which the intermediate district received funding in 2025-2026. (c) If an intermediate district that receives funding under this subsection uses an assessment tool that screens for characteristics of dyslexia, the intermediate district shall use the assessment results from that assessment tool to identify pupils who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia. (d) All literacy coaches funded under this subsection must have already received, or be making progress toward receiving, professional learning by the approved provider described in subsection (5). (e) To be eligible to receive funding under this subsection, an intermediate district must provide the department with a list by September 1 of the immediately preceding fiscal year containing contact information for all literacy coaches funded under this subsection, in a form and manner determined by the department. An intermediate district shall communicate any personnel changes and changes to contact information for literacy coaches funded under this subsection to the department within 30 days of the personnel change or change in contact information. (f) The department shall develop a coaching evaluation framework to be implemented in alignment to the literacy coaching model described in section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 388.1280f. (g) All literacy coaches funded under this subsection must comply with the requirements described in section 35o. (3) If a district or intermediate district expends any funding received under subsection (2) for professional development in research-based effective reading instruction, the district or intermediate district shall select a professional development program from the list described in subdivision (a). All of the following apply to the requirement under this subsection: (a) The department shall issue a request for proposals for professional development programs in research-based effective reading instruction to develop an initial approved list of professional development programs in research-based effective reading instruction. The department shall make the initial approved list public and shall determine if it will, on a rolling basis, approve any new proposals submitted for addition to its initial approved list. (b) To be included as an approved professional development program in research-based effective reading instruction under subdivision (a), an applicant must demonstrate to the department in writing the programâs competency in all of the following topics: (i) Understanding of phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension. (ii) Appropriate use of assessments and differentiated instruction. (iii) Selection of appropriate instructional materials. (iv) Application of research-based instructional practices. (c) As used in this subsection, âeffective reading instructionâ means reading instruction scientifically proven to result in improvement in pupil reading skills. (4) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $25,000,000.00, and from the educator fellowship public provider fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only to an intermediate district identified by the department for the provision of professional learning by the approved provider described in subsection (5). All of the following apply to funding under this subsection: (a) Funds must first be used to provide the professional learning described in subsection (5) to all of the following: (i) Pre-K to grade 5 educators that provide, support, or oversee pre-K to grade 5 reading instruction. (ii) Special education educators. (iii) Administrators overseeing individuals described in subparagraphs (i) and (ii). (iv) Literacy coaches. (v) Faculty and staff at educator preparation programs that teach reading fundamental courses. (vi) Partners that lead regional and statewide literacy professional development, as determined by the department. (b) If funds remain after the allocation of funds under subdivision (a), districts that establish a public goal to train all qualifying staff may receive the following: (i) Access to personalized training and support for district-wide implementation at no additional cost to the district. (ii) If funding is available, grants to support district-wide completion of the professional learning described in subsection (5). Eligible costs under this subparagraph include hiring substitute teachers and compensating participants for additional time. (c) For purposes of this subsection, the approved provider described in subsection (5) must establish and manage professional learning opportunities that are open to all school personnel described in this subsection. (5) For the provision of professional learning to the school personnel described in subsection (4), LETRS is the approved provider of professional learning as long as LETRS continues to meet all of the following: (a) Be offered through a system of training that provides educators with the knowledge base to effectively implement any class-wide, supplemental, or intervention reading approach and to determine why some students struggle with reading, writing, spelling, and language. (b) Provide training activities that direct educators to implement effective reading and spelling instruction supported by scientifically based research and foster a direct explicit instructional sequence that uses techniques to support teachersâ independence in using their newly-learned skills with students in the classroom. (c) Include integrated components for educators and administrators in pre-K to grade 3 with embedded evaluation or assessment of knowledge. Evaluation or assessment of knowledge under this subdivision must incorporate evaluations of learning throughout each unit and include a summative assessment that must be completed to demonstrate successful course completion. (d) Build teacher content knowledge and pedagogical knowledge of the critical components of literacy including how the brain learns to read, phonological and phonemic awareness; letter knowledge; phonics; advanced phonics; vocabulary and oral language; fluency; comprehension; spelling and writing; and the organization of language. (e) Support educators in understanding how to effectively use screening, progress monitoring, and diagnostic assessment data to improve literacy outcomes through prevention and intervention for reading difficulties in a multi-tiered system of supports. The multi-tiered system of supports must include at least all of the following essential components: (i) Team-based leadership. (ii) A tiered delivery system. (iii) Selection and implementation of instruction, interventions, and supports. (iv) A comprehensive screening and assessment system. (v) Continuous data-based decision making. (f) On a quarterly basis, report all of the following information to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department: (i) The total number of individuals who have completed the required professional learning, organized by role group. (ii) The total number of individuals who are enrolled in the professional learning, organized by role group. (iii) The total number of individuals who enrolled but withdrew from the professional learning prior to completion, organized by role group. (iv) The total number of individuals who enrolled but transferred to a different cohort prior to completion, organized by role group. (v) The cost per individual to enroll in the professional learning. (vi) The total grant funds expended for all individuals who completed or enrolled in the professional learning during the quarter reported. (vii) The total unused grant funds for the quarter reported. (viii) The strategies and technical assistance provided to support participant completion. (6) As used in this section: (a) âDyslexiaâ means both of the following: (i) A specific learning disorder that is neurobiological in origin and characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities that typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction. (ii) A specific learning disorder that may include secondary consequences, such as problems in reading comprehension and a reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge and lead to social, emotional, and behavioral difficulties. (b) âEvidence-basedâ means an activity, program, process, service, strategy, or intervention that demonstrates statistically significant effects on improving pupil outcomes or other relevant outcomes and that meets at least both of the following: (i) At least 1 of the following: (A) Is based on strong evidence from at least 1 well-designed and well-implemented experimental study. (B) Is based on moderate evidence from at least 1 well-designed and well-implemented quasi-experimental study. (C) Is based on promising evidence from at least 1 well-designed and well-implemented correlational study with statistical controls for selection bias. (D) Demonstrates a rationale based on high-quality research findings or positive evaluation that the activity, program, process, service, strategy, or intervention is likely to improve pupil outcomes or other relevant outcomes. (ii) Includes ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the activity, program, process, service, strategy, or intervention. (c) âExplicitâ means direct and deliberate instruction through continuous pupil-teacher interaction that includes teacher modeling, guided practice, and independent practice. (d) âFluencyâ means the ability to read with speed, accuracy, and proper expression. (e) âMulti-tiered system of supportsâ means a comprehensive framework that includes 3 distinct tiers of instructional support and is composed of a collection of evidence-based strategies designed to meet the individual needs and assets of a whole pupil at all achievement levels. (f) âPhonemic awarenessâ means the conscious awareness of all of the following: (i) Individual speech sounds, including, but not limited to, consonants and vowels, in spoken syllables. (ii) The ability to consciously manipulate through, including, but not limited to, matching, blending, segmenting, deleting, or substituting, individual speech sounds described in subparagraph (i). (iii) All levels of the speech sound system, including, but not limited to, word boundaries, rhyme recognition, stress patterns, syllables, onset-rime units, and phonemes. (g) âPhonologicalâ means relating to the system of contrastive relationships among the speech sounds that constitute the fundamental components of a language. (h) âProgress monitoringâ means the assessing of studentsâ academic performance, quantifying studentsâ rates of improvement or progress toward goals, and determining how students are responding to instruction. (i) âRapid automatized naming (RAN)â means a task that measures how quickly individuals can name objects; pictures; colors; or symbols, including letters and digits, aloud, which can predict later reading abilities for preliterate children. Sec. 35d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for the department to provide grants to districts and intermediate districts for the purchase of 1 or more components or trainings through an eligible teacher training program for children with dyslexia from a provider of an eligible teacher training program for children with dyslexia as described in this section. It is intended that supports funded under this section assist with the implementation of dyslexia requirements under section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f. (2) A provider that provides programming that meets all of the following criteria is considered to be a provider of an eligible teacher training program for purposes of this section: (a) The programming allows teachers to incorporate the 5 components essential to an effective reading program into their daily lessons. The 5 components described in this subdivision are phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and comprehension. (b) The programming trains educators to teach reading using a proven, multisensory approach. (c) The programming educates teachers on how to explicitly and effectively teach reading to beginning readers. (d) The programming breaks reading and spelling down into smaller skills involving letters and sounds, and then builds on these skills over time. (e) The programming uses multisensory teaching strategies to teach reading by using sight, hearing, touch, and movement to help students connect and learn the concepts being taught. (3) Districts and intermediate districts may apply to the department for grants to purchase components or training through an eligible teacher training program from a provider of an eligible teacher training program, and, upon receiving an application and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the department shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts for those purchases. The department shall make payments under this section on a first-come, first-served basis until funds are depleted. Sec. 35m. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 for the purposes described in this section, including payments to improve educational outcomes in literacy. (2) The department shall continue the committee for literacy achievement that includes representatives of higher education and early childhood literacy educators who have expertise in literacy instruction and research. The committee shall exist until at least September 2029. The department shall appoint the members of the committee for literacy achievement. The department shall develop a process to identify and assemble experts for the committee. The primary focus of the committee is to recommend tools and strategies with the goal of increasing student academic outcomes in the area of literacy. The committee is encouraged to collaborate with the Michigan Education Research Institute or other entities with similar expertise on the subject of literacy. The department shall determine the size and benchmarks of the committee. The committee shall do all of the following: (a) Critically evaluate literacy series and materials. The committee shall evaluate with research-based outcomes, using the committeeâs expertise in the field of literacy. The committee shall assign grade tiers to the series based on the seriesâ likelihood to increase student literacy outcomes. Priority must be given to series that already have a demonstrated history of increasing student outcomes. The committee may perform an evaluation under this subdivision based on submissions from a vendor, but must independently verify the validity of information provided by the vendor. The committee is also strongly encouraged to evaluate available materials not submitted to the department by a vendor. (b) Critically evaluate literacy professional development. The committee shall evaluate with research-based outcomes, using the committeeâs expertise in the field of literacy. The committee shall assign grade tiers to the professional development based on the professional developmentâs likelihood to increase student literacy outcomes. Priority must be given to professional development that already has a demonstrated history of increasing student outcomes. The committee may perform an evaluation under this subdivision based on submissions from a vendor, but must independently verify the validity of information provided by the vendor. The committee is also strongly encouraged to evaluate available materials not submitted to the department by a vendor. (c) Critically evaluate other applicable literacy tools or services the committee determines to have a high likelihood or demonstrated history of increasing student literacy outcomes. The committee may perform an evaluation under this subdivision based on submissions from a vendor, but must independently verify the validity of information provided by the vendor. The committee is also strongly encouraged to evaluate available materials not submitted to the department by a vendor. (d) Create, maintain, and post annually on a publicly available website a rankings list of all literacy series and other items the committee has evaluated. This includes items from each part of the rankings list, items evaluated in the 2024-2025 school year, and any subsequent items evaluated going forward. The committee shall denote on the list whether major changes have been made to a literacy series or other item on the list since the literacy series or other item was evaluated by the committee and if the literacy series or other item has not been evaluated since the last ranking. The rankings list created in this subdivision must align with the list of evidence-based tier 1, classwide elementary reading curricula and materials that are aligned with science of reading methods that research has shown to improve literacy outcomes and help pupils achieve reading proficiency as required under section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f. A list described in this subdivision may include a maximum of 15 recommendations. Additional items may be evaluated. However, only the top 15 may be recommended for use. (3) An individual on the committee shall recuse themselves from evaluating literacy series and other items that the individual has helped create, that the individual would benefit from financially, or for which the individual has any other conflict of interest. (4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), the department shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts in an amount necessary, as determined by the department, for a district or intermediate district to implement the chosen literacy item. (5) From the funding allocated in subsection (1), the department may pay an annual stipend of up to $8,000.00 for each member of the committee for literacy achievement who is employed by or at a public institution of higher education, a district, or an intermediate district. A stipend must be commensurate with the committee memberâs contribution to the committee. Funding must be paid to the public institution of higher education, the district, or the intermediate district where the committee member is employed, and the public institution of higher education, the district, or the intermediate district must then use funding received to award the stipend directly to the individual committee member. A committee member who is not employed by or at a public institution of higher education, a district, or an intermediate district is not eligible to receive a stipend under this subsection. (6) To be eligible for funding under this section, a district or intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department. As a condition of receiving the funding, the district or intermediate district must agree to provide to the department information twice a year, on or before May 1 and October 1, on the literacy series and other items used for the previous and current school years, and the literacy series and other items to be used for the next school year. The literacy series and other items used by districts and intermediate districts must be added to the annual rankings required under subsection (2). (7) Except as otherwise provided in this section and notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 35o. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $6,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 to an intermediate district in which the combined total number of pupils in membership of all of its constituent districts is the fewest among all intermediate districts in this state to improve literacy instruction in alignment with the science of reading and section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f. (2) Funding under this subsection must be used by the intermediate district described in subsection (1), in partnership with an association that represents intermediate district administrators in this state, to do all of the following: (a) Maintain, and update as necessary based on research, the stateâs literacy essentials and disciplinary literacy essentials for grades pre-K to 12, including teacher and principal training modules and materials. (b) Lead face-to-face and online professional learning on the stateâs literacy essentials and disciplinary literacy essentials for grades pre-K to 12 for literacy coaches, principals, and teachers. (c) Lead face-to-face and online professional learning for school and district administrators and leadership teams about leading systems that support effective literacy instruction in all classrooms. (d) Facilitate a statewide network of literacy coaches that ensures consistent use of evidence-based literacy practices including monthly communities of practice, regular coaching intensives, and an annual institute. In addition to completing training from the approved provider of professional learning described in section 35a(5), all literacy coaches funded under section 35a(2) must do all of the following, as applicable: (i) Participate in the statewide coaching network described in this subdivision. (ii) Participate in at least 1 coaching intensive. (iii) Attend the annual institute. (iv) Complete the literacy essentials and coaching modules. (v) For literacy coaches who are new to the network, attend a new coach kickoff. (e) Place regional lead literacy coaches to facilitate professional learning for literacy coaches. Regional lead literacy coaches described in this subdivision shall provide support for literacy coaches, teachers, and administrators, and shall facilitate regional data collection to evaluate the effectiveness of statewide literacy coaches funded under this section. (f) Meet monthly with the department and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to align efforts and achieve statewide goals to train every educator in the science of reading. (3) By not later than September 1 of each year, the intermediate district described in subsection (1), in consultation with grant recipients, shall submit a report to the chairs of the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for education legislation, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the state budget director, and the directors of the departments of education and lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The report described in this subdivision must include coaching cycle data by intermediate district, statewide student achievement results in English language arts, and survey results with feedback from teachers and administrators regarding the initiatives implemented under this section. (4) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this section may be used by the association representing intermediate district administrators that is in partnership with the intermediate district as described in subsection (1) to administer this section. Sec. 35p. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 to implement high-impact tutoring programs through eligible tutoring partners in eligible districts. (2) Eligible tutoring partners shall apply for funding in a form and manner determined by the department. An application for funding described in this subsection must include at least all of the following: (a) An identification of a district or intermediate district that will serve as a fiscal agent for awarded funds. (b) A list of district partners that will be recipients of high-impact tutoring from the eligible tutoring partner, including a letter of support from each district that affirms their commitment to ensure alignment with tier 1 instruction, implementation fidelity, including, but not limited to, student usage and frequency, and participation in data sharing and training necessary to maximize outcomes. (c) Projections for the number of students who will be served, broken down by partner district. (d) A description of the efficacious nature of the eligible tutoring partnerâs program, including the ability of the eligible tutoring partner to hit certain benchmarks and goals, based on evidence. (e) A plan for how the eligible tutoring partner will target high-impact tutoring for the highest need student populations based on some or all of the following criteria: (i) Statewide assessment data. (ii) Screeners or formative assessment scores. (iii) Economically disadvantaged status. (iv) Special education status. (v) English language learner status. (f) A planned budget for the high-impact tutoring program provided, including the total dollars necessary to serve the identified student population and an estimate of the percentage of awarded dollars that would be directly deployed for high-impact tutoring. (g) A commitment to provide periodic reporting to each district served and to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, to ensure funds are being spent in accordance with this section. (h) A commitment to return any or all funds awarded if the department determines dollars are used in a way that violates this section. (i) Any additional information required by the department to make informed decisions on awarding competitive grants under this section and to ensure financial stewardship of awarded dollars. (3) The department shall award grants to applicants on a competitive basis, using at least all of the following in making award determinations: (a) The cost effectiveness of the application based on the number of students projected to be served, the total requested budget, and the demonstrated outcome capacity of the high-impact tutoring program. (b) The reasonability that the eligible tutoring partner will be able to meet the stated outcome benchmarks. (c) Other criteria, as determined by the department, to ensure grants are awarded to the most impactful applicants. (4) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is not sufficient to fully fund all eligible tutoring partners that apply for funding, the department must prioritize grant awards to districts with the lowest levels of literacy proficiency, as determined by student scores on the Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP). (5) The department may approve applications from eligible tutoring partners that offer innovative ways to reach students at a lower cost by waiving elements of high-impact tutoring described in subsection (11). This must include, but is not limited to, offering virtual programs. In such cases, the eligible tutoring partner submitting the application must provide evidence of program impact and implement an outcomes-based contract model. (6) It is the intent of the legislature that the work associated with the grant application, oversight, and administration of awards under this section be performed primarily by the eligible tutoring partner and not by districts that have agreed to receive high-impact tutoring. (7) If a district or intermediate district agrees to receive high-impact tutoring from an eligible tutoring partner, the district or intermediate district must do all of the following: (a) Work with the eligible tutoring partner to identify students that would benefit from the program. The district or intermediate district must communicate with parents or legal guardians of identified students to describe the available program, outline possible student outcomes, and encourage student participation. (b) To the extent possible, integrate the high-impact tutoring program with the districtâs Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP) plan. (c) If the district or intermediate district is the fiscal agent for the eligible tutoring partner, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, forward the amount awarded to the tutoring partner. The designated fiscal agent may retain up to 0.5% of the funding awarded to the tutoring partner for administrative purposes. (8) All of the following apply to the funds allocated under this section: (a) The department shall make award determinations and notifications by not later than January 15, 2027. (b) The department shall make initial payments to identified fiscal agents by no later than March 1, 2027. Identified fiscal agents shall forward funding to eligible tutoring partners by not later than March 15, 2027. (c) Eligible tutoring partners shall begin deploying services in recipient districts and intermediate districts before the end of the 2026-2027 school year. (9) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated $600,000.00 to the Clinton County Regional Educational Service Agency to work with the Michigan Association of Intermediate School Administrators (MAISA), to do all of the following: (a) Provide a report on high-impact tutoring programs implemented with the funding allocated under subsection (1). (b) Develop and provide technical assistance to districts in selecting high-impact tutoring strategies and integrating these strategies into district Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP) plans. Developing and providing technical assistance may include the design, review, and integration of eligible tutoring programs within the MiStrategyBank. (c) Collect, aggregate, and report data in collaboration with the MAISA Michigan Collaborative Hub. An amount not to exceed $300,000.00 of the funds allocated under this subsection may be used for this purpose. (d) Provide an annual report of the impact of high-impact tutoring programs to the office of the governor, the senate and house education committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, and the state budget director. (10) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated not more than $5,000,000.00 for a parent-driven tutoring pilot. All of the following apply to the parent-driven tutoring pilot described in this subsection: (a) The department shall award grants to districts to participate in a parent-driven tutoring pilot. The department shall do both of the following when making award determinations under this subdivision: (i) Prioritize applicants in an opportunity index band, as determined under section 6(21), of 4 or higher. (ii) Ensure recipients represent both urban and rural districts and include all geographic regions of this state. (b) A district that receives an award under this subsection shall open an application process to parents and legal guardians of students. The application must include the name of the chosen tutoring provider. Districts shall prioritize applications from parents and legal guardians of students that are economically disadvantaged and most academically at risk. (c) Funds awarded through the application process described in subdivision (b) may be used for tutoring services through an evidence-based tutoring provider with whom the district is not currently partnered. (d) A district receiving funds under this subsection shall make payments directly to the tutoring provider chosen on the application by a parent or legal guardian under subdivision (b). (e) A district receiving funds under this section may retain 2.5% of funds for administration. (f) A district shall provide a final report to the department including how many students participated in tutoring by grade level, which tutoring providers were used, and funds awarded by tutoring provider. (11) As used in this section: (a) âEligible tutoring partnerâ means a tutoring provider, including, but not limited to, a tutoring provider created by for-profit vendors, nonprofit vendors, intermediate districts, districts, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, that provides high-impact tutoring and meets at least 1 of the following: (i) Is included on the ProvenTutoring list maintained by the Center for Research and Reform in Education at Johns Hopkins University. (ii) Has a Tutoring Program Design Badge as awarded by the National Student Support Accelerator, a program of the SCALE Initiative at Stanford University. (iii) Is a vetted high-impact tutoring program included in the MiStrategyBank. If necessary, the Michigan Association of Intermediate School Administrators may convene a committee to review tutoring programs for inclusion in the MiStrategyBank. (b) âHigh-impact tutoringâ means, except as otherwise provided in this section, in-person tutoring that meets all of the following: (i) Occurs before, during, or after the school day. (ii) Is individualized, with tutor ratios not higher than 1:4. (iii) Provides intensive support with a minimum of 2 sessions per week. (iv) Uses a structured, evidence-based curriculum designed for tutoring, with formative assessments to track progress. (v) Uses trained tutors. (vi) Includes ongoing assessment and feedback. Sec. 35q. (1) By not later than March 1, 2027, the department, in collaboration with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the center, shall publish to a publicly accessible location on its website and shall update periodically thereafter, as new data becomes available, a literacy achievement and opportunity transparency dashboard that includes at least the following: (a) The percentage of children in this state with access to free, full-day pre-K opportunities. (b) The percentage of pre-K to grade 5 educators in this state who are trained in the science of reading. (c) The percentage of districts in this state using a curriculum funded under section 35m. (d) Literacy-related results, including multiyear trend data, from the following state assessments: (i) The grade 3 Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP). (ii) The grade 7 Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP). (iii) The SAT. (iv) The National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP). (e) Additional metrics that help the public and policymakers track statewide literacy progress. (f) A summary of activities the state is taking to improve literacy outcomes. (2) The data published under subsection (1) must be disaggregated by district and school demographics where possible. Sec. 36. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for the purposes described in this section, including payments to improve educational outcomes in mathematics. (2) The department shall create the committee for mathematics achievement, which must include representatives of higher education and mathematics educators who have expertise in mathematics instruction and research. The committee shall exist until at least September 2029. The department shall appoint the members of the committee for mathematics achievement. The department shall develop a process to identify and assemble experts for the committee for mathematics achievement. The primary focus of the committee for mathematics achievement is to recommend curricula and materials with the goal of increasing student academic outcomes in the area of mathematics. The committee for mathematics achievement is encouraged to collaborate with entities with expertise on the subject of mathematics. The department shall determine the size and benchmarks of the committee for mathematics achievement. The committee for mathematics achievement shall do all of the following: (a) Critically evaluate K to 5 mathematics curricula and materials. The committee for mathematics achievement shall evaluate with research-based outcomes, using the committee for mathematics achievementâs expertise in the field of mathematics. The committee for mathematics achievement shall assign grade tiers to a curriculum based on the curriculumâs likelihood of increasing student mathematics outcomes. Priority must be given to curricula that already have a demonstrated history of increasing student outcomes. The committee for mathematics achievement may perform an evaluation under this subdivision based on submissions from a vendor, but must independently verify the validity of information provided by the vendor. The committee for mathematics achievement is also strongly encouraged to evaluate available materials not submitted to the department by a vendor. (b) Create, maintain, and annually post on a publicly available website a rankings list of all K to 5 mathematics curricula the committee for mathematics achievement has evaluated. This includes items from each part of the rankings list, items evaluated in the 2026-2027 school year, and any subsequent items evaluated going forward. The committee for mathematics achievement shall denote on the list whether major changes have been made to a mathematics curriculum on the list since the mathematics curriculum was evaluated by the committee for mathematics achievement and if the mathematics curriculum has not been evaluated since the last ranking. (c) The committee for mathematics achievement must select not more than 5 mathematics curricula to recommend for purchase by districts. (3) An individual on the committee for mathematics achievement shall recuse themselves from evaluating mathematics curricula or other items that the individual has helped create, that the individual would benefit from financially, or for which the individual has any other conflict of interest. (4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), and subject to subsection (6), the department shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts in an amount determined by the department. The department shall not make payments under this subsection until the committee for mathematics achievement has critically evaluated as many mathematics curricula and other items from subsection (2) as possible. Payments under this subsection may be used only to purchase 1 of the 5 mathematics curricula described in subsection (2)(c). If funding remains after all payments have been made to districts and intermediate districts, the department may open a second round of applications. The department shall award funding under this subsection as a formula grant in an amount equal to the amount necessary for the district or intermediate district to implement the chosen mathematics curriculum or other item until funding is depleted. The department may place a cap on the total award per district or intermediate district. (5) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), the department may pay an annual stipend of up to $8,000.00 for each member of the committee for mathematics achievement who is employed by or at a public institution of higher education, a district, or an intermediate district. A stipend paid under this subsection must be commensurate with the committee memberâs contribution to the committee for mathematics achievement. Funding must be paid to the public institution of higher education, the district, or the intermediate district where the committee member is employed, and the public institution of higher education, the district, or the intermediate district must then use funding received to award the stipend directly to the individual committee member. A committee member who is not employed by or at a public institution of higher education, a district, or an intermediate district is not eligible to receive a stipend under this subsection. (6) To be eligible for funding under subsection (4), a district or intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department. As a condition of receiving the funding, the district or intermediate district must agree to provide to the department information twice per year, on or before May 1 and October 1, on the mathematics curriculum used for the previous and current school years, and the mathematics curriculum and other items to be used for the next school year. The mathematics curricula used by districts and intermediate districts described in this subsection must be added to the annual rankings required under subsection (2). (7) Except as otherwise provided in this section and notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (8) Funds allocated under subsection (1) for 2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to improve mathematics instructional practices. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2029. Sec. 36a. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for the purposes described in this section, including payments to improve educational outcomes in STEM. (2) The department shall create the committee for STEM achievement, which must include representatives of higher education and STEM educators who have expertise in STEM instruction and research. The committee for STEM achievement shall exist until at least September 2029. The department shall appoint the members of the committee for STEM achievement. The department shall develop a process to identify and assemble experts for the committee for STEM achievement. The primary focus of the committee for STEM achievement is to recommend tools and strategies with the goal of increasing student academic outcomes in the areas of STEM. The committee for STEM achievement is encouraged to collaborate with entities with expertise on the subject of STEM. The department shall determine the size and benchmarks of the committee for STEM achievement. The committee for STEM achievement shall do both of the following: (a) Critically evaluate applicable STEM tools or services for classroom instruction for pupils in grades 3 to 8 that the committee for STEM achievement determines to have a high likelihood or demonstrated history of increasing student STEM outcomes. The committee for STEM achievement may perform an evaluation under this subdivision based on submissions from a vendor, but must independently verify the validity of information provided by the vendor. The committee for STEM achievement is also strongly encouraged to evaluate available materials not submitted to the department by a vendor. (b) Create, maintain, and post annually on a publicly available website a rankings list of all STEM items that the committee for STEM achievement has evaluated. This includes items from each part of the rankings list, items evaluated in the 2026-2027 school year, and any subsequent items evaluated going forward. The committee for STEM achievement shall denote on the list whether major changes have been made to a STEM item on the list since the STEM item was evaluated by the committee for STEM achievement and if the STEM item has not been evaluated since the last ranking. (3) An individual on the committee for STEM achievement shall recuse themselves from evaluating STEM items that the individual has helped create, that the individual would benefit from financially, or for which the individual has any other conflict of interest. (4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), the department shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts in an amount determined by the department. The department shall not make payments under this subsection until the committee for STEM achievement has critically evaluated as many STEM items from subsection (2) as possible. If funding remains after all payments have been made to districts and intermediate districts, the department may open a second round of applications. The department shall award funding under this subsection as a formula grant in an amount equal to the amount necessary for the district or intermediate district to implement the chosen STEM item until funding is depleted. The department may place a cap on the total award per district or intermediate district. Funds under this subsection may not be used to purchase curricula that may be purchased using funds under section 36. (5) From the funding allocated in subsection (1), the department may pay an annual stipend of up to $8,000.00 for each member of the committee for STEM achievement who is employed by or at a public institution of higher education, a district, or an intermediate district. A stipend paid under this subsection must be commensurate with the committee memberâs contribution to the committee for STEM achievement. Funding must be paid to the public institution of higher education, the district, or the intermediate district where the committee member is employed, and the public institution of higher education, the district, or the intermediate district must then use funding received to award the stipend directly to the individual committee member. A committee member who is not employed by or at a public institution of higher education, a district, or an intermediate district is not eligible to receive a stipend under this subsection. (6) To be eligible for funding under this section, a district or intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department. As a condition of receiving the funding, the district or intermediate district must agree to provide to the department information twice per year, on or before May 1 and October 1, on the STEM items used for the previous and current school years, and the STEM items to be used for the next school year. The STEM items used by districts and intermediate districts must be added to the annual rankings required under subsection (2). (7) Except as otherwise provided in this section and notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (8) Funds allocated under subsection (1) for 2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to improve STEM instructional practices. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2029. (9) As used in this section, âSTEMâ means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics. Sec. 39. (1) An eligible applicant receiving funds under section 32d shall submit an application, in a form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, by a date specified by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential in the immediately preceding fiscal year. An eligible applicant is not required to amend the applicantâs current accounting cycle or adopt this stateâs fiscal year accounting cycle in accounting for financial transactions under this section. The application must include all of the following: (a) The estimated total number of age-eligible children in the community, as provided to the applicant by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential utilizing the most recent population data available from the American Community Survey conducted by the United States Census Bureau. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall ensure that it provides updated American Community Survey population data at least once every 3 years. (b) The estimated number of age-eligible children in the community who are being served exclusively by Head Start programs operating in the community. (c) The number of children whom the applicant will have the capacity to serve in each eligible great start readiness program option who meet the age-eligible criteria of section 32d. (2) The great start readiness target foundation amount for 2026-2027 is $11,736.00. (3) After notification of funding allocations, an applicant receiving funds under section 32d shall also submit an implementation plan for approval, in a form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, by a date specified by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, that details how the applicant complies with the program components established by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential under section 32d. (4) Subject to subsection (5), the initial allocation to each eligible applicant under section 32d is equal to the sum of the following: (a) The number of children in the current school year served in a program determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to be a school-day program multiplied by the great start readiness target foundation. (b) The number of children in the current school year served in a program determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to be a part-day program or a school-day blended with Head Start multiplied by the great start readiness target foundation divided by 2. (c) The total number of children in the current school year served in a program determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to be an extended program multiplied by the great start readiness target foundation multiplied by 1.2. (d) The number of children in the current school year served in a program determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to be an extended program blended with Head Start or a part-day extended program multiplied by the great start readiness target foundation multiplied by 0.6. (5) Subject to subsection (6), if the calculations under subsection (4) result in a total allocation exceeding the amount available as allocated or appropriated under section 32d(2), initial allocations to each eligible applicant under section 32d are calculated as the sum of the following: (a) An amount equal to the calculations described in subsection (4) but using for those calculations the lesser of the number of children served in the immediately preceding fiscal year or the number of children the applicant has the capacity to serve in the current fiscal year instead of the number of children served in the current fiscal year. (b) An amount equal to the remaining available dollars after calculations in subdivision (a) distributed proportionately to eligible applicants where calculations under subdivision (a) are less than the amount originally calculated under subsection (4). (6) If the calculations under subsection (5) result in a total allocation exceeding the amount available as allocated or appropriated under section 32d(2), the initial allocation to each eligible applicant is the amount calculated under subsection (4) prorated on an equal percentage basis. (7) If, taking into account the total amount to be allocated to the applicant as calculated under this section, an applicant determines that it is able to include additional eligible children in the great start readiness program without additional funds under section 32d, the applicant may include additional eligible children but does not receive additional funding under section 32d for those children. (8) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall review the program components under section 32d and under this section at least biennially. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential also shall convene a committee of internal and external stakeholders at least once every 5 years to ensure that the funding structure under this section reflects current system needs under section 32d. (9) Each intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts that receives funds under section 32d shall report all of the following to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential by not later than September 15 of the immediately preceding fiscal year, December 15, and March 15: (a) The total number of children enrolled in all great start readiness programs administered by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts, disaggregated by program type and by provider type. (b) The total number of children on a waitlist for all great start readiness programs administered by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts. (c) The estimated total capacity of all great start readiness programs administered by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts. (10) By not later than October 1, January 1, and April 1 of each fiscal year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall report to the house and senate fiscal agencies and the state budget office on the data collected under subsection (9), disaggregated by intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts. The report must include grant application information included under subsection (1) for each intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall submit the report described in this subsection in a spreadsheet-compatible format. (11) To assist the legislature in determining necessary funding levels to support payments for the great start readiness program as calculated under this section, each revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b, must include an estimated enrollment in great start readiness programs for the current and two subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 39a. (1) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities all available federal funding, estimated at $1,100.00 for the federal programs under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. These funds are allocated as follows: (a) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 to provide students with drug- and violence-prevention programs and to implement strategies to improve school safety, funded from DED-OESE, drug-free schools and communities funds. (b) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of preparing, training, and recruiting high-quality teachers and class size reduction, funded from DED-OESE, improving teacher quality funds. (c) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for programs to teach English to limited English proficient (LEP) children, funded from DED-OESE, language acquisition state grant funds. (d) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for rural and low-income schools, funded from DED-OESE, rural and low-income school funds. (e) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 to provide supplemental programs to enable educationally disadvantaged children to meet challenging academic standards, funded from DED-OESE, title I, disadvantaged children funds. (f) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of identifying and serving migrant children, funded from DED-OESE, title I, migrant education funds. (g) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of providing high-quality extended learning opportunities, after school and during the summer, for children in low-performing schools, funded from DED-OESE, twenty-first century community learning center funds. (h) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 to help support local school improvement efforts, funded from DED-OESE, title I, local school improvement grants. (i) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 to improve the academic achievement of students, funded from DED-OESE, title IV, student support and academic enrichment grants. (j) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for literacy programs that advance literacy skills for students from birth through grade 12, including, but not limited to, English-proficient students and students with disabilities, funded from DED-OESE, striving readers comprehensive literacy program. (k) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for grants to support and demonstrate innovative partnerships to train school-based mental health service providers, funded from DED-OESE, mental health service professional demonstration grant program. (2) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities all available federal funding, estimated at $500.00 for 2026-2027 for the following programs that are funded by federal grants: (a) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 to provide services to homeless children and youth, funded from DED-OVAE, homeless children and youth funds. (b) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for providing career and technical education services to pupils, funded from DED-OVAE, basic grants to states. (c) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for the Michigan charter school subgrant program, funded from DEDâOII, public charter schools program funds. (d) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of promoting and expanding high-quality preschool services, funded from HHS-OECD preschool development funds. (e) An amount estimated at $100.00 for 2026-2027 for the purpose of addressing priority substance abuse treatment, prevention, and mental health needs, funded from HHS-SAMHSA. (3) The department, or, for subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, shall distribute all federal funds allocated under this section in accordance with federal law and with flexibility provisions outlined in Public Law 107-116, and in the education flexibility partnership act of 1999, Public Law 106-25. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department or the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, as applicable, shall make payments of federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (4) For the purposes of applying for federal grants appropriated under this article, the department, or, for subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, shall allow an intermediate district to submit a consortium application on behalf of 2 or more districts with the agreement of those districts as appropriate according to federal rules and guidelines. (5) For the purposes of funding federal title I grants under this article, in addition to any other federal grants for which the strict discipline academy is eligible, the department, or, for subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, shall allocate to a strict discipline academy out of title I, part A an amount equal to what the strict discipline academy would have received if included and calculated under title I, part D, or what it would receive under the formula allocation under title I, part A, whichever is greater. (6) As used in this section: (a) âDEDâ means the United States Department of Education. (b) âDED-OESEâ means the DED Office of Elementary and Secondary Education. (c) âDED-OIIâ means the DED Office of Innovation and Improvement. (d) âDED-OVAEâ means the DED Office of Vocational and Adult Education. (e) âHHSâ means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (f)Â  âHHS-OECDâ means the HHS Office of Early Childhood Development. (g) âHHS-SAMHSAâ means the HHS Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Project. Sec. 51a. (1) From the state school aid fund money in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $2,125,396,100.00 for 2025-2026 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed $2,264,337,500.00 for 2026-2027. From state sources and all available federal funding under sections 1411 to 1419 of part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1411 to 1419, there is allocated an amount estimated at $500,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 and $100.00 for 2026-2027, plus any carryover federal funds from previous year appropriations. The allocations under this subsection are for the purpose of reimbursing districts and intermediate districts for special education programs, services, and special education personnel as prescribed in article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761; net tuition payments made by intermediate districts to the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind; and special education programs and services for pupils who are eligible for special education programs and services according to statute or rule. For meeting the costs of special education programs and services not reimbursed under this article, a district or intermediate district may use money in general funds or special education funds, not otherwise restricted, or contributions from districts to intermediate districts, tuition payments, gifts and contributions from individuals or other entities, or federal funds that may be available for this purpose, as determined by the intermediate district plan prepared under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments of federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (2) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated the amount necessary, estimated at $457,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 and $495,200,000.00 for 2026-2027, for payments toward reimbursing districts and intermediate districts for 28.6138% of total approved costs of special education, excluding costs reimbursed under section 53a, and 70.4165% of total approved costs of special education transportation. (3) If the department determines that the amount allocated for a fiscal year to a district or intermediate district under subsection (2) is insufficient to fulfill the specified percentages in subsection (2), the department shall pay the shortfall to the district or intermediate district during the fiscal year beginning on the October 1 following the determination. If the department determines that the amount allocated for a fiscal year to a district or intermediate district under subsection (2) exceeds the sum of the amount necessary to fulfill the specified percentages in subsection (2), the department shall deduct the amount of the excess from the districtâs or intermediate districtâs payments under this article for the fiscal year beginning on the October 1 following the determination. (4) State funds are allocated on a total approved cost basis. Federal funds are allocated under applicable federal requirements. (5) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,200,000.00 for 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 to reimburse 100% of the net increase in necessary costs incurred by a district or intermediate district in implementing the revisions in the administrative rules for special education that became effective on July 1, 1987. As used in this subsection, ânet increase in necessary costsâ means the necessary additional costs incurred solely because of new or revised requirements in the administrative rules minus cost savings permitted in implementing the revised rules. The department shall determine net increase in necessary costs in a manner specified by the department. (6) For purposes of this section and sections 51b to 58, all of the following apply: (a) âTotal approved costs of special educationâ are determined in a manner specified by the department and may include indirect costs, but must not exceed 115% of approved direct costs for section 52 and section 53a programs. The total approved costs include salary and other compensation for all approved special education personnel for the program, including payments for Social Security and Medicare and public school employee retirement system contributions. The total approved costs do not include salaries or other compensation paid to administrative personnel who are not special education personnel as that term is defined in section 6 of the revised school code, MCL 380.6. Costs reimbursed by federal funds, other than those federal funds included in the allocation made under this article, are not included. Special education approved personnel not utilized full time in the evaluation of students or in the delivery of special education programs, ancillary, and other related services are reimbursed under this section only for that portion of time actually spent providing these programs and services, with the exception of special education programs and services provided to youth placed in child caring institutions or juvenile detention programs approved by the department to provide an on-grounds education program. (b) Reimbursement for ancillary and other related services, as that term is defined by R 340.1701c of the Michigan Administrative Code, is not provided when those services are covered by and available through private group health insurance carriers or federal reimbursed program sources unless the department and district or intermediate district agree otherwise and that agreement is approved by the state budget director. Expenses, other than the incidental expense of filing, must not be borne by the parent. In addition, the filing of claims must not delay the education of a pupil. A district or intermediate district is responsible for payment of a deductible amount and for an advance payment required until the time a claim is paid. (c) If an intermediate district purchases a special education pupil transportation service from a constituent district that was previously purchased from a private entity; if the purchase from the constituent district is at a lower cost, adjusted for changes in fuel costs; and if the cost shift from the intermediate district to the constituent does not result in any net change in the revenue the constituent district receives from payments under sections 22b and 51c, then upon application by the intermediate district, the department shall direct the intermediate district to continue to report the cost associated with the specific identified special education pupil transportation service and shall adjust the costs reported by the constituent district to remove the cost associated with that specific service. (7) A pupil who is enrolled in a full-time special education program conducted or administered by an intermediate district or a pupil who is enrolled in the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind is not included in the membership count of a district, but is counted in membership in the intermediate district of residence. (8) Special education personnel transferred from 1 district to another to implement the revised school code are entitled to the rights, benefits, and tenure to which the individual would otherwise be entitled had that individual been employed by the receiving district originally. (9) If a district or intermediate district uses money received under this section for a purpose other than the purpose or purposes for which the money is allocated, the department may require the district or intermediate district to refund the amount of money received. The department shall deposit money that is refunded in the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund. (10) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated the amount necessary, estimated at $1,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 and estimated at $1,800,000.00 for 2026-2027, to pay the foundation allowances for pupils described in this subsection. The department shall calculate the allocation to a district under this subsection by multiplying the number of pupils described in this subsection who are counted in membership in the district times the sum of the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupilâs district of residence, plus the amount of the districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m, not to exceed the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, or, for a pupil described in this subsection who is counted in membership in a district that is a public school academy, times an amount equal to the amount per membership pupil under section 20(6). The department shall calculate the allocation to an intermediate district under this subsection in the same manner as for a district, using the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupilâs district of residence not to exceed the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year and that districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m. This subsection applies to all of the following pupils: (a) Pupils described in section 53a. (b) Pupils counted in membership in an intermediate district who are not special education pupils and are served by the intermediate district in a juvenile detention or child caring facility. (c) Pupils with an emotional impairment counted in membership by an intermediate district and provided educational services by the department of health and human services. (11) If it is determined that funds allocated under subsection (2) or (10) or under section 51c will not be expended, funds up to the amount necessary and available may be used to supplement the allocations under subsection (2) or (10) or under section 51c to fully fund those allocations. After payments under subsections (2) and (10) and section 51c, the department shall expend the remaining funds from the allocation in subsection (1) in the following order: (a) One hundred percent of the reimbursement required under section 53a. (b) One hundred percent of the reimbursement required under subsection (5). (c) One hundred percent of the payment required under section 54. (d) One hundred percent of the payments under section 56. (12) The allocations under subsections (2) and (10) are allocations to intermediate districts only and are not allocations to districts, but instead are calculations used only to determine the state payments under section 22b. (13) If a public school academy that is not a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, enrolls under this section a pupil who resides outside of the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located and who is eligible for special education programs and services according to statute or rule, or who is a child with a disability, as that term is defined under the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446, the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located and the public school academy shall enter into a written agreement with the intermediate district in which the pupil resides for the purpose of providing the pupil with a free appropriate public education, and the written agreement must include at least an agreement on the responsibility for the payment of the added costs of special education programs and services for the pupil. If the public school academy that enrolls the pupil does not enter into an agreement under this subsection, the public school academy shall not charge the pupilâs resident intermediate district or the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located the added costs of special education programs and services for the pupil, and the public school academy is not eligible for any payouts based on the funding formula outlined in the resident or nonresident intermediate districtâs plan. If a pupil is not enrolled in a public school academy under this subsection, the provision of special education programs and services and the payment of the added costs of special education programs and services for a pupil described in this subsection are the responsibility of the district and intermediate district in which the pupil resides. (14) For the purpose of receiving its federal allocation under part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446, a public school academy that is a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a, directly receives the federal allocation under part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446, from the intermediate district in which the cyber school is located, as the subrecipient. If the intermediate district does not distribute the funds described in this subsection to the cyber school by the part B application due date of July 1, the department may distribute the funds described in this subsection directly to the cyber school according to the formula prescribed in 34 CFR 300.705 and 34 CFR 300.816. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. (15) For a public school academy that is a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a, that enrolls a pupil under this section, the intermediate district in which the cyber school is located shall ensure that the cyber school complies with sections 1701a, 1703, 1704, 1751, 1752, 1756, and 1757 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701a, 380.1703, 380.1704, 380.1751, 380.1752, 380.1756, and 380.1757; applicable rules; and the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. (16) For the purposes of this section, the department or the center shall only require a district or intermediate district to report information that is not already available from the financial information database maintained by the center. Sec. 51c. As required by the court in the consolidated cases known as Durant v State of Michigan, 456 Mich 175 (1997), from the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 and for 2026-2027 the amount necessary, estimated at $1,056,400,000.00 for 2025-2026 and $1,141,700,000.00 for 2026-2027, for payments to reimburse districts for 28.6138% of total approved costs of special education excluding costs reimbursed under section 53a, and 70.4165% of total approved costs of special education transportation. Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under sections 22a and 22b to fully fund those allocations for the same fiscal year. Sec. 51d. (1) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 all available federal funding, estimated at $300.00, for special education programs and services that are funded by federal grants. The department shall distribute all federal funds allocated under this section in accordance with federal law. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments of federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (2) From the federal funds allocated under subsection (1), the following amounts are allocated: (a) For 2026-2027, an amount estimated at $100.00 for handicapped infants and toddlers, funded from DED-OSERS, handicapped infants and toddlers funds. (b) For 2026-2027, an amount estimated at $100.00 for preschool grants under Public Law 94-142, funded from DED-OSERS, handicapped preschool incentive funds. (c) For 2026-2027, an amount estimated at $100.00 for special education programs funded by DED-OSERS, handicapped program, individuals with disabilities act funds. (3) As used in this section, âDED-OSERSâ means the United States Department of Education Office of Special Education and Rehabilitative Services. Sec. 51e. (1) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated for the amount necessary, estimated at $519,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 and $533,200,000.00 for 2026-2027, for payments to districts and intermediate districts for 100% of foundation allowance costs associated with special education pupils. (2) The department shall calculate the amount allocated to a district under this section by multiplying the districtâs special education pupil membership, excluding pupils described in section 51a(11), times 100% of the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupilâs district of residence, plus 100% of the amount of the districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m, not to exceed 100% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, or, for a special education pupil in membership in a district that is a public school academy, times an amount equal to 100% of the amount per membership pupil calculated under section 20(6). For an intermediate district, the amount allocated under this subsection is an amount per special education membership pupil, excluding pupils described in section 51a(11), and is calculated in the same manner as for a district, using 100% of the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupilâs district of residence, not to exceed 100% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, and 100% of that districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m. Sec. 51g. From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, $3,000,000.00 is allocated for 2026-2027 to an association for administrators of special education services to develop content for use by special education students, teachers, and others. Any content that is developed as described in this section must be accessible throughout this state. Funds received by an association under this section may be used to support the development of assessment tools to measure the needs of students with special education needs in remote learning environments and the effectiveness of various educational methods and tools, in collaboration with the department. Funds under this section may also be utilized to identify any available federal funds for research related to special education in remote learning. Sec. 51i. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that, beginning in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2028, a weighted special education funding formula begins to be implemented to recognize the higher costs associated with certain student needs. (2) It is the intent of the legislature that a weighted special education funding formula described in subsection (1) be implemented in a way to work toward the following target weights for payments to districts and intermediate districts for identified special education students: (a) Speech and language impairment, 1.1. (b) Specific learning disability, 1.1. (c) Other health impairment multiplied, 1.8. (d) Physical impairment multiplied, 3.1. (e) Severe multiple impairments, 3.1. (f) Cognitive impairment, 3.1. (g) Deaf or hard of hearing multiplied, 3.1. (h) Deaf-blindness, 3.1. (i) Emotional impairment multiplied, 3.8. (j) Visual impairment, 3.8. (k) Early childhood developmental delays, 3.8. (l) Autism spectrum disorder, 3.8. (m) Traumatic brain injury, 3.8. (3) It is the intent of the legislature that payments to districts and intermediate districts under the formula described in this section be adjusted to take into account available federal revenue and local revenue generating capacity of recipient districts and intermediate districts. Sec. 53a. (1) For districts, reimbursement for pupils described in subsection (2) is 100% of the total approved costs of operating special education programs and services approved by the department and included in the intermediate district plan adopted under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761, minus the districtâs foundation allowance calculated under section 20 and minus the districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m. For intermediate districts, the department shall calculate reimbursement for pupils described in subsection (2) in the same manner as for a district, using the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupilâs district of residence, not to exceed the target foundation allowance under section 20 for the current fiscal year plus the amount of the districtâs per-pupil allocation under section 20m. (2) Reimbursement under subsection (1) is for the following special education pupils: (a) Pupils assigned to a district or intermediate district through the community placement program of the courts or a state agency, if the pupil was a resident of another intermediate district at the time the pupil came under the jurisdiction of the court or a state agency. (b) Pupils who are residents of institutions operated by the department of health and human services. (c) Pupils who are former residents of department of community health institutions for the developmentally disabled who are placed in community settings other than the pupilâs home. (d) Pupils enrolled in a department-approved on-grounds educational program longer than 180 days, but not longer than 233 days, at a residential child care institution, if the child care institution offered in 1991-92 an on-grounds educational program longer than 180 days but not longer than 233 days. (e) Pupils placed in a district by a parent for the purpose of seeking a suitable home, if the parent does not reside in the same intermediate district as the district in which the pupil is placed. (3) Only those costs that are clearly and directly attributable to educational programs for pupils described in subsection (2), and that would not have been incurred if the pupils were not being educated in a district or intermediate district, are reimbursable under this section. (4) The costs of transportation are funded under this section and are not reimbursed under section 58. (5) The department shall not allocate more than $10,500,000.00 of the allocation for 2026-2027 in section 51a(1) under this section. Sec. 54. (1) Each intermediate district receives an amount per pupil for each pupil in attendance at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. The amount is proportionate to the total instructional cost at each school. The department shall not allocate more than $1,688,000.00 of the allocation for 2026-2027 in section 51a(1) under this subsection. (2) From the state school aid fund money allocated in section 51a(1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $2,841,400.00 for 2026-2027 for the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 54b. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2026-2027 to expand the implementation of the literacy and social, emotional, and behavioral components of a multi-tiered system of supports, including positive behavioral interventions and supports, using the Michigan Multi-Tiered System of Supports Technical Assistance Center. All of the following apply to funds allocated under this section: (a) The department shall use funds allocated under this section, through an intermediate district, for the purpose of expanding the statewide expertise, technical assistance, and implementation of the multi-tiered system of supports, dyslexia expertise, and evidence-based instructional practices grounded in the science of reading using the Michigan Multi-Tiered System of Supports Technical Assistance Center. The department shall identify an intermediate district to act as a fiscal agent for funds allocated under this section. (b) The department shall provide a report each year to the state budget director, the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, and the house and senate fiscal agencies that details the following: (i) The progress being made by districts in implementing multi-tiered systems of supports. (ii) The progress being made by districts in providing reading intervention services described in section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f, for pupils in grades K to 12. (iii) Other information the department determines would be useful to understand the status of districtsâ implementation of effective multi-tiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (c) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this section may be used by the intermediate district serving as the fiscal agent for these funds to administer this section. Sec. 54d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $26,081,900.00 for 2026-2027 to intermediate districts for the purpose of providing state early on services programs for children from birth to 3 years of age with a developmental delay or a disability, or both, and their families, as described in the early on Michigan state plan, as approved by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (2) To be eligible to receive grant funding under this section, each intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (3) The grant funding allocated under this section must be used to increase early on services and resources available to children that demonstrate developmental delays to help prepare them for success as they enter school. State early on services include evaluating and providing early intervention services for eligible infants and toddlers and their families to address developmental delays, including those affecting physical, cognitive, communication, adaptive, social, or emotional development. Grant funds must not be used to supplant existing services that are currently being provided. (4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall distribute the funds allocated under subsection (1) to intermediate districts according to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potentialâs early on funding formula utilized to distribute the federal award to Michigan under part C of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446. Funds received under this section must not supplant existing funds or resources allocated for early on early intervention services. An intermediate district receiving funds under this section shall maximize the capture of Medicaid funds to support early on early intervention services to the extent possible. (5) Each intermediate district that receives funds under this section shall report data and other information to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential in a form, manner, and frequency prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to allow for monitoring and evaluation of the program and to ensure that the children described in subsection (1) received appropriate levels and types of services delivered by qualified personnel, based on the individual needs of the children and their families. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (7) Grant funds awarded and allocated to an intermediate district under this section must be expended by the grant recipient before June 30 of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the funds were received. Sec. 56. (1) For the purposes of this section: (a) âMembershipâ means for a particular fiscal year the total membership of the intermediate district and the districts constituent to the intermediate district, except that if a district has elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, membership of the district is not included in the membership of the intermediate district. (b) âMillage leviedâ means the millage levied for special education under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, including a levy for debt service obligations. (c) âTaxable valueâ means the total taxable value of the districts constituent to an intermediate district, except that if a district has elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, taxable value of the district is not included in the taxable value of the intermediate district. (2) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $40,008,100.00 for 2025-2026 and $40,008,100.00 for 2026-2027 to reimburse intermediate districts levying millages for special education under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741. The purpose, use, and expenditure of the reimbursement are limited as if the funds were generated by these millages and governed by the intermediate district plan adopted under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761. As a condition of receiving funds under this section, an intermediate district distributing any portion of special education millage funds to its constituent districts must submit for departmental approval and implement a distribution plan. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, reimbursement for those millages levied in 2024-2025 is made in 2025-2026 at an amount per 2024-2025 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $278,700.00 the 2024-2025 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2024-2025 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2024-2025 local community stabilization share revenue for special education purposes and 2024-2025 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 62, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of special education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of special education millage levied and vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in section 62. Reimbursement in 2025-2026 for an intermediate district whose 2017-2018 allocation was affected by the operation of subsection (5) is an amount equal to 102.5% of the 2017-2018 allocation to that intermediate district. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, reimbursement for those millages levied in 2025-2026 is made in 2026-2027 at an amount per 2025-2026 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $294,000.00 the 2025-2026 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2025-2026 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2025-2026 local community stabilization share revenue for special education purposes and 2025-2026 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 62, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of special education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of special education millage levied and vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in section 62. Reimbursement in 2026-2027 for an intermediate district whose 2017-2018 allocation was affected by the operation of subsection (5) is an amount equal to 102.5% of the 2017-2018 allocation to that intermediate district. (5) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under subsection (2) does not exceed 62.9% of the total amount allocated under subsection (2). (6) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under subsection (2) is not less than 75% of the amount allocated to the intermediate district under subsection (2) for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (7) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $34,200,000.00 for 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 to provide payments to intermediate districts levying millages for special education under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741. The purpose, use, and expenditure of the payments under this subsection are limited as if the funds were generated by these millages and governed by the intermediate district plan adopted under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761. The department shall provide a payment under this subsection to each intermediate district described in this subsection as follows: (a) For 2025-2026 and 2026-2027, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for an intermediate district with a 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year that is less than $251.00 and that is levying at least 46.2% but less than 60.0% of its maximum millage rate allowed under section 1724a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1724a, an amount computed by subtracting from $251.00 the 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year and, only if the millage levied by the intermediate district is less than 1, multiplying that amount by the number of mills levied divided by 1, and then multiplying that amount by the 3-year average membership in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and then subtracting from that amount the amount allocated under subsection (2) for the current fiscal year. If the calculation under this subdivision results in an amount below zero, there is no payment under this subdivision. (b) For 2025-2026 and 2026-2027, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for an intermediate district with a 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year that is less than $296.00 and that is levying at least 60.0% of its maximum millage rate allowed under section 1724a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1724a, an amount computed by subtracting from $296.00 the 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and, only if the millage levied by the intermediate district is less than 1, multiplying that amount by the number of mills levied divided by 1, and then multiplying that amount by the 3-year average membership in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and then subtracting from that amount the amount allocated under subsection (2) for the current fiscal year. If the calculation under this subdivision results in an amount below zero, there is no payment under this subdivision. (8) After making allocations to eligible intermediate districts under subsections (3), (4), and (7), if funds remain unallocated from the allocations under subsections (2) and (7), the department must allocate remaining funds to intermediate districts proportional to the amounts allocated to intermediate districts under subsections (3) and (4). (9) As used in subsection (7): (a) â3-year average membershipâ means the 3-year average pupil membership for each of the 3 most recent fiscal years. (b) â3-year average special education millage revenue per pupilâ means the 3-year average taxable value per mill levied behind each membership pupil for each of the 3 most recent fiscal years multiplied by the millage levied in the most recent fiscal year. Sec. 61a. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $45,985,000.00 for 2026-2027 to reimburse on an added cost basis districts, except for a district that served as the fiscal agent for a vocational education consortium in the 1993-94 school year and that has a foundation allowance as calculated under section 20 greater than the target foundation allowance under that section, and secondary area vocational-technical education centers for secondary-level career and technical education programs according to rules approved by the superintendent. Applications for participation in the programs must be submitted in the form prescribed by the department. The department shall determine the added cost for each career and technical education program area. The department shall prioritize the allocation of added cost funds based on the capital and program expenditures needed to operate the career and technical education programs provided; the number of pupils enrolled; the advancement of pupils through the instructional program; the existence of an articulation agreement with at least 1 postsecondary institution that provides pupils with opportunities to earn postsecondary credit during the pupilâs participation in the career and technical education program and transfers those credits to the postsecondary institution upon completion of the career and technical education program; and the program rank in student placement, job openings, and wages, and shall ensure that the allocation does not exceed 75% of the added cost of any program. Notwithstanding any rule or department determination to the contrary, when determining a districtâs allocation or the formula for making allocations under this section, the department shall include the participation of pupils in grade 9 in all of those determinations and in all portions of the formula. With the approval of the department, the board of a district maintaining a secondary career and technical education program may offer the program for the period from the close of the school year until September 1. The program shall use existing facilities and must be operated as prescribed by rules promulgated by the superintendent. (2) Except for a district that served as the fiscal agent for a vocational education consortium in the 1993-94 school year, the department shall reimburse districts and intermediate districts for local career and technical education administration, shared time career and technical education administration, and career education planning district career and technical education administration. The superintendent shall adopt guidelines for the definition of what constitutes administration and shall make reimbursement pursuant to those guidelines. The department shall not distribute more than $800,000.00 of the allocation in subsection (1) under this subsection. (3) A career and technical education program funded under this section may provide an opportunity for participants who are eligible to be funded under section 107 to enroll in the career and technical education program funded under this section if the participation does not occur during regular school hours. Sec. 61b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $9,220,400.00 for CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs authorized under this section and for planning grants for the development or expansion of CTE early middle college programs. The purpose of these programs is to increase the number of Michigan residents with high-quality degrees or credentials, and to increase the number of students who are college and career ready upon high school graduation. (2) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the department shall allocate an amount as determined under this subsection to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent for state-approved CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs in each of the career education planning districts identified by the department. An intermediate district shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated under this subsection for administrative costs for serving as the fiscal agent. (3) To be an eligible fiscal agent, an intermediate district must agree to do all of the following in a form and manner determined by the department: (a) Distribute funds to eligible CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs in a career education planning district as described in this section. (b) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council in the workforce development board service delivery area to develop 1 regional strategic plan under subsection (4) that aligns CTE programs and services into an efficient and effective delivery system for high school students. The department will align career education planning districts, workforce development board service delivery areas, and intermediate districts for the purpose of creating 1 regional strategic plan for each workforce development board service delivery area. (c) Implement a regional process to rank career clusters in the workforce development board service delivery area as described under subsection (4). Regional processes must be approved by the department before the ranking of career clusters. (d) Report CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment program and student data and information as prescribed by the department and the center. (e) The local education agency responsible for student reporting in the Michigan student data system (MSDS) will report the total number of college credits the student earned, at the time of high school graduation, as determined by the department and the center. (f) The local education agency will report each award outcome in the Michigan student data system (MSDS) that the CTE early middle college student attained. For purposes of this subsection, an on-track CTE early middle college graduate is a graduate who obtained their high school diploma and at least 1 of the following: (i) An associate degree. (ii) 60 transferable college credits. (iii) Professional certification. (iv) A Michigan Early Middle College Association certificate. (v) Participation in a registered apprenticeship. (4) A regional strategic plan must be approved by the career and educational advisory council before submission to the department. A regional strategic plan must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) An identification of regional employer need based on a ranking of all career clusters in the workforce development board service delivery area ranked by 10-year projections of annual job openings and median wage for each standard occupational code in each career cluster as obtained from the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. Standard occupational codes within high-ranking clusters also may be further ranked by median wage and annual job openings. The career and educational advisory council located in the workforce development board service delivery area shall review the rankings and modify them if necessary to accurately reflect employer demand for talent in the workforce development board service delivery area. A career and educational advisory council shall document that it has conducted this review and certify that it is accurate. These career cluster rankings must be determined and updated once every 4 years. (b) An identification of educational entities in the workforce development board service delivery area that will provide eligible CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs including districts, intermediate districts, postsecondary institutions, and noncredit occupational training programs leading to an industry-recognized credential. (c) A strategy to inform parents and students of CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs in the workforce development board service delivery area. (d) Any other requirements as defined by the department. (5) An eligible CTE program is a program that meets all of the following: (a) Has been identified in the highest 5 career cluster rankings in any of the 16 workforce development board service delivery area strategic plans jointly approved by the department of labor and economic opportunity and the department. (b) Has a coherent sequence of courses in a specific career cluster that will allow a student to earn a high school diploma and achieve at least 1 of the following: (i) For CTE early middle college, outcomes as defined in subsection (3)(f). (ii) For CTE dual enrollment, 1 of the following: (A) An associate degree. (B) An industry-recognized technical certification approved by the department of labor and economic opportunity. (C) Up to 60 transferable college credits. (D) Participation in a registered apprenticeship, pre-apprenticeship, or apprentice readiness program. (c) Is aligned with the Michigan merit curriculum. (d) Has an articulation or a college credit agreement with at least 1 postsecondary institution that provides students with opportunities to receive postsecondary credits during the studentâs participation in the CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program and transfers those credits to the postsecondary institution upon completion of the CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program. (e) Provides instruction that is supervised, directed, or coordinated by an appropriately certificated CTE teacher or, for concurrent enrollment courses, a postsecondary faculty member. (f) Provides for highly integrated student support services that include at least the following: (i) Teachers as academic advisors. (ii) Supervised course selection. (iii) Monitoring of student progress and completion. (iv) Career planning services provided by a local one-stop service center as described in the Michigan works one-stop service center system act, 2006 PA 491, MCL 408.111 to 408.135, or by a high school counselor or advisor. (g) Has courses that are taught on a college campus, are college courses offered at the high school and taught by college faculty, or are courses taught in combination with online instruction. (6) The department shall distribute funds to eligible CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs as follows: (a) The department shall determine statewide average CTE costs per pupil for each CIP code program by calculating statewide average costs for each CIP code program for the 3 most recent fiscal years. (b) The distribution to each eligible CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program is the product of 50% of CTE costs per pupil times the pupil enrollment of each eligible CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program in the immediately preceding school year. (7) To receive funds under this section, a CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program shall furnish to the intermediate district that is the fiscal agent identified in subsection (2), in a form and manner determined by the department, all information needed to administer this program and meet federal reporting requirements; shall allow the department or the departmentâs designee to review all records related to the program for which it receives funds; and shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in the review, as determined by the department. (8) There is allocated for 2026-2027 from the funds under subsection (1) an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 from the state school aid fund allocation for grants to intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts for the purpose of planning for new or expanded early middle college programs. Applications for grants must be submitted in a form and manner determined by the department. The amount of a grant under this subsection must not exceed $50,000.00. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, an intermediate district or consortia of intermediate districts must provide matching funds equal to the grant received under this subsection. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this subsection in the manner determined by the department. (9) Funds distributed under this section may be used to fund program expenditures that would otherwise be paid from foundation allowances, including, but not limited to, work-based learning programs. A program receiving funding under section 61a may receive funding under this section for allowable costs that exceed the reimbursement the program received under section 61a. The combined payments received by a program under section 61a and this section must not exceed the total allowable costs of the program. A program provider shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated under this section to the program for administrative costs. (10) If the allocation under subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund payments as otherwise calculated under this section, the department shall prorate payments under this section on an equal percentage basis, using for that proration calculation payments made for CTE dual enrollment programs only. (11) If pupils enrolled in a career cluster in an eligible CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program qualify to be reimbursed under this section, those pupils continue to qualify for reimbursement until graduation, even if the career cluster is no longer identified as being in the highest 5 career cluster rankings. (12) As used in this section: (a) âAllowable costsâ means those costs directly attributable to the program as jointly determined by the department of labor and economic opportunity and the department. (b) âCareer and educational advisory councilâ means an advisory council to the local workforce development boards located in a workforce development board service delivery area consisting of educational, employer, labor, and parent representatives. (c) âCIPâ means classification of instructional programs. (d) âCTEâ means career and technical education programs. (e) âCTE dual enrollment programâ means a 4-year high school program of postsecondary courses offered by eligible postsecondary educational institutions that leads to an industry-recognized certification or degree. (f) âEarly middle college programâ means a 5-year high school program. (g) âEligible postsecondary educational institutionâ means that term as defined in section 3 of the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1903. Sec. 61w. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $2,900,000.00 for competitive grants to districts and intermediate districts to support digital career exploration programs and virtual reality simulation programs that enhance and expand existing career and technical education programs. (2) Districts and intermediate districts shall apply for funds under this section on a competitive basis in a form and manner determined by the department. (3) A virtual reality simulation program described in this section must offer software, hardware, or both that provides immersive career exploration and workforce development programming for students. (4) Fifty percent of the funds allocated under this section must be awarded to districts and intermediate districts to purchase software, hardware, or related technology platforms. The remaining 50% of the funds must be awarded to districts and intermediate districts to partner with businesses or nonprofit organizations that provide mobile virtual reality career exploration services, including providers capable of delivering software and hardware with immersive career experiences directly to schools. (5) Awards received under this section must be used to support career and technical education programs aligned with high-skill, high-wage, and high-demand occupations across career clusters aligned with local and market needs. A recipient may use an award under this section to support virtual reality simulation programs that reach multiple career clusters or career exploration opportunities. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 62. (1) For the purposes of this section: (a) âMembershipâ means for a particular fiscal year the total membership of the intermediate district and the districts constituent to the intermediate district or the total membership of the area vocational-technical program, except that if a district has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, the membership of that district are not included in the membership of the intermediate district. However, the membership of a district that has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, is included in the membership of the intermediate district if the district meets both of the following: (i) The district operates the area vocational-technical education program pursuant to a contract with the intermediate district. (ii) The district contributes an annual amount to the operation of the program that is commensurate with the revenue that would have been raised for operation of the program if millage were levied in the district for the program under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690. (b) âMillage leviedâ means the millage levied for area vocational-technical education under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, including a levy for debt service obligations incurred as the result of borrowing for capital outlay projects and in meeting capital projects fund requirements of area vocational-technical education. (c) âTaxable valueâ means the total taxable value of the districts constituent to an intermediate district or area vocational-technical education program, except that if a district has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, the taxable value of that district is not included in the taxable value of the intermediate district. However, the taxable value of a district that has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, is included in the taxable value of the intermediate district if the district meets both of the following: (i) The district operates the area vocational-technical education program pursuant to a contract with the intermediate district. (ii) The district contributes an annual amount to the operation of the program that is commensurate with the revenue that would have been raised for operation of the program if millage were levied in the district for the program under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690. (2) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $9,190,000.00 each fiscal year for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 to reimburse intermediate districts and area vocational-technical education programs established under section 690(3) of the revised school code, MCL 380.690, levying millages for area vocational-technical education under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690. The purpose, use, and expenditure of the reimbursement are limited as if the funds were generated by those millages. (3) Reimbursement for those millages levied in 2024-2025 is made in 2025-2026 at an amount per 2024-2025 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $288,300.00 the 2024-2025 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2024-2025 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2024-2025 local community stabilization share revenue for area vocational technical education and 2024-2025 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 56, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of vocational-technical education millage levied and special education millage levied, as defined in section 56. (4) Reimbursement for those millages levied in 2025-2026 is made in 2026-2027 at an amount per 2025-2026 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $302,800.00 the 2025-2026 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2025-2026 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2025-2026 local community stabilization share revenue for area vocational technical education and 2025-2026 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 56, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of vocational-technical education millage levied and special education millage levied, as defined in section 56. (5) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under this section does not exceed 38.4% of the total amount allocated under subsection (2). (6) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under this section is not less than 75% of the amount allocated to the intermediate district under this section for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Sec. 65. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $900,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for a pre-college engineering K to 12 educational program that is focused on the development of a diverse future Michigan workforce, that serves multiple communities within southeast Michigan, that enrolls pupils from multiple districts, and that received funds appropriated for this purpose in the appropriations act that provided the Michigan strategic fund budget for 2014-2015. It is the intent of the legislature that the appropriation under this section will be funded with state school aid pupil support reserve fund money through 2027-2028. (2) To be eligible for funding under this section, a program must have the ability to expose pupils to, and motivate and prepare pupils for, science, technology, engineering, and mathematics careers and postsecondary education with special attention given to groups of pupils who are at-risk and underrepresented in technical professions and careers. Sec. 67. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for college access programs. The programs funded under this section are intended to inform students of college and career options, to provide resources intended to increase the number of pupils who are adequately prepared with the information needed to make informed decisions on college and career, support adult learners, support college completion, and support workforce and employer engagement. The funds appropriated under this section are intended to be used to increase the number of Michigan residents with high-quality degrees or credentials. Funds appropriated under this section must not be used to supplant funding for counselors already funded by districts. (2) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall administer funds allocated under this section in collaboration with the Michigan college access network. These funds may be used for any of the following purposes: (a) Michigan college access network operations, programming, and services to local college access networks. (b) Local college access networks, which are community-based college access/success partnerships committed to increasing the college participation and completion rates within geographically defined communities through a coordinated strategy. (c) The Michigan college advising program, a program intended to place trained, recently graduated college advisors in high schools that serve significant numbers of low-income and first-generation college-going pupils. State funds used for this purpose may not exceed 33% of the total funds available under this subsection. (d) Subgrants of up to $5,000.00 to districts with comprehensive high schools that establish a college access team and implement specific strategies to create a college-going culture in a high school in a form and manner approved by the Michigan college access network and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (e) The Michigan college access portal, an online one-stop portal to help pupils and families plan and apply for college. (f) Public awareness and outreach campaigns to encourage low-income and first-generation college-going pupils to take necessary steps toward college and to assist pupils and families in completing a timely and accurate free application for federal student aid. (g) Subgrants to postsecondary institutions to recruit, hire, and train college student mentors and college advisors to assist high school pupils in navigating the postsecondary planning and enrollment process. (3) For the purposes of this section, âcollegeâ means any postsecondary educational opportunity that leads to a career, including, but not limited to, a postsecondary degree, industry-recognized technical certification, or registered apprenticeship. Sec. 67d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $900,000.00 to districts and intermediate districts to partner with nonprofit organizations for the provision of hospitality and tourism CTE programs. (2) Districts and intermediate districts shall apply for funding under this section in a form and manner determined by the department. (3) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (4) As used in this section, âhospitality and tourism CTE programsâ means career and technical education programs that teach or train students in restaurant management, culinary arts or hospitality, and tourism management as part of career and professional development. Sec. 67f. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for districts to improve FAFSA completion rates. It is the intent of the legislature that the appropriation under this section will be funded with state school aid pupil support reserve fund money through 2027-2028. (2) To be eligible to receive funding under this section, each district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. In the application, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall only require a district to certify that it will do both of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), require all students to complete the FAFSA to graduate from high school. (b) Use funds received under this section for participation in and implementation of activities that are known to drive FAFSA completion, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, in collaboration with the Michigan College Access Network. (3) A district shall exempt a student from the requirement to complete the FAFSA if any of the following are met: (a) The studentâs parent or legal guardian, or the student if the student is 18 years of age or older, is an emancipated minor, or is an unaccompanied youth, has submitted a parental waiver to the district exempting the student from completing the FAFSA. The parental waiver described in this subdivision must be obtained through a standard form developed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) The student is unable to complete the FAFSA because of privacy concerns. (c) All of the following are met: (i) After a good-faith effort, the studentâs parent or legal guardian refuses to sign the parental waiver, is unresponsive, or cannot sign the parental waiver. (ii) The student is unable to complete the FAFSA as an independent student. (iii) The student agrees to opt out of completing the FAFSA. (iv) Other than the requirements in subsection (2), the student is on track to graduate. (v) A school administrator of the studentâs high school demonstrates to the board that good-faith efforts have been made to assist the student or the studentâs parent or legal guardian in completing the FAFSA or obtaining a parental waiver. (vi) The board ensures compliance with 42 USC 11432(g)(6)(A). (4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may use past participation in the FAFSA Completion Challenge under this section as a factor in determining district eligibility. (5) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall pay each eligible district an equal amount per pupil multiplied by the number of pupils enrolled and attending grade 12 in the district. Initial payments must be made by not later than January 31, 2027. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (7) As used in this section, âFAFSAâ means the free application for federal student aid form. Sec. 74. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,753,100.00 for 2026-2027 for the purposes of this section. (2) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 the amount necessary for payments to state supported colleges or universities and intermediate districts providing school bus driver safety instruction under section 51 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL 257.1851. The department shall make payments in an amount determined by the department not to exceed the actual cost of instruction and driver compensation for each public or nonpublic school bus driver attending a course of instruction. For the purpose of computing compensation, the hourly rate allowed each school bus driver must not exceed the hourly rate received for driving a school bus. The department shall make reimbursement compensating the driver during the course of instruction to the college or university or intermediate district providing the course of instruction. (3) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 the amount necessary to pay the reasonable costs of nonspecial education auxiliary services transportation provided under section 1323 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1323. Districts funded under this subsection do not receive funding under any other section of this article for nonspecial education auxiliary services transportation. (4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,978,100.00 for 2026-2027 for the inspection of school buses and pupil transportation vehicles by the department of state police as required under section 715a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.715a, and section 39 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL 257.1839. The department of state police shall prepare a statement of costs and submit it to the department and to an intermediate district serving as fiduciary in a time and manner determined jointly by the department and the department of state police. Upon review and approval of the statement of cost, the department shall forward to the designated intermediate district serving as fiduciary the amount detailed on the statement within 45 days after receipt of the statement. The designated intermediate district fiduciary shall make payment in the amount specified on the statement to the department of state police within 45 days after receipt of the statement. The total reimbursement of costs under this subsection must not exceed the amount allocated under this subsection. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to eligible entities under this subsection on a schedule prescribed by the department. Sec. 81. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 to intermediate districts the sum necessary, but not to exceed $85,236,600.00, to provide state aid to intermediate districts under this section. (2) The amount allocated under this section to each intermediate school district for the current fiscal year is equal to the allocation for the immediately preceding fiscal year plus an equal percentage increase for all intermediate school districts. An intermediate district shall use funding provided under this section to comply with requirements of this article and the revised school code that are applicable to intermediate districts, and for which funding is not provided elsewhere in this article, and to provide technical assistance to districts as authorized by the intermediate school board. (3) Intermediate districts receiving funds under this section shall collaborate with the department to develop expanded professional development opportunities for teachers to update and expand their knowledge and skills needed to support the Michigan merit curriculum. (4) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated to an intermediate district, formed by the consolidation or annexation of 2 or more intermediate districts or the attachment of a total intermediate district to another intermediate district or the annexation of all of the constituent K to 12 districts of a previously existing intermediate district which has disorganized, an additional allotment of $3,500.00 each fiscal year for each intermediate district included in the new intermediate district for 3 years following consolidation, annexation, or attachment. (5) To receive funding under this section, an intermediate district shall do all of the following: (a) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the intermediate district employs at least 1 person who is trained in pupil accounting and auditing procedures, rules, and regulations. (b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the intermediate district employs at least 1 person who is trained in rules, regulations, and district reporting procedures for the individual-level student data that serves as the basis for the calculation of the district and high school graduation and dropout rates. (c) Comply with sections 1278a and 1278b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1278a and 380.1278b. (d) Furnish data and other information required by state and federal law to the center and the department in the form and manner specified by the center or the department, as applicable. (e) Comply with section 1230g of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230g. (f) Ensure that all districts located within the intermediate districtâs geographic boundaries have equitable access to the intermediate districtâs coordination activities and services, intermediate district-wide or regional meetings, regularly scheduled superintendent meetings, programming, events, email distribution lists, listservs, or other coordination or collaboration activities organized by or hosted in the intermediate district. In ensuring that all districts located within the geographic boundaries of the intermediate district have equitable access to the services, meetings, programming, events, email distribution lists, listservs, or activities, the intermediate district shall ensure that districts that are public school academies and that are located within the intermediate districtâs geographic boundaries are not excluded from the services, meetings, programming, events, email distribution lists, listservs, or activities organized by or hosted in the intermediate district if districts that are not public school academies and that are located within the geographic boundaries of the intermediate district are not excluded. Sec. 94. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated to the department for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $1,200,000.00 and from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $1,600,000.00 to an intermediate district identified by the department for efforts to increase the number of pupils who participate and succeed in advanced placement and international baccalaureate programs, and to support the college-level examination program (CLEP). The department must maintain administrative oversight of the billing and reimbursement process. (2) From the funds allocated under this section, the department shall award funds to cover all or part of the costs of advanced placement test fees or international baccalaureate test fees and international baccalaureate registration fees for low-income pupils who take an advanced placement or an international baccalaureate test and CLEP fees for low-income pupils who take a CLEP test. (3) The department shall only award funds under this section if the department determines that all of the following criteria are met: (a) Each pupil for whom payment is made meets eligibility requirements of the federal advanced placement test fee program under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95, as applicable. (b) The tests are administered by the college board, the international baccalaureate organization, or another test provider approved by the department. (c) The pupil for whom payment is made pays at least $5.00 toward the cost of each test for which payment is made. (4) If funds remain after the awards granted in subsection (2), the department shall award funds to reimburse a portion of the costs associated with the provision of advanced placement (AP), international baccalaureate (IB), or college-level examination program (CLEP) exams for students whose family income exceeds low-income status as determined by the department. (5) The department shall establish procedures for awarding funds under this section. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 94a. (1) There is created within the state budget office in the department of technology, management, and budget the center for educational performance and information. The center shall do all of the following: (a) Coordinate the collection of all data required by state and federal law from districts, intermediate districts, and postsecondary institutions. (b) Create, maintain, and enhance this stateâs P-20 longitudinal data system and ensure that it meets the requirements of subsection (4). (c) Collect data in the most efficient manner possible to reduce the administrative burden on reporting entities, including, but not limited to, electronic transcript services. (d) Create, maintain, and enhance this stateâs web-based educational portal to provide information to school leaders, teachers, researchers, and the public in compliance with all federal and state privacy laws. Data must include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (i) Data sets that link teachers to student information, allowing districts to assess individual teacher impact on student performance and consider student growth factors in teacher and principal evaluation systems. (ii) Data access or, if practical, data sets, provided for regional data hubs that, in combination with local data, can improve teaching and learning in the classroom. (iii) Research-ready data sets for researchers to perform research that advances this stateâs educational performance. (e) Provide data in a useful manner to allow state and local policymakers to make informed policy decisions. (f) Provide public reports to the residents of this state to allow them to assess allocation of resources and the return on their investment in the education system of this state. (g) Other functions as assigned by the state budget director. (2) Each state department, officer, or agency that collects information from districts, intermediate districts, or postsecondary institutions as required under state or federal law shall make arrangements with the center to ensure that the state department, officer, or agency is in compliance with subsection (1). This subsection does not apply to information collected by the department of treasury under the uniform budgeting and accounting act, 1968 PA 2, MCL 141.421 to 141.440a; the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821; the school bond qualification, approval, and loan act, 2005 PA 92, MCL 388.1921 to 388.1939; or section 1351a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1351a. (3) The center may enter into any interlocal agreements necessary to fulfill its functions. (4) The center shall ensure that the P-20 longitudinal data system required under subsection (1)(b) meets all of the following: (a) Includes data at the individual student level from preschool through postsecondary education and into the workforce. (b) Supports interoperability by using standard data structures, data formats, and data definitions to ensure linkage and connectivity in a manner that facilitates the exchange of data among agencies and institutions within the state and between states. (c) Enables the matching of individual teacher and student records so that an individual student may be matched with those teachers providing instruction to that student. (d) Enables the matching of individual teachers with information about their certification and the institutions that prepared and recommended those teachers for state certification. (e) Enables data to be easily generated for continuous improvement and decision-making, including timely reporting to parents, teachers, and school leaders on student achievement. (f) Ensures the reasonable quality, validity, and reliability of data contained in the system. (g) Provides this state with the ability to meet federal and state reporting requirements. (h) For data elements related to preschool through grade 12 and postsecondary, meets all of the following: (i) Contains a unique statewide student identifier that does not permit a student to be individually identified by users of the system, except as allowed by federal and state law. (ii) Contains student-level enrollment, demographic, and program participation information, including data associated with students who have been identified as having an affiliation to 1 or more federally recognized Indian tribes and student participation in federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and participation in federal programs funded under the Johnson-OâMalley supplemental Indian education program modernization act, Public Law 115-404. Any reports or data access related specifically to tribal affiliation must be done through ongoing consultation with the federally recognized tribes in the state with the expectation that the center, the department, and the tribes will work iteratively toward meaningful reports, access, and use of these records to improve shared education interests and outcomes. (iii) Contains student-level information about the points at which students exit, transfer in, transfer out, drop out, or complete education programs. (iv) Has the capacity to communicate with higher education data systems. (i) For data elements related to preschool through grade 12 only, meets all of the following: (i) Contains yearly test records of individual students for assessments approved by DED-OESE for accountability purposes under section 1111(b) of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 USC 6311, including information on individual students not tested, by grade and subject. (ii) Contains student-level transcript information, including information on courses completed and grades earned. (iii) Contains student-level college readiness test scores. (j) For data elements related to postsecondary education only: (i) Contains data that provide information regarding the extent to which individual students transition successfully from secondary school to postsecondary education, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (A) Enrollment in remedial coursework. (B) Completion of 1 yearâs worth of college credit applicable to a degree within 2 years of enrollment. (ii) Contains data that provide other information determined necessary to address alignment and adequate preparation for success in postsecondary education. (5) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $19,548,500.00 for 2026-2027 to the department of technology, management, and budget to support the operations of the center. In addition, from the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 the amount necessary, estimated at $100.00 to support the operations of the center and to establish a P‑20 longitudinal data system necessary for state and federal reporting purposes. The center shall cooperate with the department to ensure that this state is in compliance with federal law and is maximizing opportunities for increased federal funding to improve education in this state. (6) From the funds allocated in subsection (5), the center may use an amount determined by the center for competitive grants for 2026-2027 to support collaborative efforts on the P-20 longitudinal data system. All of the following apply to grants awarded under this subsection: (a) The center shall award competitive grants to eligible intermediate districts or a consortium of intermediate districts based on criteria established by the center. (b) Activities funded under the grant must support the P-20 longitudinal data system portal and may include portal hosting, hardware and software acquisition, maintenance, enhancements, user support and related materials, and professional learning tools and activities aimed at improving the utility of the P-20 longitudinal data system. (c) An applicant that received a grant under this subsection for the immediately preceding fiscal year has priority for funding under this section. However, after 3 fiscal years of continuous funding, an applicant is required to compete openly with new applicants. (7) Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year in which they were allocated may be carried forward to a subsequent fiscal year and are appropriated for the purposes for which the funds were originally allocated. (8) The center may bill departments as necessary to fulfill reporting requirements of state and federal law. The center may also enter into agreements to supply custom data, analysis, and reporting to other principal executive departments, state agencies, local units of government, and other individuals and organizations. The center may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in subsection (5) to cover the costs associated with salaries, benefits, supplies, materials, and equipment necessary to provide such data, analysis, and reporting services. (9) As used in this section, âDED-OESEâ means the United States Department of Education Office of Elementary and Secondary Education. (10) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for payments on behalf of districts for costs associated with e-transcript services for high schools and pupils. Sec. 94e. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for support of the Michigan Education Research Institute. (2) Funding allocated under this section must be distributed to the University of Michiganâs Michigan Education Data Center and Michigan State Universityâs Education Policy Innovation Center for the purpose of working collaboratively with the department, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the center to build and maintain a research ready dataset, and to conduct research of critical importance to the stateâs education goals. (3) The Michigan Education Research Institute shall use funds received under this section for the purpose of expanding on research that includes, but is not limited to, all the following: (a) Educator shortage. (b) Literacy initiative outcomes. (c) Early childhood development programming outcomes. (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 94f. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 to a public university in this state with an existing research partnership with the department and districts for research and program evaluation activities supporting statewide literacy initiatives. The public university described in this subsection shall use funds received under this section to collect and analyze data, assess program implementation and outcomes, develop and report on key performance indicators, and provide recommendations to improve literacy achievement and inform state implementation, policy, and investment decisions. (2) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 95b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for a growth and projection analytics system with student and teacher growth reports. (2) The growth and projections reporting platform must provide continued hosting and delivery of reporting and offer the department additional supports in the areas of research, analysis, web reporting, and training. The platform must use historical student-level data from the state and have experience providing student growth reports. (3) Funding under this section must be awarded to an intermediate district to partner with the department and a platform vendor to meet the requirements of this section. The platform vendor must be determined through a competitive grant process. (4) The department and the platform vendor shall provide statewide training for educators to understand the reporting that details the impact to student learning and growth. (5) The department shall provide internet-based electronic student growth and projection reporting under this section to educators at the school, district, and state levels. The reporting must include role-based permissions that allow educators to access information about the performance of the students within their immediate responsibility in accordance with applicable privacy laws. (6) By not later than March 31, the department shall work with the center to make data available on a publicly accessible website that provides student growth metrics at the district and school level by grade and subject. (7) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 97n. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only $10,000,000.00 for grants to districts to support the efforts of community violence intervention plans to reduce or prevent youth violence. (2) Districts must apply on a competitive basis for funding under this section in a form and manner determined by the department. The department shall coordinate with the office of community violence intervention in the department of health and human services to evaluate applications submitted under this section. Awards must be granted based on competitive criteria determined by the department and the department of health and human services, but must prioritize grants for local district plans that include comprehensive strategies with demonstrated external partnerships to support successful implementation. (3) Districts may use funding received under this section to contract with nonprofits, community-based organizations, subject matter experts, or other governmental entities to implement a plan to reduce or prevent youth violence. A plan to reduce or prevent youth violence implemented under this subsection must use evidence-based practices, include mentorship and community engagement strategies, and may include, but is not limited to, increased academic, counseling, health, and wrap-around services to youth. (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 98. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $9,800,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for the purposes described in this section. The Michigan Virtual University shall provide a report to the legislature not later than November 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section that includes its mission, its plans, and proposed benchmarks it must meet, including a plan to achieve the organizational priorities identified in this section, to receive full funding for the next fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section. By not later than March 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall provide an update to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid to show the progress being made to meet the benchmarks identified. (2) The Michigan Virtual University shall operate the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall do all of the following: (a) Support and accelerate innovation in education through the following activities: (i) Test, evaluate, and recommend as appropriate new technology-based instructional tools and resources. (ii) Research, design, and recommend virtual education delivery models for use by pupils and teachers that include age-appropriate multimedia instructional content. (iii) Research, develop, and recommend annually to the department criteria by which cyber schools and virtual course providers should be monitored and evaluated to ensure a quality education for their pupils. (iv) Based on pupil completion and performance data reported to the department or the center from cyber schools and other virtual course providers operating in this state, analyze the effectiveness of virtual learning delivery models in preparing pupils to be college- and career-ready and publish a report that highlights enrollment totals, completion rates, and the overall impact on pupils. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall submit the report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the department, districts, and intermediate districts by not later than March 31 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section. (v) Provide an extensive professional development program to at least 30,000 educational personnel, including teachers, school administrators, and school board members, that focuses on the effective integration of virtual learning into curricula and instruction. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute is encouraged to work with the MiSTEM council described in section 99s to coordinate professional development of teachers in applicable fields. In addition, the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute and external stakeholders are encouraged to coordinate with the department for professional development in this state, including professional development for employees in child care facilities, early childhood facilities, and after-school programs. By not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall submit a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the department on the number of teachers, school administrators, and school board members who have received professional development services from the Michigan Virtual University. The report must also include both of the following: (A) The identification of barriers and other opportunities to encourage the adoption of virtual learning in the public education system. (B) A link to, and explanation of, the Michigan Virtual Universityâs online course standards for professional development programming. The standards described in this sub-subparagraph must inform learners how to file a complaint about course content and detail the steps that will be taken for the review and resolution of complaints. (vi) Identify and share best practices for planning, implementing, and evaluating virtual and blended education delivery models with intermediate districts, districts, and public school academies to accelerate the adoption of innovative education delivery models statewide. (b) Provide leadership for this stateâs system of virtual learning education by doing the following activities: (i) Develop and report policy recommendations to the governor and the legislature that accelerate the expansion of effective virtual learning in this stateâs schools. (ii) Provide a clearinghouse for research reports, academic studies, evaluations, and other information related to virtual learning. (iii) Promote and distribute the most current instructional design standards and guidelines for virtual teaching. (iv) In collaboration with the department and interested colleges and universities in this state, support implementation and improvements related to effective virtual learning instruction. (v) Pursue public/private partnerships that include districts to study and implement competency-based technology-rich virtual learning models. (vi) Create a statewide network of school-based mentors serving as liaisons between pupils, virtual instructors, parents, and school staff, as provided by the department or the center, and provide mentors with research-based training and technical assistance designed to help more pupils be successful virtual learners. (vii) Convene focus groups and conduct annual surveys of teachers, administrators, pupils, parents, and others to identify barriers and opportunities related to virtual learning. (viii) Produce an annual consumer awareness report for schools and parents about effective virtual education providers and education delivery models, performance data, cost structures, and research trends. (ix) Provide an internet-based platform that educators can use to create student-centric learning tools and resources for sharing in the stateâs open educational resource repository and facilitate a user network that assists educators in using the content creation platform and state repository for open educational resources. As part of this initiative, the Michigan Virtual University shall work collaboratively with districts and intermediate districts to establish a plan to make available virtual resources that align to Michiganâs K to 12 curriculum standards for use by students, educators, and parents. (x) Create and maintain a public statewide catalog of virtual learning courses being offered by all public schools and community colleges in this state. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall identify and develop a list of nationally recognized best practices for virtual learning and use this list to support reviews of virtual course vendors, courses, and instructional practices. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall also provide a mechanism for intermediate districts to use the identified best practices to review content offered by constituent districts. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall review the virtual course offerings of the Michigan Virtual University, and make the results from these reviews available to the public as part of the statewide catalog. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall ensure that the statewide catalog is made available to the public on the Michigan Virtual University website and shall allow the ability to link it to each districtâs website as provided for in section 21f. The statewide catalog must also contain all of the following: (A) The number of enrollments in each virtual course in the immediately preceding school year. (B) The number of enrollments that earned 60% or more of the total course points for each virtual course in the immediately preceding school year. (C) The pass rate for each virtual course. (xi) Support registration, payment services, and transcript functionality for the statewide catalog and train key stakeholders on how to use new features. (xii) Collaborate with key stakeholders to examine district level accountability and teacher effectiveness issues related to virtual learning under section 21f and make findings and recommendations publicly available. (xiii) Provide a report on the activities of the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute. (3) To further enhance its expertise and leadership in virtual learning, the Michigan Virtual University shall continue to operate the Michigan Virtual School as a statewide laboratory and quality model of instruction by implementing virtual and blended learning solutions for Michigan schools in accordance with the following parameters: (a) The Michigan Virtual School must maintain its accreditation status from recognized national and international accrediting entities. (b) The Michigan Virtual University shall use no more than $1,000,000.00 of the amount allocated under this section to subsidize the cost paid by districts for virtual courses. (c) In providing educators responsible for the teaching of virtual courses as provided for in this section, the Michigan Virtual School shall follow the requirements to request and assess, and the department of state police shall provide, a criminal history check and criminal records check under sections 1230 and 1230a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230 and 380.1230a, in the same manner as if the Michigan Virtual School were a school district under those sections. (4) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the Michigan Virtual University shall support the expansion of new online and blended educator professional development programs. (5) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the Michigan Virtual University shall operate a comprehensive statewide laboratory designed to function as a hub for cutting-edge research, the identification and dissemination of best practices, rigorous experimentation, policy formulation, and proactive efforts to enhance awareness about the responsible utilization of artificial intelligence in schools. (6) If the course offerings are included in the statewide catalog of virtual courses under subsection (2)(b)(x), the Michigan Virtual School operated by the Michigan Virtual University may offer virtual course offerings, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Information technology courses. (b) College level equivalent courses, as that term is defined in section 1471 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1471. (c) Courses and dual enrollment opportunities. (d) Programs and services for at-risk pupils. (e) High school equivalency test preparation courses for adjudicated youth. (f) Special interest courses. (g) Professional development programs for teachers, school administrators, other school employees, and school board members. (7) If a home-schooled or nonpublic school student is a resident of a district that subscribes to services provided by the Michigan Virtual School, the student may use the services provided by the Michigan Virtual School to the district without charge to the student beyond what is charged to a district pupil using the same services. (8) By not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall provide a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the department that includes at least all of the following information related to the Michigan Virtual School for the preceding fiscal year: (a) A list of the districts served by the Michigan Virtual School. (b) A list of virtual course titles available to districts. (c) The total number of virtual course enrollments and information on registrations and completions by course. (d) The overall course completion rate percentage. (9) In addition to the information listed in subsection (8), the report under subsection (8) must also include a plan to serve at least 600 schools with courses from the Michigan Virtual School or with content available through the internet-based platform identified in subsection (2)(b)(ix). (10) The governor may appoint an advisory group for the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute established under subsection (2). The members of the advisory group serve at the pleasure of the governor and without compensation. The purpose of the advisory group is to make recommendations to the governor, the legislature, and the president and board of the Michigan Virtual University that will accelerate innovation in this stateâs education system in a manner that will prepare elementary and secondary students to be career and college ready and that will promote the goal of increasing the percentage of residents of this state with high-quality degrees and credentials to at least 60% by 2030. (11) By not later than November 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall submit to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies a detailed budget for that fiscal year that includes a breakdown on its projected costs to deliver virtual educational services to districts and a summary of the anticipated fees to be paid by districts for those services. By not later than March 1 each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall submit to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies a breakdown on its actual costs to deliver virtual educational services to districts and a summary of the actual fees paid by districts for those services based on audited financial statements for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (12) As used in this section: (a) âBlended learningâ means a hybrid instructional delivery model where pupils are provided content, instruction, and assessment, in part at a supervised educational facility away from home where the pupil and a teacher with a valid Michigan teaching certificate are in the same physical location and in part through internet-connected learning environments with some degree of pupil control over time, location, and pace of instruction. (b) âCyber schoolâ means a full-time instructional program of virtual courses for pupils that may or may not require attendance at a physical school location. (c) âVirtual courseâ means a course of study that is capable of generating a credit or a grade and that is provided in an interactive learning environment in which the majority of the curriculum is delivered using the internet and in which pupils are separated from their instructor or teacher of record by time or location, or both. Sec. 98d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 to a public university that has previously partnered with a statewide, public, nonprofit educational media service providing free, standards-aligned instructional programming to Michigan schools. The public university described in this subsection shall not retain any portion of the funding received under this section for administrative purposes. The statewide, public, nonprofit educational media service described in this subsection must meet all of the following requirements: (a) Provide free, curriculum-aligned educational programming and instructional resources for pupils, families, and educators through over-the-air broadcast, digital streaming, and online platforms. (b) Deliver educational programming that is aligned with this stateâs pre-K through grade 12 academic standards and supports literacy instruction grounded in evidence-based reading practices. (c) Operate in partnership with Michigan public broadcasting stations to provide statewide educational programming and classroom resources. (d) Demonstrate the capability to produce and distribute Michigan-specific educational content statewide through broadcast and digital platforms. (e) Maintain an online library of instructional resources for educators, pupils, and families that is available statewide at no cost. (f) Use the funding allocated under this section solely for the expansion of literacy programming, educator resources, and family engagement activities. (2) By not later than February 1, 2028, the statewide, public, nonprofit educational media service described in subsection (1) shall provide a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees responsible for school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director detailing its compliance with ensuring that conditions listed under subsection (1) were met. (3) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section by not later than December 1, 2026. Sec. 99h. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for competitive grants to districts and intermediate districts, and from the general pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $600,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for competitive grants to nonpublic schools, that provide pupils in grades pre-K to 12 with expanded opportunities to improve mathematics, science, computer science, and technology skills by participating in robotics competition programs hosted by program providers including, but not limited to, FIRST (for inspiration and recognition of science and technology) Robotics, including FIRST Lego League - Discover, Explore, and Challenge, FIRST Tech challenge, and FIRST Robotics competition, LTU Robofest, MATE (Marine Advanced Technical Education), REC (Robotics Education Competition) Foundation, Square One Education Network, VEX, and other providers approved by the department. It is the intent of the legislature that the appropriations under this section will be funded with state school aid pupil support reserve fund money and general pupil support reserve fund money through 2027-2028. All approved providers shall make all programs available to students in this state regardless of geographical location. Programs funded under this section are intended to increase the number of pupils demonstrating proficiency in science and mathematics on the state assessments and to increase the number of pupils who are college- and career-ready upon high school graduation. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make grant payments to districts, nonpublic schools, and intermediate districts under this section on a schedule determined by the department. The department shall set maximum grant awards for each different level of programming and competition in a manner that both maximizes the number of teams that will be able to receive funds and expands the geographical distribution of teams. Districts and intermediate districts that receive funds under this section must provide relevant student participation information, as determined by the department, to program and competition providers described in this section. For a district or intermediate district to count a program competition provider for purposes of payments under this section, the program and competition providers must agree to aggregate data received by districts and intermediate districts and provide this information to the department in a form and manner determined by the department. (2) The department shall do all of the following for purposes of this section: (a) Both of the following by not later than 60 days after the state school aid appropriations bill for the current fiscal year is enacted into law or October 1 of the current fiscal year, whichever is later: (i) Open applications for funding under this section to all districts, nonpublic schools, and intermediate districts. (ii) Publish a list of approved programs and vendors for purposes of this section in a manner that is accessible to all applicants. To obtain approval under this subparagraph, a program or vendor must submit to the department registration information, including any fees; pledge that it will post this information on its website; and, by not later than January 1 of the current fiscal year, submit this information to the department for publication on the departmentâs website. (b) By not later than 60 days after applications are opened as described in subdivision (a), close applications under this section. (c) By not later than 60 days after applications are closed as described in subdivision (b), make all determinations concerning funding under this section. (d) By not later than July 1 of the current fiscal year, publish a document listing the requirements for becoming an approved program or vendor under subdivision (a). (3) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, if funding under this section is insufficient to fulfill all funding requests by qualified applicants under this section, the department shall prorate the total funding allocated under this section equally among all qualified applicants. However, for funding under this section toward grants under subsection (5)(b), in its proration under this subsection, the department shall ensure that each district is paid in an amount equal to the percentage the department would have paid the district in grant funding under subsection (5)(b), but for proration under this subsection, with no district receiving a grant under subsection (5)(b) in an amount that is greater than the districtâs total accrued costs under subsection (5)(b). (4) A district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district applying for a grant under this section must submit an application in a form and manner prescribed by the department. To be eligible for a grant, a district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district must demonstrate in its application that the district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district has established a partnership for the purposes of the robotics program with at least 1 sponsor, business entity, higher education institution, technical school, or individual, must submit a budget, and must provide a local in-kind or cash match from other private or local funds of at least 25% of the cost of the robotics program award. (5) The department shall distribute the grant funding under this section for the following purposes: (a) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate districts to pay for stipends not to exceed $1,500.00 per building for coaching. (b) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate districts for event registrations, materials, travel costs, and other expenses associated with the preparation for and attendance at robotics events and competitions. (c) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate districts for awards to teams that advance to the next levels of competition as determined by the department. The department shall determine an equal amount per team for those teams that advance. (6) A nonpublic school that receives a grant under this section may use the funds for either robotics or Science Olympiad programs. (7) To be eligible to receive funds under this section, a nonpublic school must be a nonpublic school registered with the department and must meet all applicable state reporting requirements for nonpublic schools. (8) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, a district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district must do all of the following: (a) If the district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district is requesting funding for more than 1 team for a building, meet the minimum requirements for team size as determined by the approved program provider. (b) Participate in at least the minimum number of competitions as determined by the approved program provider. (c) Participate in at least 1 in-person competition. (9) For purposes of this section, an approved program or vendor under this section that provides a program under this section shall not work with the department to set prices or policies for the program. (10) As used in this section, âcurrent fiscal yearâ means the fiscal year for which an allocation is made under this section. Sec. 99s. (1) From state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $8,000,000.00 for Michigan science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs. Programs funded under this section are intended to increase the number of pupils demonstrating proficiency in science and mathematics on the state assessments, to increase the number of pupils who are college- and career-ready upon high school graduation, and to promote certificate and degree attainment in STEM fields. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (2) The MiSTEM council annually shall review and make recommendations to the governor, the legislature, and the department concerning changes to the statewide strategy adopted by the council for delivering STEM education-related opportunities to pupils. The MiSTEM council shall use funds received under this section to ensure that the MiSTEM councilâs members or their designees are trained in a third-party evaluation system such as the Change the Equation STEMworks program for the purpose of rating STEM programs. (3) The MiSTEM council shall make specific funding recommendations for the funds allocated under subsection (4) by December 15 of each fiscal year. Each specific funding recommendation must be for a program or demonstration grant approved by the MiSTEM council. All of the following apply: (a) To be eligible for MiSTEM council approval as described in this subsection, a program must satisfy all of the following: (i) Align with this stateâs academic standards. (ii) Have STEMworks or other third-party certification. (iii) Provide project-based experiential learning, student programming, or educator professional learning experiences. (iv) Focus predominantly on classroom-based STEM experiences or professional learning experiences. (b) The MiSTEM council shall approve programs that represent all network regions and include a diverse array of options for students and educators. (c) To be eligible for MiSTEM council approval as described in this subsection, a demonstration grant must satisfy all of the following: (i) Align with this stateâs academic standards. (ii) In collaboration with the department, scale project, problem, or place-based learning in a building or district in support of the statewide STEM strategy as recommended by the MiSTEM council. (d) The MiSTEM council is encouraged to work with the MiSTEM network to develop locally and regionally developed programs, demonstration grants, and professional learning experiences for the programs on the list of approved programs. At the direction of the MiSTEM council, funds can be used to evaluate and market regions, programs, and demonstration grants. (e) If the MiSTEM council is unable to make specific funding recommendations by December 15 of a fiscal year, the department shall award and distribute the funds allocated under subsection (4) on a competitive grant basis that at least follows the statewide STEM strategy plan and rating system recommended by the MiSTEM council. Each grant must provide STEM education-related opportunities for pupils. (4) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $3,800,000.00 for the purpose of funding programs or demonstration grants under this section for 2026-2027 as recommended by the MiSTEM council. (5) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,200,000.00 for 2026-2027 to support the activities and programs of the MiSTEM network regions. From the funds allocated under this subsection, the department shall award the fiscal agent for each MiSTEM network region $220,000.00 for the base operations of each region. The department shall distribute the remaining funds to each fiscal agent in an equal amount per pupil, based on the number of K to 12 pupils enrolled in districts within each region in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (6) A MiSTEM network region shall do all of the following: (a) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council that is located in the MiSTEM region and the department to develop a regional strategic plan for STEM education that creates a robust regional STEM culture, that empowers STEM teachers, that integrates business and education into the STEM network, and that ensures high-quality STEM experiences for pupils. At a minimum, a regional STEM strategic plan described in this subdivision should do all of the following in collaboration with the department: (i) Identify regional employer need for STEM. (ii) Identify processes for regional employers and educators to create guided pathways for STEM careers that include internships or externships, apprenticeships, and other experiential engagements for pupils. (iii) Identify educator professional learning opportunities, including internships or externships and apprenticeships, that integrate this stateâs science standards into high-quality STEM experiences that engage pupils. (b) Facilitate regional STEM events such as educator and employer networking and STEM career fairs to raise STEM awareness. (c) Contribute to the MiSTEM website and engage in other MiSTEM network functions to further the mission of STEM in this state in coordination with the MiSTEM council and the department of labor and economic opportunity. (d) Facilitate application and implementation of state and federal funds under this subsection and any other grants or funds for the MiSTEM network region. (e) Work with districts to provide STEM programming and professional learning. (f) Coordinate recurring discussions and work with the career and educational advisory council to ensure that feedback and best practices are being shared, including funding, program, professional learning opportunities, and regional strategic plans. (g) In collaboration with the department, deploy marketing and outreach efforts to publish the availability of STEM learning opportunities. (7) To receive funds under this section, a grant recipient must allow access for the department or the departmentâs designee to audit all records related to the program for which the grant recipient received those funds. The grant recipient shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in the audit. (8) To receive funds under this section, a grant recipient must provide at least a 10% local match from local public or private resources for the funds received under this subsection. (9) By not later than July 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, grant recipients shall report to the executive director of the MiSTEM network in a form and manner prescribed by the executive director on performance measures developed by the MiSTEM network regions and approved by the executive director. The performance measures must be designed to ensure that the activities of the MiSTEM network are improving student academic outcomes. The report described in this subsection must be published on a publicly accessible website. (10) The MiSTEM network may receive funds from private sources. If the MiSTEM network receives funds from private sources, the MiSTEM network shall expend those funds in alignment with the statewide STEM strategy. (11) Not more than 5% of funds awarded under this section may be retained by a fiscal agent. (12) As used in this section: (a) âCareer and educational advisory councilâ means an advisory council to the local workforce development boards located in a prosperity region consisting of educational, employer, labor, and parent representatives. (b) âDepartmentâ means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (c) âMiSTEM councilâ means the Michigan Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Education Advisory Council created as an advisory body within the department of labor and economic opportunity by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-3, MCL 125.1998. (d) âSTEMâ means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics delivered in an integrated fashion using cross-disciplinary learning experiences that can include language arts, performing and fine arts, and career and technical education. Sec. 99nn. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $2,900,000.00 to an intermediate district to partner with the department and a virtual reality program provider to serve up to 9,000 students in up to 8 districts in a virtual reality simulation pilot program that improves math and science education for students in grades 6 to 12. (2) A virtual reality simulation pilot program described in this section must do all of the following: (a) Offer tactile, multimodal learning experiences that teach core state standards-aligned concepts and skills for grades 6 to 12 mathematics and science, with a focus on improving outcomes on standards-aligned algebra I and middle school math benchmarks. (b) Immerse students in real-world problems across occupations and career clusters to build career exposure and relevance, using 3-D models and interactives that visualize and manipulate abstract mathematical and science concepts. A virtual reality program provider described in this section must have already conducted a randomized controlled trial by a third-party evaluator that demonstrated double-digit growth outcomes in algebra I benchmark assessments. (c) Align with high-skill, high-wage, and high-demand occupations across career clusters aligned with local and market needs. Districts participating in a pilot program described in this section shall provide access to all mathematics and science teachers in a district for the purpose of building the strong quantitative and critical thinking foundations that every student requires to be successful across career clusters. (3) An intermediate district receiving funds under this section shall forward funds received to a virtual reality program provider determined by the department within 30 days of the receipt of funds. The intermediate district may retain up to 2.5% of funds received for administrative costs. The intermediate district bears no responsibility for the operation of the virtual reality pilot program described in this section. (4) To be eligible for funding under this section, an intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department. (5) To be eligible to participate in the pilot program, districts must apply in a form and manner determined by the department. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 101. (1) To be eligible to receive state aid under this article, not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day and not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day, each district superintendent shall submit and certify to the center and the intermediate superintendent, in the form and manner prescribed by the center, the number of pupils enrolled and in regular daily attendance, including identification of tuition-paying pupils, in the district as of the pupil membership count day and as of the supplemental count day, as applicable, for the current school year. In addition, a district maintaining school during the entire year shall submit and certify to the center and the intermediate superintendent, in the form and manner prescribed by the center, the number of pupils enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district for the current school year pursuant to rules promulgated by the superintendent. Not later than the sixth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day and not later than the sixth Wednesday after the supplemental count day, the district shall resolve any pupil membership conflicts with another district, correct any data issues, and recertify the data in a form and manner prescribed by the center and file the certified data with the intermediate superintendent. If a district fails to submit and certify the attendance data, as required under this subsection, the center shall notify the department and the department shall withhold state aid due to be distributed under this article from the defaulting district immediately, beginning with the next payment after the failure and continuing with each payment until the district complies with this subsection. If a district does not comply with this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the district forfeits the amount withheld. A person who willfully falsifies a figure or statement in the certified and sworn copy of enrollment is subject to penalty as prescribed by section 161. (2) To be eligible to receive state aid under this article, not later than the twenty-fourth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day and not later than the twenty-fourth Wednesday after the supplemental count day, an intermediate district shall submit to the center, in a form and manner prescribed by the center, the audited enrollment and attendance data as described in subsection (1) for the pupils of its constituent districts and of the intermediate district. If an intermediate district fails to submit the audited data as required under this subsection, the department shall withhold state aid due to be distributed under this article from the defaulting intermediate district immediately, beginning with the next payment after the failure and continuing with each payment until the intermediate district complies with this subsection. If an intermediate district does not comply with this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the intermediate district forfeits the amount withheld. (3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (11) and (12) all of the following apply to the provision of pupil instruction: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each district shall provide at least 1,098 hours and 180 days of pupil instruction. If a collective bargaining agreement that provides a complete school calendar was in effect for employees of a district as of June 24, 2014, and if that school calendar is not in compliance with this subdivision, then this subdivision does not apply to that district until after the expiration of that collective bargaining agreement. A district may apply for a waiver under subsection (9) or subdivision (h) from the requirements of this subdivision. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a district failing to comply with the required minimum hours and days of pupil instruction under this subsection forfeits from its total state aid allocation an amount determined by applying a ratio of the number of hours or days the district was in noncompliance in relation to the required minimum number of hours and days under this subsection. Not later than the first business day in August, the board of each district shall either certify to the department that the district was in full compliance with this section regarding the number of hours and days of pupil instruction in the previous school year, or report to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the center, each instance of noncompliance. If the district did not provide at least the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under this subsection, the department shall make the deduction of state aid in the following fiscal year from the first payment of state school aid. A district is not subject to forfeiture of funds under this subsection for a fiscal year in which a forfeiture was already imposed under subsection (6). (c) Hours or days lost because of strikes or teachersâ conferences are not counted as hours or days of pupil instruction. (d) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a district does not have at least 75% of the districtâs membership in attendance on any day of pupil instruction, the department shall pay the district state aid in that proportion of 1/180 that the actual percent of attendance bears to 75%. (e) If a district adds 1 or more days of pupil instruction to the end of its instructional calendar for a school year to comply with subdivision (a) because the district otherwise would fail to provide the required minimum number of days of pupil instruction even after the operation of subsection (4) due to conditions not within the control of school authorities, then subdivision (d) does not apply for any day of pupil instruction that is added to the end of the instructional calendar. Instead, for any of those days, if the district does not have at least 60% of the districtâs membership in attendance on that day, the department shall pay the district state aid in that proportion of 1/180 that the actual percentage of attendance bears to 60%. For any day of pupil instruction added to the instructional calendar as described in this subdivision, the district shall report to the department the percentage of the districtâs membership that is in attendance, in the form and manner prescribed by the department. (f) At the request of a district that operates a department-approved alternative education program and that does not provide instruction for pupils in all of grades K to 12, the superintendent shall grant a waiver from the requirements of subdivision (d). The waiver must provide that an eligible district is subject to the proration provisions of subdivision (d) only if the district does not have at least 50% of the districtâs membership in attendance on any day of pupil instruction. In order to be eligible for this waiver, a district must maintain records to substantiate its compliance with the following requirements: (i) The district offers the minimum hours of pupil instruction as required under this section. (ii) For each enrolled pupil, the district uses appropriate academic assessments to develop an individual education plan that leads to a high school diploma. (iii) The district tests each pupil to determine academic progress at regular intervals and records the results of those tests in that pupilâs individual education plan. (g) All of the following apply to a waiver granted under subdivision (f): (i) If the waiver is for a blended model of delivery, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (ii) If the waiver is for a 100% online model of delivery and the educational program for which the waiver is granted makes educational services available to pupils for a minimum of at least 1,098 hours during a school year and ensures that each pupil participates in the educational program for at least 1,098 hours during a school year, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (iii) A waiver that is not a waiver described in subparagraph (i) or (ii) is valid for 3 fiscal years, unless it is revoked by the superintendent, and must be renewed at the end of the 3-year period to remain in effect. (h) Subdivision (d) does not apply to a district-operated special education program approved by the department if the district-operated special education programâs instructional calendar exceeds 180 days of pupil instruction. For any day of instruction provided as part of a district-operated special education program described in this subdivision, the district-operated special education program is exempt from the attendance threshold established under subdivision (d), provided that the district-operated special education program offers the minimum hours of pupil instruction required under this section and maintains documentation of the programâs approved instructional calendar. (i) At the request of a district with fewer than 100 pupils in membership as reported in the most recent fall pupil count, the superintendent shall grant a waiver from the requirements of subdivision (d) if the district demonstrates that the absence of a single household may materially reduce the districtâs daily attendance percentage below the threshold established in subdivision (d). A waiver granted under this subdivision must provide that the district is subject to the proration provisions of subdivision (d) only if the district does not have at least 60% of the districtâs membership in attendance on any day of pupil instruction. The district shall maintain records necessary to substantiate the districtâs eligibility for a waiver granted under this subdivision. (j) The superintendent shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this subsection. (4) All of the following apply to the counting of hours and days of pupil instruction under this section: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the first 6 days or the equivalent number of hours for which pupil instruction is not provided because of conditions not within the control of school authorities, such as severe storms, fires, epidemics, utility power unavailability, water or sewer failure, or health conditions as defined by the city, county, or state health authorities, are counted as hours and days of pupil instruction. For the 2025-2026 school year only, a district may count up to 4 additional days in which pupil instruction is not provided because of conditions not within the control of school authorities as described in this subdivision as hours and days of pupil instruction if all of the following apply: (i) A district seeking to count up to 4 additional days as hours and days of pupil instruction under this subdivision is located wholly or partially in any of the following counties: (A) Mason County. (B) Lake County. (C) Osceola County. (D) Clare County. (E) Gladwin County. (F) Arenac County. (G) Manistee County. (H) Wexford County. (I) Missaukee County. (J) Roscommon County. (K) Ogemaw County. (L) Iosco County. (M) Benzie County. (N) Grand Traverse County. (O) Kalkaska County. (P) Crawford County. (Q) Oscoda County. (R) Alcona County. (S) Leelanau County. (T) Antrim County. (U) Otsego County. (V) Montmorency County. (W) Alpena County. (X) Charlevoix County. (Y) Emmet County. (Z) Cheboygan County. (AA) Presque Isle County. (BB) Gogebic County. (CC) Ontonagon County. (DD) Houghton County. (EE) Iron County. (FF) Baraga County. (GG) Marquette County. (HH) Dickinson County. (II) Menominee County. (JJ) Alger County. (KK) Delta County. (LL) Schoolcraft County. (MM) Luce County. (NN) Chippewa County. (OO) Mackinac County. (PP) Keweenaw County. (ii) A district described in subparagraph (i) was not able to provide pupil instruction on March 12, 13, 16, or 17 due to conditions not within the control of school authorities as described in this subdivision. (iii) A district described in subparagraph (i) counts only the dates described in subparagraph (ii) in which pupil instruction was not provided as additional hours and days of pupil instruction under this subdivision. (b) For the 2025-2026 school year only, a district located in a county described in Executive Order No. 2026-7 or Executive Order No. 2026-9 may count up to 5 additional days in which pupil instruction is not provided because of conditions not within the control of school authorities as described in Executive Order No. 2026-7 or Executive Order No. 2026-9 as hours and days of pupil instruction. (c) For the 2025-2026 school year only, a district located in a county or region described in Executive Order No. 2026-11 may count up to 4 additional days in which pupil instruction is not provided because of conditions not within the control of school authorities as described in Executive Order No. 2026-11 as hours and days of pupil instruction. (d) With the approval of the superintendent of public instruction, the department shall count as hours and days of pupil instruction for a fiscal year not more than 3 additional days or the equivalent number of additional hours for which pupil instruction is not provided in a district due to unusual and extenuating occurrences resulting from conditions not within the control of school authorities such as those conditions described in this subsection. (e) A district that counts hours or days of professional development for teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction, as provided under subsection (10), is eligible to have additional hours or days counted as hours and days of pupil instruction as provided under subdivision (d) to the same extent as a district that does not count hours or days of professional development for teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction. (f) In deciding whether to approve the counting of additional hours or days of pupil instruction under subdivision (d) for a district, the superintendent of public instruction shall not take into account whether or not the district counts hours or days of professional development for teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction, as provided under subsection (10). (g) Subsequent hours or days beyond those described in subdivisions (a) to (d) are not counted as hours or days of pupil instruction. (5) A district does not forfeit part of its state aid appropriation because it adopts or has in existence an alternative scheduling program for pupils in kindergarten if the program provides at least the number of hours required under subsection (3) for a full-time equated membership for a pupil in kindergarten as provided under section 6(4). (6) In addition to any other penalty or forfeiture under this section, if at any time the department determines that 1 or more of the following have occurred in a district, the district forfeits in the current fiscal year beginning in the next payment to be calculated by the department a proportion of the funds due to the district under this article that is equal to the proportion below the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under subsection (3), as specified in the following: (a) The district fails to operate its schools for at least the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under subsection (3) in a school year, including hours and days counted under subsection (4). (b) The board of the district takes formal action not to operate its schools for at least the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under subsection (3) in a school year, including hours and days counted under subsection (4). (7) In providing the minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction required under subsection (3), a district shall use the following guidelines, and a district shall maintain records to substantiate its compliance with the following guidelines: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a pupil must be scheduled for at least the required minimum number of hours of instruction, excluding study halls, or at least the sum of 90 hours plus the required minimum number of hours of instruction, including up to 2 study halls. (b) The time a pupil is assigned to any tutorial activity in a block schedule may be considered instructional time, unless that time is determined in an audit to be a study hall period. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a pupil in grades 9 to 12 for whom a reduced schedule is determined to be in the individual pupilâs best educational interest, or a pupil in grades 6 to 8 for whom a reduced schedule is determined to be in the individual pupilâs best educational interest due to the pupilâs participation in an advanced curriculum, must be scheduled for a number of hours equal to at least 80% of the required minimum number of hours of pupil instruction to be considered a full-time equivalent pupil. A pupil in grades 6 to 12 who is scheduled in a 4-block schedule may receive a reduced schedule under this subsection if the pupil is scheduled for a number of hours equal to at least 75% of the required minimum number of hours of pupil instruction to be considered a full-time equivalent pupil. (d) For a pupil in grades 9 to 12 enrolled in a cooperative education program, or for a special education pupil, in determining full-time equated membership for that pupil, the pupil is not considered less than a full-time equated pupil solely because of the effect of the pupilâs enrollment in the cooperative education program or special education program, including necessary travel time, on the number of class hours provided by the district to the pupil. (e) In grades 7 through 12, instructional time that is part of a Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC) program is considered to be pupil instruction time regardless of whether the instructor is a certificated teacher if all of the following are met: (i) The instructor has met all of the requirements established by the United States Department of Defense and the applicable branch of the armed services for serving as an instructor in the Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps program. (ii) The board of the district or intermediate district employing or assigning the instructor complies with the requirements of sections 1230 and 1230a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230 and 380.1230a, with respect to the instructor to the same extent as if employing the instructor as a regular classroom teacher. (8) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (11) and (12), the department shall apply the guidelines under subsection (7) in calculating the full-time equivalency of pupils. (9) Upon application by the district for a particular fiscal year, the superintendent shall waive for a district the minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction requirement of subsection (3) for a department-approved alternative education program or another innovative program approved by the department, including a 4-day school week. If a district applies for and receives a waiver under this subsection and complies with the terms of the waiver, the district is not subject to forfeiture under this section for the specific program covered by the waiver. If the district does not comply with the terms of the waiver, the amount of the forfeiture is calculated based upon a comparison of the number of hours and days of pupil instruction actually provided to the minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction required under subsection (3). A district shall report pupils enrolled in a department-approved alternative education program under this subsection to the center in a form and manner determined by the center. All of the following apply to a waiver granted under this subsection: (a) If the waiver is for a blended model of delivery, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (b) If the waiver is for a 100% online model of delivery and the educational program for which the waiver is granted makes educational services available to pupils for a minimum of at least 1,098 hours during a school year and ensures that each pupil is on track for course completion at proficiency level, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (c) A waiver that is not a waiver described in subdivision (a) or (b) is valid for 3 fiscal years, unless it is revoked by the superintendent, and must be renewed at the end of the 3-year period to remain in effect. (10) A district may count up to 38 hours of professional development for teachers as hours of pupil instruction. All of the following apply to the counting of professional development as pupil instruction under this subsection: (a) If the professional development exceeds 5 hours in a single day, that day may be counted as a day of pupil instruction. (b) At least 8 hours of the professional development counted as hours of pupil instruction under this subsection must be recommended by a districtwide professional development advisory committee appointed by the district board. The advisory committee must be composed of teachers employed by the district who represent a variety of grades and subject matter specializations, including special education; nonteaching staff; parents; and administrators. The majority membership of the committee must be composed of teaching staff. (c) Professional development provided online is allowable and encouraged, as long as the instruction has been approved by the district. The department shall issue a list of approved online professional development providers that must include the Michigan Virtual School. (d) Professional development may only be counted as hours of pupil instruction under this subsection for the pupils of those teachers scheduled to participate in the professional development. (e) The professional development must meet all of the following to be counted as pupil instruction under this subsection: (i) Be aligned to the school or district improvement plan for the school or district in which the professional development is being provided. (ii) Be linked to 1 or more criteria in the evaluation tool developed or adopted by the district or intermediate district under section 1249 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1249. (iii) Has been approved by the department as counting for state continuing education clock hours. The number of hours of professional development counted as hours of pupil instruction under this subsection may not exceed the number of state continuing education clock hours for which the professional development was approved. (iv) Not more than a combined total of 10 hours of the professional development takes place before the first scheduled day of school for the school year ending in the fiscal year and after the last scheduled day of school for that school year. (v) Not more than 10 hours of the professional development takes place in a single month. (vi) At least 75% of teachers scheduled to participate in the professional development are in attendance. (11) Subsections (3) and (8) do not apply to a school of excellence that is a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. (12) Subsections (3) and (8) do not apply to eligible pupils enrolled in a dropout recovery program that meets the requirements of section 23a. As used in this subsection, âeligible pupilâ means that term as defined in section 23a. (13) At least every 2 years the superintendent shall review the waiver standards set forth in the pupil accounting and auditing manuals to ensure that the waiver standards and waiver process continue to be appropriate and responsive to changing trends in online learning. The superintendent shall solicit and consider input from stakeholders as part of this review. Sec. 104. (1) To receive state aid under this article, a district shall comply with sections 1249, 1278a, 1278b, 1279g, and 1280b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1249, 380.1278a, 380.1278b, 380.1279g, and 380.1280b, and 1970 PA 38, MCL 388.1081 to 388.1086. Subject to subsection (2), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 $40,000,000.00, and there is allocated for 2026-2027 $44,500,000.00, for payments on behalf of districts for costs associated with complying with those provisions of law. In addition, from the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount estimated at $8,000,000.00 and for 2026-2027 an amount estimated at $100.00 funded from DED-OESE, title VI, state assessment funds, and from DED-OSERS, part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1411 to 1419, plus any carryover federal funds from previous year appropriations, for the purposes of complying with the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. (2) The results of each test administered as part of the Michigan student test of educational progress (M‑STEP), including tests administered to high school students, must include an item analysis that lists all items that are counted for individual pupil scores and the percentage of pupils choosing each possible response. The department shall work with the center to identify the number of students enrolled at the time assessments are given by each district. In calculating the percentage of pupils assessed for a districtâs scorecard, the department shall use only the number of pupils enrolled in the district at the time the district administers the assessments and shall exclude pupils who enroll in the district after the district administers the assessments. (3) The department shall distribute federal funds allocated under this section in accordance with federal law and with flexibility provisions outlined in Public Law 107-116, and in the education flexibility partnership act of 1999, Public Law 106-25. (4) The department may recommend, but may not require, districts to allow pupils to use an external keyboard with tablet devices for online M-STEP testing, including, but not limited to, open-ended test items such as constructed response or equation builder items. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments on behalf of districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (6) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated $500,000.00 for 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 for the operation of an online reporting tool to provide student-level assessment data in a secure environment to educators, parents, and pupils immediately after assessments are scored. The department and the center shall ensure that any data collected by the online reporting tool do not provide individually identifiable student data to the federal government. (7) As used in this section: (a) âDEDâ means the United States Department of Education. (b) âDED-OESEâ means the DED Office of Elementary and Secondary Education. (c) âDED-OSERSâ means the DED Office of Special Education and Rehabilitative Services. Sec. 104h. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $11,500,000.00 to districts to implement benchmark assessments during the 2026-2027 school year. All of the following apply to the benchmark assessment system described in this subsection: (a) The system must provide for all of the following: (i) That, within the first 9 weeks of the school year, the district shall administer 1 or more benchmark assessments provided by a provider approved under subsection (5), benchmark assessments described in subdivision (b), or local benchmark assessments, or any combination thereof, to all pupils in grades K to 8 to measure proficiency in reading and mathematics. (ii) That, in addition to the benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments administered under subparagraph (i), by not later than the last day of the school year, the district shall administer the benchmark assessment or assessments administered under subparagraph (i) to all pupils in grades K to 8 to measure proficiency in reading and mathematics. To support fall to spring growth calculations, the same benchmark assessment that is administered in the fall must be administered in the last marking period of the school year. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a district may administer 1 or more of the following benchmark assessments toward meeting the requirements under subdivision (a): (i) A benchmark assessment in reading for students in grades K to 9 that contains progress monitoring tools and enhanced diagnostic assessments. (ii) A benchmark assessment in math for students in grades K to 8 that contains progress monitoring tools. (c) The system must provide that, to the extent practicable, if a district administers a benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments under this section, the district shall administer the same benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments provided by a provider approved under subsection (5), benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments described in subdivision (b), or local benchmark assessment or local benchmark assessments that it administered to pupils in previous school years, as applicable. (d) The system must provide that, if a district administers a benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments under this section, the district shall provide each pupilâs data from the benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments, as available, to the pupilâs parent or legal guardian within 30 days of administering the benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments. (e) The system must provide that, if a local benchmark assessment or local benchmark assessments are administered under subdivision (a), the district shall report to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the local benchmark assessment or local benchmark assessments that were administered and how that assessment or those assessments measure changes, including any losses, as applicable, in learning, and the districtâs plan for addressing any losses in learning. (2) To receive funding under this section, a district must do all of the following: (a) Apply for the funding in a form and manner prescribed by the department. (b) Administer 1 or more of the benchmark assessments described in subsection (5), excluding the benchmark assessment described in subsection (4). (c) Administer the same benchmark assessment or assessments in both the fall and spring, as required under this section. (d) Meet all reporting requirements to parents and legal guardians as described in this section. (3) Subject to subsection (2), the department shall pay an equal amount per membership pupil in grades K to 8 in the district to each district that applies for funding under this section. (4) The department shall make 1 of the benchmark assessments provided by a provider approved under subsection (5) available to districts at no cost to the districts for purposes of meeting the requirements under this section. The benchmark assessment described in this subsection must meet all of the following: (a) Be aligned to the content standards of this state. (b) Complement this stateâs summative assessment system. (c) Be internet-delivered and include a standards-based assessment. (d) Provide information on pupil achievement with regard to learning content required in a given year or grade span. (e) Provide timely feedback to pupils and teachers. (f) Be nationally normed. (g) Provide information to educators about student growth and allow for multiple testing opportunities. (h) Include a digital library of teaching resources that are tied directly to the benchmark assessment and aligned to this stateâs standards. (5) The department shall approve at least 4 but not more than 6 providers of benchmark assessments for the purposes of this section. The department shall inform districts of all of the providers approved under this subsection in an equitable manner. The benchmark assessments, with the exclusion of the benchmark assessment described in subsection (4), provided by approved providers under this subsection must meet all of the following: (a) Be aligned to the content standards of this state. (b) Complement the stateâs summative assessment system. (c) Be internet-delivered and include a standards-based remote, in-person, or both remote and in-person assessment using a computer-adaptive model to target the instructional level of each pupil. (d) Provide information on pupil achievement with regard to learning content required in a given year or grade span. (e) Provide immediate feedback to pupils and teachers. (f) Be nationally normed. (g) Provide multiple measures of growth and provide for multiple testing opportunities. Sec. 107. (1) From the state school aid fund appropriation in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $42,525,000.00 for 2026-2027 for adult education programs authorized under this section. Except as otherwise provided under subsections (14) and (15), funds allocated under this section are restricted for adult education programs as authorized under this section only. A recipient of funds under this section shall not use those funds for any other purpose. (2) To be eligible for funding under this section, an eligible adult education provider shall employ certificated teachers and qualified administrative staff and shall offer continuing education opportunities for teachers to allow them to maintain certification. (3) To be eligible to be a participant funded under this section, an individual must be enrolled in an adult basic education program, an adult secondary education program, an adult English as a second language program, a high school equivalency test preparation program, or a high school completion program, that meets the requirements of this section, and for which instruction is provided, and the individual must be at least 18 years of age by July 1 of the program year and the individualâs graduating class must have graduated. (4) By April 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the intermediate districts within a prosperity region or subregion shall determine which intermediate district will serve as the prosperity regionâs or subregionâs fiscal agent for the next fiscal year and shall notify the department in a form and manner determined by the department. The department shall approve or disapprove of the prosperity regionâs or subregionâs selected fiscal agent. From the funds allocated under subsection (1), an amount as determined under this subsection is allocated to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent for adult education programs in each of the prosperity regions or subregions identified by the department. An intermediate district shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated under this subsection for administration costs for serving as the fiscal agent. The allocation provided to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent must be calculated as follows: (a) Sixty percent of this portion of the funding must be distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of individuals between the ages of 18 and 24 that are not high school graduates that resides in each of the prosperity regions or subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by the most recent 5‑year estimates from the American Community Survey (ACS) from the United States Census Bureau. (b) Thirty-five percent of this portion of the funding must be distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of individuals age 25 or older who are not high school graduates that resides in each of the prosperity regions or subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by the most recent 5-year estimates from the ACS from the United States Census Bureau. (c) Five percent of this portion of the funding must be distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of individuals age 18 or older who lack basic English language proficiency that resides in each of the prosperity regions or subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by the most recent 5-year estimates from the ACS from the United States Census Bureau. (5) To be an eligible fiscal agent, an intermediate district must agree to do the following in a form and manner determined by the department: (a) Distribute funds to adult education programs in a prosperity region or subregion as described in this section. (b) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council, which is an advisory council of the workforce development boards located in the prosperity region or subregion, or its successor, to develop a regional strategy that aligns adult education programs and services into an efficient and effective delivery system for adult education learners, with special consideration for providing contextualized learning and career pathways and addressing barriers to education and employment. (c) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council, which is an advisory council of the workforce development boards located in the prosperity region or subregion, or its successor, to create a local process and criteria that will identify eligible adult education providers to receive funds allocated under this section based on location, demand for services, past performance, quality indicators as identified by the department, and cost to provide instructional services. The fiscal agent shall determine all local processes, criteria, and provider determinations. However, the local processes, criteria, and provider services must be approved by the department before funds may be distributed to the fiscal agent. (d) Provide oversight to its adult education providers throughout the program year to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section. (e) Report adult education program and participant data and information as prescribed by the department. (6) An adult basic education program, an adult secondary education program, or an adult English as a second language program operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under this section, subject to all of the following: (a) The program enrolls adults who are determined by a department-approved assessment, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, to be below twelfth grade level in reading or mathematics, or both, or to lack basic English proficiency. (b) The program tests individuals for eligibility under subdivision (a) before enrollment and upon completion of the program in compliance with the state-approved assessment policy. (c) A participant in an adult basic education program is eligible for reimbursement until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participantâs reading and mathematics proficiency are assessed at or above the ninth grade level. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive assessments after having completed at least 450 hours of instruction. (d) A participant in an adult secondary education program is eligible for reimbursement until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participantâs reading and mathematics proficiency are assessed above the twelfth grade level. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive assessments after having at least 450 hours of instruction. (e) A funding recipient enrolling a participant in an English as a second language program is eligible for funding according to subsection (9) until the participant meets 1 of the following: (i) The participant is assessed as having attained basic English proficiency as determined by a department-approved assessment. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive department-approved assessments after having completed at least 450 hours of instruction. The department shall provide information to a funding recipient regarding appropriate assessment instruments for this program. (7) A high school equivalency test preparation program operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under this section, subject to all of the following: (a) The program enrolls adults who do not have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate. (b) The program administers a pre-test approved by the department before enrolling an individual to determine the individualâs literacy levels, administers a high school equivalency practice test to determine the individualâs potential for success on the high school equivalency test, and administers a post-test upon completion of the program in compliance with the state-approved assessment policy. (c) A funding recipient receives funding according to subsection (9) for a participant, and a participant may be enrolled in the program until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participant achieves a high school equivalency certificate. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive department-approved assessments used to determine readiness to take a high school equivalency test after having completed at least 450 hours of instruction. (8) A high school completion program operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under this section, subject to all of the following: (a) The program enrolls adults who do not have a high school diploma. (b) The program tests participants described in subdivision (a) before enrollment and upon completion of the program in compliance with the state-approved assessment policy. (c) A funding recipient receives funding according to subsection (9) for a participant in a course offered under this subsection until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participant passes the course and earns a high school diploma. (ii) The participant fails to earn credit in 2 successive semesters or terms in which the participant is enrolled after having completed at least 900 hours of instruction. (9) The department shall make payments to a funding recipient under this section in accordance with all of the following: (a) Statewide allocation criteria, including 3-year average enrollments, census data, and local needs. (b) Participant completion of the adult basic education objectives by achieving an educational gain as determined by the national reporting system levels; for achieving basic English proficiency, as determined by the department; for achieving a high school equivalency certificate or passage of 1 or more individual high school equivalency tests; for attainment of a high school diploma or passage of a course required for a participant to attain a high school diploma; for enrollment in a postsecondary institution; or for entry into or retention of employment, as applicable. (c) Participant completion of core indicators as identified in the workforce innovation and opportunity act, Public Law 113-128. (d) Allowable expenditures. (10) An individual who is not eligible to be a participant funded under this section may receive adult education services upon the payment of tuition. In addition, an individual who is not eligible to be served in a program under this section due to the program limitations specified in subsection (6), (7), or (8) may continue to receive adult education services in that program upon the payment of tuition. The local or intermediate district conducting the program shall determine the tuition amount. (11) An individual who is an inmate in a state correctional facility is not counted as a participant under this section. (12) A funding recipient shall not commingle money received under this section or from another source for adult education purposes with any other funds and shall establish a separate ledger account for funds received under this section. This subsection does not prohibit a district from using general funds of the district to support an adult education or community education program. (13) A funding recipient receiving funds under this section may establish a sliding scale of tuition rates based upon a participantâs family income. A funding recipient may charge a participant tuition to receive adult education services under this section from that sliding scale of tuition rates on a uniform basis. The amount of tuition charged per participant must not exceed the actual operating cost per participant minus any funds received under this section per participant. A funding recipient may not charge a participant tuition under this section if the participantâs income is at or below 200% of the federal poverty guidelines published by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (14) To receive funds under this section, a funding recipient shall furnish to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, all information needed to administer this program and meet federal reporting requirements; shall allow the department or the departmentâs designee to review all records related to the program for which it receives funds; and shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in the review, as determined by the department. In addition, a funding recipient shall agree to pay to a career and technical education program under section 61a the amount of funding received under this section in the proportion of career and technical education coursework used to satisfy adult basic education programming, as billed to the funding recipient by programs operating under section 61a. (15) From the amount appropriated in subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 is allocated for 2026-2027 to approved adult education programs that connect adult education participants with employers as provided under this subsection. The department shall determine regional planning allocations under this subsection to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent for adult education programs in each of the prosperity regions or subregions identified by the department in the same proportion as funding calculated and allocated under subsection (4). Funds not fully utilized within a region may be transferred to other regions as appropriate. To be eligible for funding under this subsection, a program must provide a collaboration linking adult education programs within the county, state-approved career and technical education programs, and local employers. To receive funding under this subsection, an eligible program must satisfy all of the following: (a) Connect adult education participants directly with employers by linking adult education, career and technical skills, and workforce development. (b) Require adult education staff to work with Michigan Works! agency to identify a cohort of participants who are most prepared to successfully enter the workforce. Except as otherwise provided under this subdivision, participants identified under this subsection must be dually enrolled in adult education programming and in at least 1 state-approved technical course through a career and technical education program. A program that links participants identified under this subsection with adult education programming and commercial driver license courses does not need to enroll the participants in at least 1 state-approved technical course through a career and technical education program to be considered an eligible program under this subsection. (c) Employ an individual staffed as an adult education navigator who will serve as a caseworker for each participant identified under subdivision (b). The navigator shall work with adult education staff and potential employers to design an educational program best suited to the personal and employment needs of the participant and shall work with human service agencies or other entities to address any barrier in the way of participant access. (16) By not later than December 1 of each year, a program funded under subsection (15) shall provide a report to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, to the senate and house fiscal agencies, and to the state budget director identifying the number of participants, graduation rates, and a measure of transition to employment. (17) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, participants under subsection (15) must be concurrently enrolled and actively working toward obtaining a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate. Concurrent enrollment is not required under this subsection for a participant that was enrolled in adult education during the same program year and obtained a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate before enrollment in an eligible career and technical skills program under subsection (15). Up to 10% of adult education participants served under subsection (15) may already have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate at the time of enrollment in an eligible career and technical skills program under subsection (15) and receive remediation services. It is intended that the cap described in the immediately preceding sentence is continually lowered on an annual basis until it eventually is 0%. (18) The department shall approve at least 2 high school equivalency tests and determine whether a high school equivalency certificate meets the requisite standards for high school equivalency in this state. (19) As used in this section: (a) âCareer and educational advisory councilâ means an advisory council to the local workforce development boards located in a prosperity region consisting of educational, employer, labor, and parent representatives. (b) âCareer pathwayâ means a combination of rigorous and high-quality education, training, and other services that comply with all of the following: (i) Aligns with the skill needs of industries in the economy of this state or in the regional economy involved. (ii) Prepares an individual to be successful in any of a full range of secondary or postsecondary education options, including apprenticeships registered under the act of August 16, 1937, commonly referred to as the national apprenticeship act, 29 USC 50 et seq. (iii) Includes counseling to support an individual in achieving the individualâs education and career goals. (iv) Includes, as appropriate, education offered concurrently with and in the same context as workforce preparation activities and training for a specific occupation or occupational cluster. (v) Organizes education, training, and other services to meet the particular needs of an individual in a manner that accelerates the educational and career advancement of the individual to the extent practicable. (vi) Enables an individual to attain a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent, and at least 1 recognized postsecondary credential. (vii) Helps an individual enter or advance within a specific occupation or occupational cluster. (c) âDepartmentâ means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (d) âEligible adult education providerâ means a district, intermediate district, a consortium of districts, a consortium of intermediate districts, or a consortium of districts and intermediate districts that is identified as part of the local process described in subsection (5)(c) and approved by the department. Sec. 147. (1) The allocation for 2026-2027 for the public school employeesâ retirement system pursuant to the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, is made using the individual projected benefit entry age normal cost method of valuation and risk assumptions adopted by the public school employees retirement board and the department of technology, management, and budget. (2) The annual level percentage of payroll contribution rates for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, as determined by the retirement system, are estimated as follows: (a) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010 and who are enrolled in the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 41.02% with 27.51% paid directly by the employer. (b) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit on or after July 1, 2010 and who are enrolled in the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 36.28% with 22.77% paid directly by the employer. (c) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit on or after July 1, 2010 and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 34.85% with 21.34% paid directly by the employer. (d) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit on or after September 4, 2012, who elect defined contribution, and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 28.72% with 15.21% paid directly by the employer. (e) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010, who elect defined contribution, and who are enrolled in the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 30.15% with 16.64% paid directly by the employer. (f) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010, who elect defined contribution, and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 28.72% with 15.21% paid directly by the employer. (g) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010 and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 39.59% with 26.08% paid directly by the employer. (h) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit after January 31, 2018 and who elect to become members of the MPSERS plan, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 34.92% with 21.41% paid directly by the employer. (3) In addition to the employer payments described in subsection (2), the employer shall pay the applicable contributions to the Tier 2 plan, as determined by the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. (4) The contribution rates in subsection (2) reflect an amortization period of 12 years for 2026-2027. The public school employeesâ retirement system board shall notify each district and intermediate district by February 28 of each fiscal year of the estimated contribution rate for the next fiscal year. Sec. 147a. From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $379,900,000.00 for 2025-2026 and an amount not to exceed $351,100,000.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to participating districts and intermediate districts and from the general fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 for payments to participating district libraries. The amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection is based on each participating entityâs reported quarterly payroll for members that became tier 1 before February 1, 2018 for the current fiscal year. A participating entity that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting a portion of the normal cost contribution rate. As used in this section: (a) âDistrict libraryâ means a district library established under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.171 to 397.196. (b) âParticipating entityâ means a district, intermediate district, or district library that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. Sec. 147b. (1) The MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund interest and earnings from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. (3) Money available in the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (4) Money in the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund at the close of the fiscal year lapses to the state school aid fund. The department of treasury is the administrator of the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund for auditing purposes. Sec. 147c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $1,536,500,000.00 and there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $1,454,400,000.00 for payments to districts and intermediate districts that are participating entities of the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system. In addition, from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $300,000.00 for payments to district libraries that are participating entities of the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system. All of the following apply to funding under this subsection: (a) The amounts allocated under this subsection are estimated to provide an average MPSERS rate cap per pupil amount for districts of $1,100.00. (b) Payments made under this subsection are equal to the difference between the unfunded actuarial accrued liability contribution rate as calculated under section 41 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341, as calculated without taking into account the maximum employer rate of 15.21% included in section 41 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341, and the maximum employer rate of 15.21% included in section 41 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341. (c) The amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection is based on each participating entityâs proportion of the total covered payroll for the immediately preceding fiscal year for the same type of participating entities. A participating entity that receives funds under this subsection shall use the funds solely for the purpose of retirement contributions as specified in subdivision (d). (d) Each participating entity receiving funds under this subsection shall forward an amount equal to the amount allocated under subdivision (c) to the retirement system in a form, manner, and time frame determined by the retirement system. (e) Funds allocated under this subsection should be considered when comparing a districtâs growth in total state aid funding from 1 fiscal year to the next. (f) By not later than December 20 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this subsection, the department shall publish and post on its website an estimated MPSERS rate cap per pupil for each district. (2) As used in this section: (a) âDistrict libraryâ means a district library established under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.171 to 397.196. (b) âMPSERS rate cap per pupilâ means an amount equal to the quotient of the districtâs payment under this section divided by the districtâs pupils in membership. (c) âParticipating entityâ means, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a district, intermediate district, or district library that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (d) âRetirement systemâ means the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. Sec. 147e. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 and there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $88,800,000.00 for payments to participating entities. (2) The payment to each participating entity under this section is the sum of the amounts under this subsection as follows: (a) An amount equal to the contributions made by a participating entity for the additional contribution made to a qualified participantâs Tier 2 account in an amount equal to the contribution made by the qualified participant not to exceed 3% of the qualified participantâs compensation as provided for under section 131(6) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1431. (b) Beginning October 1, 2017, an amount equal to the contributions made by a participating entity for a qualified participant who is only a Tier 2 qualified participant under section 81d of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1381d, not to exceed 4%, and, beginning February 1, 2018, not to exceed 1%, of the qualified participantâs compensation. (c) An amount equal to the increase in employer normal cost contributions under section 41b(2) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341b, for a member that was hired after February 1, 2018 and chose to participate in Tier 1, compared to the employer normal cost contribution for a member under section 41b(1) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341b. (3) As used in this section: (a) âMemberâ means that term as defined under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. (b) âParticipating entityâ means a district, intermediate district, or community college that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (c) âQualified participantâ means that term as defined under section 124 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1424. Sec. 152a. (1) As required by the court in the consolidated cases known as Adair v State of Michigan, 486 Mich 468 (2010), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $41,000,500.00 to be used solely for the purpose of paying necessary costs related to the state-mandated collection, maintenance, and reporting of data to this state. From this allocation, $3,000,000.00 is allocated for costs associated with collecting data necessary to provide reporting to tribal governments on the status of students affiliated with their particular tribe and data necessary to determine student participation in federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and participation in federal programs funded under the Johnson-OâMalley supplemental Indian education program modernization act, Public Law 115-404. (2) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts in an equal amount per pupil based on the total number of pupils in membership in each district and intermediate district. The department shall not make any adjustment to these payments after the final installment payment under section 17b is made. Sec. 152b. (1) From the general fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 to reimburse actual costs incurred by nonpublic schools in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or administrative rule of this state. (2) By January 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the department shall publish a form for reporting actual costs incurred by a nonpublic school in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated under state law containing each health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or administrative rule of this state applicable to a nonpublic school and with a reference to each relevant provision of law or administrative rule for the requirement. The form must be posted on the departmentâs website in electronic form. (3) By June 30 of each applicable fiscal year, a nonpublic school seeking reimbursement for actual costs incurred in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state during each applicable school year must submit a completed form described in subsection (2) to the department. This section does not require a nonpublic school to submit a form described in subsection (2). A nonpublic school is not eligible for reimbursement under this section if the nonpublic school does not submit the form described in subsection (2) in a timely manner. (4) By August 15 of each applicable fiscal year, the department shall distribute funds to each nonpublic school that submits a completed form described under subsection (2) in a timely manner. The superintendent shall determine the amount of funds to be paid to each nonpublic school in an amount that does not exceed the nonpublic schoolâs actual costs in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state. The superintendent shall calculate a nonpublic schoolâs actual cost in accordance with this section. (5) If the funds allocated under this section are insufficient to fully fund payments as otherwise calculated under this section, the department shall distribute funds under this section on a prorated or other equitable basis as determined by the superintendent. (6) The department may review the records of a nonpublic school submitting a form described in subsection (2) only for the limited purpose of verifying the nonpublic schoolâs compliance with this section. If a nonpublic school does not allow the department to review records under this subsection, the nonpublic school is not eligible for reimbursement under this section. (7) The funds appropriated under this section are for purposes that are incidental to teaching and the provision of educational services to nonpublic school students; that are noninstructional in nature; that do not constitute a primary function or element necessary for a nonpublic schoolâs existence, operation, and survival; that do not involve or result in excessive religious entanglement; and that are intended for the public purpose of ensuring the health, safety, and welfare of the children in nonpublic schools and to reimburse nonpublic schools for costs described in this section. (8) Funds allocated under this section are not intended to aid or maintain any nonpublic school, support the attendance of any student at a nonpublic school, employ any person at a nonpublic school, support the attendance of any student at any location where instruction is offered to a nonpublic school student, or support the employment of any person at any location where instruction is offered to a nonpublic school student. (9) For purposes of this section, âactual costâ means the hourly wage for the employee or employees performing a task or tasks required to comply with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state identified by the department under subsection (2) and is to be calculated in accordance with the form published by the department under subsection (2), which must include a detailed itemization of costs. The nonpublic school shall not charge more than the hourly wage of its lowest-paid employee capable of performing a specific task regardless of whether that individual is available and regardless of who actually performs a specific task. Labor costs under this subsection must be estimated and charged in increments of 15 minutes or more, with all partial time increments rounded down. When calculating costs under subsection (4), fee components must be itemized in a manner that expresses both the hourly wage and the number of hours charged. The nonpublic school may not charge any applicable labor charge amount to cover or partially cover the cost of health or fringe benefits. A nonpublic school shall not charge any overtime wages in the calculation of labor costs. (10) Training fees, inspection fees, and criminal background check fees are considered actual costs in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state. (11) The department shall reimburse nonpublic schools for actual costs incurred in complying with health, safety, or welfare requirements under a law or administrative rule of this state from 2017-2018 through 2022-2023 using work project funds or, if those funds are insufficient to fund reimbursements under this subsection, from the allocation under subsection (1). Sec. 152c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $2,500,000.00 to Marquette-Alger Regional Educational Agency to develop statewide supports for the federal tribal consultation requirements under the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114‑95. (2) Marquette-Alger Regional Educational Agency shall use the funds to support a collaboration that includes, but is not limited to: (a) Elected tribal leadership from federally recognized tribes in Michigan. (b) The Confederation of Michigan Tribal Education Departments. (c) School, district, and intermediate district leadership, including elected board members. (d) Directors of programs impacted by the federal tribal consultation requirements. (e) The departmentâs indigenous education initiative. (3) The collaboration described in subsection (2) shall do both of the following: (a) Create, disseminate, and evaluate professional learning to support the implementation of the federal tribal consultation requirements. (b) By not later than January 1, 2028, and January 1 of each subsequent fiscal year, prepare a summary report that includes measurable outcomes to evaluate the progress made in the development of effective government-to-government relations. The report described in this subdivision must be submitted to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director. (4) All of the following apply to professional learning described in subsection (3)(a): (a) The professional learning must include at least the following: (i) Identification of native students, including: (A) Federal identification guidelines from the federal office of management and budget under statistical policy directive number 15 for American Indian and Alaska Native students. (B) Tribal affiliation data collection guidelines under MCL 388.1694a. (C) Program participation data collection guidelines under MCL 388.1694a for federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and the Johnson-OâMalley supplemental Indian education program modernization act, Public Law 115-404. (ii) Guidelines and rules related to data sharing from districts to federally recognized tribes as governed by the federal education rights and privacy act, 20 USC 1232, 34 CFR Part 99; the federal protection of pupil rights amendment, 20 USC 1232g, 34 CFR Part 98; and section 1136 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1136. (iii) The federal tribal consultation requirements under the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. (iv) Key elements of effective tribal consultation. (b) The initial professional learning must be made available to all administrators, staff, and board members in each district and intermediate district by September 30, 2027, with additional resources released at least annually during the course of the work project. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 163. (1) Except as otherwise provided in the revised school code or rules promulgated by the department, the board of a district or intermediate district shall not permit any of the following: (a) An individual who is not appropriately placed under a valid certificate, valid substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued under rules promulgated by the department to teach in an elementary or secondary school. (b) An individual who does not satisfy the requirements of section 1233 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1233, and rules promulgated by the department to provide school counselor services to pupils in an elementary or secondary school. (c) An individual who does not satisfy the requirements of section 1246 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1246, and rules promulgated by the department to be employed as a superintendent, principal, assistant principal, or as an individual whose primary responsibility is to administer instructional programs in an elementary or secondary school or in a district or intermediate district, unless the individual is working under a valid substitute permit issued under rules promulgated by the department. (2) If the department or the departmentâs designee determines that a district or intermediate district has employed or assigned an individual in violation of this section, the department or the departmentâs designee shall provide written notice of noncompliance to the district or intermediate district. The written notice must identify the individual, the affected assignment, the nature of the noncompliance, and the date on which the notice is issued. The written notice must also state that the district or intermediate district has 15 school days after receiving the notice to correct the noncompliance before a state aid adjustment is imposed under this section. (3) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (5), if a district or intermediate district does not correct an instance of noncompliance within 15 school days after receiving the written notice under subsection (2), the department shall make a state aid adjustment as follows: (a) If the district or intermediate district does not correct the noncompliance within 15 school days after receiving written notice under subsection (2), the department shall make a state aid adjustment of $50,000.00 on the sixteenth school day after the district or intermediate district receives the notice. (b) Beginning on the seventeenth school day after the district or intermediate district receives the notice, the department shall make an additional state aid adjustment of $1,000.00 for each school day the individual continues to be employed or assigned in violation of this section. (c) The total state aid adjustment under this subsection must not exceed $100,000.00 per individual per assignment per fiscal year. (d) No state aid adjustment shall be made for any period of noncompliance that occurs before the district or intermediate district receives written notice under subsection (2). (e) No state aid adjustment shall be made if the district or intermediate district corrects the noncompliance within 15 school days after receiving written notice under subsection (2). (4) A determination of noncompliance under subsection (2) is final unless the district or intermediate district requests review by the superintendent of public instruction within 30 calendar days after receiving the written notice under subsection (2). A request for review does not stay the 15-school-day correction period or the accrual of a state aid adjustment under subsection (3), unless the superintendent of public instruction determines that a stay is warranted. (5) A state aid adjustment under subsection (3) may be reduced or waived, in whole or in part, if the superintendent of public instruction finds that the district or intermediate district was hindered in its ability to comply with this section due to unusual and extenuating circumstances resulting from conditions not within the control of school authorities. Unusual and extenuating circumstances under this subsection may include, but are not limited to, a natural disaster, death or serious illness of the individual or another employee, an emergency school closure, a documented technical issue with the systems used to obtain the required certification, permit, authorization, or approval, fraud or other intentional wrongdoing of the individual or another employee, or an emergency health condition as defined by city, county, or state health authorities. In determining whether to reduce or waive a state aid adjustment, the superintendent of public instruction may consider whether the district or intermediate district had adequate systems and procedures in place to prevent noncompliance and whether the district or intermediate district took timely and reasonable action to correct the noncompliance after discovering or being notified of the violation. (6) A state aid adjustment under this section for an educator misplacement is in lieu of any membership adjustment under section 6 or section 15 based on the same individual, district or intermediate district, assignment, and period of noncompliance. (7) If a school official is notified by the department or the departmentâs designee that the school official is employing or assigning an individual in violation of this section and knowingly continues to employ or assign that individual in violation of this section, the school official is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of $1,500.00 for each incident. This penalty is in addition to any state aid adjustment imposed under this section. (8) As used in this section: (a) âAssignmentâ means a specific class, course, subject area, instructional setting, administrative position, school counselor position, or other position for which an individual is responsible. (b) âEducator misplacementâ means the employment or assignment of an individual in violation of subsection (1). (c) âSchool dayâ means a day on which pupils are scheduled to receive instruction in the affected building, program, or assignment. (d) âWritten noticeâ means notice issued by the department or its designee to the district or intermediate district identifying a violation of this section. Sec. 164k. (1) If the department receives a report that a district or intermediate district is violating any of the following requirements, and the department confirms the violation, the department shall withhold 5% of the payment the district is eligible to receive under section 22b, or 5% of the payment the intermediate district is eligible to receive under section 81, as applicable, for as long as the district or intermediate district is out of compliance: (a) A district or intermediate district shall ensure that all food made available to a student in the breakfast or lunch program complies with all federal rules and regulations related to school meals, including provisions restricting access to soda and candy as described in federal Smart Snacks Standards. (b) To the extent practicable under federal regulations, a district or intermediate district shall require each student household to complete the child nutrition and education benefits application, as provided by the department, for free and reduced-price school meals regardless of whether the district or intermediate district opts to provide universal breakfast or lunch. (c) For pupil membership count days after the fall 2025 count, a district or intermediate district shall not provide a financial incentive to students for attending pupil membership count day. (d) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the board of a district or intermediate district shall ensure that each school operated by the board implements the presidential fitness test for all students enrolled in physical education classes, consistent with guidance developed by the department under subsection (2) and except as otherwise stated in a studentâs individual education plan, in accordance with the suggestions and strategies promulgated under federal Executive Order No. 14327, 90 Fed. Reg. 37993 (July 31, 2025). (2) The department, in consultation with the Governorâs Council on Physical Fitness, Health, and Sports, shall develop guidance for the implementation of the presidential fitness test under subsection (1)(d). The guidance must be consistent with applicable state and federal law. The guidance must include, but is not limited to, both of the following: (a) That any student with an individualized education plan (IEP) is not required to participate in the presidential fitness test, unless that studentâs IEP otherwise requires the presidential fitness test. (b) A requirement that the presidential fitness test may only be administered in physical education classes, if such classes are offered by the school. Sec. 164l. (1) Not later than 30 days after the enactment of any amendatory act to this article, the house and senate shall provide to the responsible entity and the state budget director a list of legislatively directed spending items, as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a, that are funded by the amendatory act. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed under sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department has available at the time of posting for grants awarded. Sec. 164m. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 22b(3)(g), a district that receives funds under section 22b(4) must do all of the following: (a) Use funds received for purposes including, but not limited to, student achievement and success, literacy, mathematics, and providing direct English language development instruction. (b) Administer to English language learners the English language proficiency assessment known as the âWIDA ACCESS for English language learnersâ or the âWIDA Alternate ACCESSâ. (c) Agree to meet or exceed the minimum number of minutes per week, as determined by the department under subsection (2), that the district provides direct English language development instruction. (d) Implement a multi-tiered system of supports that is an evidence-based framework that uses data-driven problem solving to integrate academic and behavioral instruction and that uses intervention delivered to all pupils in varying intensities based on pupil needs. The multi-tiered system of supports must be implemented in grades K to 12 or, if the district does not operate all of grades K to 12, for all of the grades the district operates. The multi-tiered system of supports described in this subdivision must provide at least all of the following essential components: (i) Team-based leadership. (ii) A tiered delivery system. (iii) Selection and implementation of instruction, interventions, and supports. (iv) A comprehensive screening and assessment system. (v) Continuous data-based decision making. (e) Support pupil needs for pupils counted toward the districtâs weighted pupil membership, including, but not limited to, items identified in a districtâs Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP) plan. An amount not to exceed 2% of the amount received under section 22b(4) may be used to support administrative costs related to complying with this section. Administrative costs include, but are not limited to, central office salaries and benefits, business and fiscal services, and school administrative staff and expenses, and do not include costs associated with direct instructional staff working with pupils counted toward the weighted pupil membership. (f) Provide information to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, necessary for the department to monitor programs and services described in this section for compliance with the requirements of this section and to ensure the multi-tiered system of supports and English language learner programs are implemented with fidelity. (g) Allow access for the department or the departmentâs designee to audit all records related to the program for which the district receives those funds. The district shall reimburse this state for all disallowances found in any audit. (h) Communicate the following information to parents and legal guardians at least annually, as applicable for grades offered by the district: (i) Literacy-related results for the district, including multiyear trend data, from the grade 3 Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP), the grade 7 Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP), and the SAT for pupils who are economically disadvantaged or English language learners. The district shall ensure that information described in this subparagraph is reported in a manner that safeguards pupil privacy. (ii) Information detailing the amount of funding received under section 22b(4), how the district distributed that funding, and what evidence-based interventions were implemented with that funding. The information reported under this subparagraph must include a method, including contact information, for parents or legal guardians to provide feedback on the use of the funding as well as to seek more information about services and interventions available for their children. (2) The department shall establish English language learner program models that establish a minimum number of minutes per week that districts must provide direct English language development instruction for pupils according to the pupilâs proficiency levels. The program models described in this subsection must comply with federal requirements related to English language learner program services. (3) The department shall monitor districts for compliance with this section and may require districts to provide any information to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, necessary to fulfill this requirement. (4) As used in this section, âEnglish language learnerâ and âweighted pupil membershipâ mean those terms as defined in section 6. Sec. 164n. By not later than 6 months after the state budget office issues work project letters, and again on or before April 15, the department and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall submit an annual report to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the senate and house policy offices that summarizes all work project accounts. The report described in this section must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 164o. Districts and intermediate districts are encouraged to evaluate and pursue efficiency and cost-containment measures that maximize state funding. Districts and intermediate districts shall identify practices that increase efficiencies, including, but not limited to, establishing joint ventures, consolidating services, utilizing program collaborations, maximizing educational benefits through optimal class sizes and frequency of course offerings, eliminating low-enrollment and high-cost instructional programs, using self-insurance, practicing energy conservation, and utilizing group purchasing. Sec. 201. (1) Subject to the conditions set forth in this article, the amounts listed in this section are appropriated for community colleges for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the funds indicated in this section. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this section and section 201f: (a) The gross appropriation is $496,663,500.00. After deducting total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers in the amount of $0.00, the adjusted gross appropriation is $496,663,500.00. (b) The sources of the adjusted gross appropriation described in subdivision (a) are as follows: (i) Total federal revenues, $0.00. (ii) Total local revenues, $0.00. (iii) Total private revenues, $0.00. (iv) Total other state restricted revenues, Â $496,663,500.00. (v) State general fund/general purpose money, $0.00. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the amount appropriated for community college operations is $363,594,500.00, allocated as follows: (a) The appropriation for Alpena Community College is $6,431,400.00, $6,403,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $28,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (b) The appropriation for Bay de Noc Community College is $6,410,300.00, $6,298,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $112,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (c) The appropriation for Delta College is $16,928,400.00, $16,882,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $46,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (d) The appropriation for Glen Oaks Community College is $2,984,500.00, $2,984,100.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (e) The appropriation for Gogebic Community College is $5,417,900.00, $5,399,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $18,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (f) The appropriation for Grand Rapids Community College is $21,387,200.00, $21,184,200.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $203,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (g) The appropriation for Henry Ford College is $25,308,100.00, $25,300,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $7,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (h) The appropriation for Jackson College is $14,054,800.00, $14,032,600.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $22,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (i) The appropriation for Kalamazoo Valley Community College is $14,744,600.00, $14,704,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $40,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (j) The appropriation for Kellogg Community College is $11,470,000.00, $11,426,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $43,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (k) The appropriation for Kirtland Community College is $3,881,400.00, $3,835,100.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $46,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (l) The appropriation for Lake Michigan College is $6,417,300.00, $6,408,200.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $9,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (m) The appropriation for Lansing Community College is $36,206,200.00, $36,134,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $71,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (n) The appropriation for Macomb Community College is $38,187,600.00, $38,160,600.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $27,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (o) The appropriation for Mid Michigan Community College is $5,921,400.00, $5,837,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $84,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (p) The appropriation for Monroe County Community College is $5,371,200.00, $5,368,500.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $2,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (q) The appropriation for Montcalm Community College is $4,042,800.00, $4,033,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $9,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (r) The appropriation for C.S. Mott Community College is $18,032,100.00, $18,017,800.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $14,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (s) The appropriation for Muskegon Community College is $10,412,100.00, $10,359,900.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $52,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (t) The appropriation for North Central Michigan College is $4,110,600.00, $3,947,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $162,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (u) The appropriation for Northwestern Michigan College is $10,885,800.00, $10,619,800.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $266,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (v) The appropriation for Oakland Community College is $25,166,900.00, $25,130,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $36,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (w) The appropriation for Schoolcraft College is $14,989,100.00, $14,972,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $17,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (x) The appropriation for Southwestern Michigan College is $7,803,100.00, $7,786,600.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $16,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (y) The appropriation for St. Clair County Community College is $8,351,300.00, $8,342,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $9,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (z) The appropriation for Washtenaw Community College is $16,289,700.00, $16,257,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $32,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (aa) The appropriation for Wayne County Community College is $19,464,000.00, $19,460,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $3,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (bb) The appropriation for West Shore Community College is $2,924,700.00, $2,896,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $28,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (3) The amount appropriated in subsection (2) for community college operations is $363,594,500.00 and is appropriated from the state school aid fund. (4) From the appropriations described in subsection (1), both of the following apply: (a) Subject to section 207a, the amount appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 to offset certain fiscal year 2026-2027 retirement contributions is $7,189,000.00, appropriated from the state school aid fund. (b) For fiscal year 2026-2027, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $20,750,000.00 for payments to participating community colleges, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A community college that receives money under this subdivision shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting the normal cost contribution rate. (5) From the appropriations described in subsection (1), subject to section 207b, the amount appropriated for payments to community colleges that are participating entities of the retirement system is $84,800,000.00 appropriated from the state school aid fund. (6) From the appropriations described in subsection (1), subject to section 207c, the amount appropriated for renaissance zone tax reimbursements is $2,200,000.00, appropriated from the state school aid fund. Each community college receiving funds in this subsection shall accrue these payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. (7) For fiscal year 2026-2027 only, from the appropriations described in subsection (1), a grant must be made available to a community college for the continuation of the Michigan Maritime Manufacturing Initiative that is $3,500,000.00, appropriated from the state school aid fund. The department of labor and economic opportunity shall administer the funds under this subsection for up to $3,500,000.00 for the Michigan Maritime Manufacturing Initiative, which is a partnership between the state and federal government aimed at building a workforce ready to lead the future of defense manufacturing through the teaching of critical skills for maritime construction, particularly in maritime welding and maritime machining. Funds allocated under this grant must be used to provide instruction and certification in maritime welding, maritime machining, and maritime construction. Grant applicants must be a community college with a program that can be used to support the purpose of the project by providing instruction and certifications in maritime welding, maritime machining, and maritime construction. Sec. 201f. For fiscal year 2026-2027 only, from the appropriations described in section 201(1), $14,630,000.00 is appropriated from the state school aid fund for a 1-time performance funding payment. Funds appropriated under this section, subject to conditions described in sections 217b and 230, must be distributed as follows: (a) Alpena Community College, $233,300.00. (b) Bay de Noc Community College, $234,700.00. (c) Delta College, $644,400.00. (d) Glen Oaks Community College, $132,700.00. (e) Gogebic Community College, $212,000.00. (f) Grand Rapids Community College, $902,800.00. (g) Henry Ford College, $990,300.00. (h) Jackson College, $513,000.00. (i) Kalamazoo Valley Community College, $615,100.00. (j) Kellogg Community College, $433,800.00. (k) Kirtland Community College, $212,400.00. (l) Lake Michigan College, $284,000.00. (m) Lansing Community College, $1,189,000.00. (n) Macomb Community College, $1,450,400.00. (o) Mid Michigan Community College, $254,500.00. (p) Monroe County Community College, $230,100.00. (q) Montcalm Community College, $162,700.00. (r) C.S. Mott Community College, $658,400.00. (s) Muskegon Community College, $394,200.00. (t) North Central Michigan College, $217,800.00. (u) Northwestern Michigan College, $387,800.00. (v) Oakland Community College, $1,146,800.00. (w) Schoolcraft College, $684,300.00. (x) Southwestern Michigan College, $276,800.00. (y) St. Clair County Community College, $360,200.00. (z) Washtenaw Community College, $881,100.00. (aa) Wayne County Community College, $792,600.00. (bb) West Shore Community College, $134,800.00. Sec. 201h. In addition to funds appropriated under section 201(4)(b), as amended by 2025 PA 15, for fiscal year 2025-2026 only, $2,400,000.00 is appropriated from the state school aid fund for payments to participating community colleges. A community college that receives money under this section shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting the normal cost contribution rate. Sec. 201i. (1) Within 30 days of the enactment of an amendatory act to this article, the house and senate shall provide to the state budget office a jointly agreed upon list of legislatively directed spending items funded by the amendatory act. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. As used in this subsection, âlegislatively directed spending itemâ means that term as defined in section 364 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant described in subsection (1) shall post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded. Sec. 202a. As used in this article: (a) âCenterâ means the center for educational performance and information created in section 94a. (b) âCollege level equivalent credit examinationâ means an examination that is administered by an independent testing service and that is used by colleges and universities generally to award postsecondary credit for achievement of a particular score, and includes, but is not limited to, advanced placement examinations, the DANTES Subject Standardized Test (DSST), and college-level examination program (CLEP) examinations. (c) âParticipating collegeâ means a community college that is a reporting unit of the retirement system and that reports employees to the retirement system for the state fiscal year. (d) âRetirement systemâ means the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. (e) âStandard report recipientsâ means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on community colleges, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 203. (1) Unless otherwise specified, a community college that receives appropriations in section 201 and the center shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this article. This requirement includes transmission of reports via electronic mail to the recipients identified for each reporting requirement and placement of each required report in a single archivable location on an internet site, not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all required reports in the current fiscal year on the community collegeâs website, a community college shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous 7 fiscal years, posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. This requirement does not apply to the center. Sec. 205. To the extent possible, the principal executive officer of each community college that receives appropriations in section 201 shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that geographically disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide services or supplies, or both. Each principal executive officer shall strongly encourage businesses with which the community college contracts to subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises for services or supplies, or both. As used in this section, âgeographically disadvantaged business enterprisesâ means that term as defined in Executive Directive No. 2019-8. Sec. 206. (1) Except for the funds appropriated in sections 201(4)(b) and 201(7), the funds appropriated in sections 201 and 201f are appropriated for community colleges with fiscal years ending June 30, 2027 and must be paid out of the state treasury and distributed by the state treasurer to the respective community colleges in 11 monthly installments on the sixteenth of each month, or the next succeeding business day, beginning with October 16, 2026. Each community college shall accrue its July and August 2027 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. (2) The funds appropriated in section 201(4)(b) are appropriated for community colleges with fiscal years ending June 30, 2027 and must be distributed to the respective community colleges in quarterly installments on the sixteenth of each November, February, May, and August. Each community college shall accrue its August 2027 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. Sec. 207c. All of the following apply to the allocation of the appropriations described in section 201(6) to community colleges described in section 12(3) of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692: (a) The amount allocated to each community college under section 201(6) for fiscal year 2026-2027 must be based on that community collegeâs proportion of total revenue lost by community colleges as a result of the exemption of property taxes levied in 2026 under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696. (b) The appropriations described in section 201(6) must be made to each eligible community college within 60 days after the department of treasury certifies to the state budget director that it has received all necessary information to properly determine the amounts payable to each eligible community college under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692. Sec. 210b. By March 1 of each year, the Michigan Community College Association and the Michigan Association of State Universities shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential on the activities and programs focused on improving transfer student outcomes since March 1 of the previous year, including all of the following: (a) The direct transferability of mathematics gateway courses between and among community colleges and universities. (b) The implementation of MiTransfer pathways. (c) The progress on increasing participation in MiTransfer pathways among community colleges and public universities. (d) The implementation of the Michigan Transfer Network at mitransfer.org. (e) A progress report on the implementation of the Michigan transfer agreement. Sec. 212. Community college districts are encouraged to evaluate and pursue efficiency and cost-containment measures that maximize state funding. Community colleges shall identify practices that increase efficiencies, including, but not limited to, establishing joint ventures, consolidating services, utilizing program collaborations, maximizing educational benefits through optimal class sizes and frequency of course offerings, increasing web-based instruction, eliminating low-enrollment and high-cost instructional programs, using self-insurance, practicing energy conservation, and utilizing group purchasing. Community colleges shall also review proposed capital outlay projects to increase coordination and utilization of new facilities, renovation projects, and technology improvements. Sec. 213. Not later than 6 months after the state budget office issues work project letters, and again on or by April 15, the state budget office shall submit an annual report that summarizes all work project accounts to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 217a. (1) Each community college that receives an appropriation in sections 201 and 201f shall submit all of the following information in the form and manner specified by the center: (a) The Michigan community colleges verified data inventory data for the preceding academic year to the center by the first business day of November of each year as specified in section 217. (b) Tuition and mandatory fees information as specified in section 217b. (c) The longitudinal data set to the center as specified in section 219. (d) The number and type of associate degrees, baccalaureate degrees, and other certificates awarded as specified in section 219. (e) The annual independent audit as specified in section 222. (f) The certifications described in subsections (4) through (7). (2) If the state budget director determines that a community college failed to submit any of the information described in subsection (1) in the form and manner specified by the center, the state budget director may withhold the monthly state operations installments described in sections 201 and 201f from that community college until those data are submitted. If a community college does not submit any of the information described in subsection (1) by the end of the fiscal year, the community college forfeits any withheld amount. The state budget director shall notify the standard report recipients at least 10 days before withholding funds from any community college. (3) It is intended that accountability reporting for community colleges will be streamlined through the center. The state budget director and the center shall work to combine the reporting requirements outlined in this subsection with the existing Michigan community colleges verified data inventory collection cycle. All of the following must be reported to the standard report recipients: (a) Each community collegeâs certification of its compliance with the requirements described in subsections (4) and (5). (b) The reporting and certification requirements of subsections (6) and (7) and section 217b. (4) No later than the first business day of November of each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in section 201 shall make all of the information described in subdivisions (a) to (h) available through a link on its website homepage, subject to subdivision (i), as follows, and shall archive the previous versions from the prior 7 fiscal years: (a) The annual operating budget and subsequent budget revisions. (b) A link to the most recent âMichigan Community College Data Inventory Reportâ. (c) General fund revenue and expenditure projections for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year. (d) A listing of all debt service obligations, detailed by project, anticipated payment of each project, and total outstanding debt for the current fiscal year. (e) Links to all of the following for the community college: (i) The current collective bargaining agreement for each bargaining unit. (ii) Each health care benefits plan, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, vision, disability, long-term care, or any other type of benefits that would constitute health care services, offered to any bargaining unit or employee of the community college. (iii) Audits and financial reports for the most recent fiscal year for which they are available. (iv) A copy of the board of trustees resolution regarding compliance with best practices for the local strategic value component described in section 230(2). (f) A map that includes the boundaries of the community college district. (g) A prominent link to the financial aid website created under section 260. (h) A list of severance payments and the amounts of those severance payments made to former employees of the community college. (i) For statewide consistency and public visibility, community colleges shall use the icon badge provided by the department of technology, management, and budget consistent with the icon badge developed by the department of education for K-12 school districts. It must appear on the front of each community collegeâs homepage. The size of the icon may be reduced to 150 x 150 pixels. (5) No later than the first business day of November of each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in section 201 shall develop, maintain, and update a âcampus safety information and resourcesâ link, prominently displayed on the homepage of its website, that links to a section of the community collegeâs website containing, at a minimum, all of the following information: (a) Emergency contact numbers for police, fire, health, and other services. (b) Hours, locations, telephone numbers, and email contacts for campus public safety offices and title IX offices. (c) A list of safety and security services provided by the community college, including transportation, escort services, building surveillance, anonymous tip lines, and other available security services. (d) The community collegeâs policies applicable to minors on community college property. (e) A directory of resources available at the community college or in the surrounding community for students or employees who are survivors of sexual assault or sexual abuse. (f) An electronic copy of âA Resource Handbook for Campus Sexual Assault Survivors, Friends and Familyâ, published in 2018. (g) Campus security policies and crime statistics pursuant to the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542, 104 Stat 2381. Information must include all material prepared pursuant to the public information reporting requirements under the crime awareness and campus security act of 1990, title II of the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542, 104 Stat 2381. (6) No later than the first business day of November of each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in section 201 shall report to the standard report recipients its annual title IX report, also known as the student sexual misconduct report, issued by the title IX coordinator, as required under the federal campus SaVE act of 2013, Public Law 113-4, section 304, 127 Stat 54, 89-92 (2013). (7) No later than the first business day of November of each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in section 201 shall certify that the community college complies with federal regulations under title IX, as required by the United States Department of Education, including, but not limited to, the following: (a) Use of medical experts that do not have an actual or apparent conflict of interest. (b) Issuance of title IX reports to complainants and respondents that are not divergent. (c) Notification of resources to each individual who reports having experienced sexual assault by a member of the community college. Sec. 217b. (1) Each community college that receives an appropriation in section 201 shall report to the center by the last business day of August of each year the tuition and mandatory fees paid by a full-time in-district student and a full-time out-of-district student as established by the community college governing board for the current academic year. This report should also include the annual cost of tuition and fees based on a full-time course load of 30 credits. This report must also specify the amount that tuition and fees have increased for the community college from the prior academic year. Each community college shall also report any revisions to the reported current academic year tuition and mandatory fees adopted by the community college governing board to the center within 15 days of being adopted. The center shall provide this information and any revisions to the standard report recipients. (2) Each community college that receives an appropriation in section 201 shall certify to the state budget director by the last business day of August of each year that its board will not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for in-district students for the academic year that is greater than the tuition restraint described in this subsection. For the academic year 2026-2027, the tuition restraint level is equal to the greater of 4.0% or $199.00. For the academic year 2027-2028, the tuition restraint level is equal to the greater of 4.0% or $199.00. It is intended that in the next fiscal year, the tuition restraint rate will be adjusted only for the subsequent academic year. As used in this subsection: (a) âFeeâ means any board-authorized fee that will be paid by more than 1/2 of all in-district students at least once during their enrollment at a community college. A community college increasing a fee that applies to a specific subset of students or courses shall provide sufficient information to prove that the increase applied to that subset will not cause the increase in the average amount of board-authorized total tuition and fees paid by in-district students in the academic year to exceed the limit established in this section. (b) âTuition and fee rateâ means the average of full-time rates paid by a majority of students in each class, based on an unweighted average of the rates authorized by the community college board and actually charged to students, deducting any uniformly rebated or refunded amounts, for the 2 semesters with the highest levels of full-time equated in-district enrollment during the academic year. (3) Community colleges that exceed the tuition and fee rate cap described in subsection (2) are not eligible to receive payments under section 201f for 1-time performance funding payments for fiscal year 2026-2027. The state budget director shall implement uniform reporting requirements to ensure that a community college receiving a payment under section 201f for 1-time performance funding has satisfied the tuition restraint requirements of this section. The state budget director has the sole authority to determine if a community college has met the requirements of this section. Information reported by a community college to the state budget director under this subsection must also be reported to the standard report recipients. (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the legislature may at any time adjust appropriations for a community college that adopts an increase in tuition and fee rates for in-district students that exceeds the rate cap established in subsection (2). Sec. 217c. (1) Not later than December 1 of each year, each community college or federally recognized tribal college that, in the current or previous academic year, serves or has served as an authorizing body shall submit a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the state budget director, and the department of education containing, at a minimum, all of the following information, as applicable: (a) A list of all of the schools currently authorized. (b) A list identifying any schools that were closed or lost their authorization in the current or previous academic year. (c) The academic performance of each school currently authorized, including whether a school is identified by the department of education as a partnership school. If a school is identified as a partnership school under this subdivision, the authorizing body shall include a description of corrective actions in the schoolâs partnership agreement, the duration of the partnership agreement, and an assessment of progress toward improvement. (d) The total number of fees, reimbursements, contributions, or charges permitted under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, that are assigned to each school currently authorized in a single academic year. (e) A financial report of the authorizing bodyâs use of fees, reimbursements, contributions, or charges collected or retained under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502. This report must include all of the following, at a minimum: (i) The total amount of fees collected or retained under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, by the authorizing body for the authorizing bodyâs most recent fiscal year. (ii) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on compensation for faculty and staff employed primarily to meet the functions of an authorizing body. For the purpose of this subparagraph, an employee is presumed to be primarily employed to meet the functions of an authorizing body if that employee spends more than 50% of the employeeâs time on those activities. (iii) The number of positions, organized by job title, associated with expenditures reported under subparagraph (ii). (iv) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on contractual services to meet the functions of an authorizing body. (v) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on other overhead costs to meet the functions of an authorizing body. (vi) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were transferred to another operating unit within the community college or federally recognized tribal college. (vii) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on activities other than functioning as an authorizing body, including a list of those activities and the amount associated with each activity. (f) An executive summary section that provides relevant summary data for reporting requirements under subdivisions (a) to (e). (2) A report submitted under this section must be in a format that meets accessibility standards for viewing on the internet under the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, Public Law 101-336. (3) A report submitted under this section must be published and updated through a link on the homepage of the institutionâs website. (4) In addition to the reporting requirements under this section, each authorizing body that receives an appropriation under section 201 shall adopt a facilities policy ensuring that any structures or other property vacated by a public school academy that ceases operation not contribute to blight in the surrounding neighborhood or community in which the school had previously operated. (5) As used in this section, âauthorizing bodyâ means that term as defined in section 501 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.501. Sec. 222. Each community college shall have an annual audit of all income and expenditures performed by an independent auditor and shall furnish the independent auditorâs management letter and an annual audited accounting of all general and current funds income and expenditures including audits of college foundations to the center before November 15 of each year. The center shall provide this information to the standard report recipients, the auditor general, the department of labor and economic opportunity, and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. If a community college fails to furnish the audit materials, the monthly state operations installments must be withheld from that college until the information is submitted. All reporting must conform to the requirements set forth in the â2001 Manual for Uniform Financial Reporting, Michigan Public Community Collegesâ. A community college shall make the information the community college is required to provide under this section available to the public on its website. Sec. 223. (1) By January 15 of each year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on North American Indian tuition waivers for the preceding academic year that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The number of waiver applications received and the number of waiver applications approved. (b) For each community college submitting information under subsection (2), all of the following: (i) The number of Native American students enrolled each term for the previous academic year. (ii) The number of North American Indian tuition waivers granted each term, including continuing education students. (iii) The monetary value of the waivers granted each term for the previous academic year. (iv) The number of students attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver who successfully transfer to a 4-year public or private university, or complete a degree or certificate program, separated by degree or certificate level. (2) By January 1 of each year, a community college that receives an appropriation in section 201 or a tribal institution that receives funding for the North American Indian tuition waiver shall provide to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential any information necessary for preparing the report described in subsection (1), using guidelines and procedures developed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may consolidate the report required under this section with the report required under section 268, but a consolidated report must separately identify data for universities and data for community colleges. Sec. 229a. Included in the fiscal year 2026-2027 appropriations for the department of technology, management, and budget are appropriations totaling $40,398,900.00 to provide funding for the state share of costs for previously constructed capital projects for community colleges. Those appropriations for state building authority rent represent additional state general fund support for community colleges, and the following is an estimate of the amount of that support to each community college: (a) Alpena Community College, $855,000.00. (b) Bay de Noc Community College, $515,000.00. (c) Delta College, $2,881,000.00. (d) Glen Oaks Community College, $380,000.00. (e) Gogebic Community College, $56,000.00. (f) Grand Rapids Community College, $2,430,000.00. (g) Henry Ford College, $1,505,000.00. (h) Jackson College, $2,044,000.00. (i) Kalamazoo Valley Community College, $3,404,500.00. (j) Kellogg Community College, $679,000.00. (k) Kirtland Community College, $225,000.00. (l) Lake Michigan College, $966,000.00. (m) Lansing Community College, $757,000.00. (n) Macomb Community College, $4,682,200.00. (o) Mid Michigan Community College, $1,615,000.00. (p) Monroe County Community College, $2,359,900.00. (q) Montcalm Community College, $446,000.00. (r) C.S. Mott Community College, $3,103,000.00. (s) Muskegon Community College, $982,000.00. (t) North Central Michigan College, $646,000.00. (u) Northwestern Michigan College, $1,787,000.00. (v) Oakland Community College, $0.00. (w) Schoolcraft College, $2,232,000.00. (x) Southwestern Michigan College, $822,500.00. (y) St. Clair County Community College, $718,000.00. (z) Washtenaw Community College, $1,676,000.00. (aa) Wayne County Community College, $1,895,800.00. (bb) West Shore Community College, $736,000.00. Sec. 230. (1) Subject to subsection (4), money included in the appropriations for community college operations under section 201 for performance funding and allocated under section 201f for 1-time performance funding payments is distributed based on the following formula: (a) Allocated proportionate to fiscal year 2025-2026 base appropriations, 30%. (b) Based on a weighted student contact hour formula as provided for in the 2016 recommendations of the performance indicators task force, 30%. (c) Based on the performance improvement as provided for in the 2016 recommendations of the performance indicators task force and based on data provided by the center, 10%. (d) Based on the performance completion number as provided for in the 2016 recommendations of the performance indicators task force, 10%. (e) Based on the performance completion rate as provided for in the 2016 recommendations of the performance indicators task force and based on data provided by the center, 10%. (f) Based on administrative costs, 5%. (g) Based on the local strategic value component, as developed in cooperation with the Michigan Community College Association and described in subsection (2), 5%. (2) Money included in the appropriations for community college operations under section 201(2) and 201f for local strategic value is allocated only to each community college that certifies to the state budget director, through a board of trustees resolution on or before October 15, 2026, that the college has met 4 out of 5 best practices listed in each category described in subsection (3). The resolution must provide specifics as to how the community college meets each best practice measure within each category. One-third of funding available under the strategic value component is allocated to each category described in subsection (3). Amounts distributed under local strategic value must be on a proportionate basis to each collegeâs fiscal year 2025-2026 operations funding. Payments to community colleges that qualify for local strategic value funding must be distributed with the November installment payment described in section 206. (3) For purposes of subsection (2), the following categories of best practices reflect functional activities of community colleges that have strategic value to the local communities and regional economies: (a) For Category A, economic development and business or industry partnerships, the following: (i) The community college has active partnerships with local employers including hospitals and health care providers. (ii) The community college provides customized on-site training for area companies, employees, or both. (iii) The community college supports entrepreneurship through a small business assistance center or other training or consulting activities targeted toward small businesses. (iv) The community college supports technological advancement through industry partnerships, incubation activities, or operation of a Michigan technical education center or other advanced technology center. (v) The community college has active partnerships with local or regional workforce and economic development agencies. (b) For Category B, educational partnerships, the following: (i) The community college has active partnerships with regional high schools, intermediate school districts, and career-tech centers to provide instruction through dual enrollment, concurrent enrollment, direct credit, middle college, or academy programs. (ii) The community college hosts, sponsors, or participates in enrichment programs for area K-12 students, such as college days, summer or after-school programming, or Science Olympiad. (iii) The community college provides, supports, or participates in programming to promote successful transitions to college for traditional age students, including grant programs such as talent search, upward bound, or other activities to promote college readiness in area high schools and community centers. (iv) The community college provides, supports, or participates in programming to promote successful transitions to college for new or reentering adult students, such as adult basic education, a high school equivalency test preparation program and testing, or recruiting, advising, or orientation activities specific to adults. As used in this subparagraph, âhigh school equivalency test preparation programâ means that term as defined in section 4. (v) The community college has active partnerships with regional 4-year colleges and universities to promote successful transfer, such as articulation, 2+2, or reverse transfer agreements or operation of a university center. (c) For Category C, community services, the following: (i) The community college provides continuing education programming for leisure, wellness, personal enrichment, or professional development. (ii) The community college operates or sponsors opportunities for community members to engage in activities that promote leisure, wellness, cultural or personal enrichment such as community sports teams, theater or musical ensembles, or artist guilds. (iii) The community college operates public facilities to promote cultural, educational, or personal enrichment for community members, such as libraries, computer labs, performing arts centers, museums, art galleries, or television or radio stations. (iv) The community college operates public facilities to promote leisure or wellness activities for community members, including gymnasiums, athletic fields, tennis courts, fitness centers, hiking or biking trails, or natural areas. (v) The community college promotes, sponsors, or hosts community service activities for students, staff, or community members. (4) Payments for performance funding under section 201 and for 1-time performance funding payments under section 201f must be made to a community college only if that community college actively participates in the Michigan Transfer Network sponsored by the Michigan Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions Officers and submits timely updates, including updated course equivalencies at least every 6 months, to the Michigan Transfer Network. The state budget director shall determine if a community college has not satisfied this requirement. The state budget director may withhold payments for performance funding under section 201 and 1-time performance funding under section 201f until a community college is in compliance with this subsection. Sec. 236. (1) Subject to the conditions set forth in this article, the amounts listed in this section are appropriated for higher education for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the funds indicated in this section. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this section and sections 236d and 236l: (a) The gross appropriation is $2,609,832,800.00. After deducting total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers in the amount of $0.00, the adjusted gross appropriation is $2,609,832,800.00. (b) The sources of the adjusted gross appropriation described in subdivision (a) are as follows: (i) Total federal revenues, $3,200,000.00. (ii) Total local revenues, $0.00. (iii) Total private revenues, $0.00. (iv) Total other state restricted revenues, Â $1,481,678,600.00. (v) State general fund/general purpose money, $1,124,954,200.00. (2) Amounts appropriated for public universities are as follows: (a) The appropriation for Central Michigan University is $99,759,800.00, $97,785,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $1,974,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (b) The appropriation for Eastern Michigan University is $86,660,200.00, $86,236,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $423,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (c) The appropriation for Ferris State University is $62,195,100.00, $61,423,600.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $771,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (d) The appropriation for Grand Valley State University is $98,788,400.00, $97,552,900.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $1,235,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (e) The appropriation for Lake Superior State University is $16,419,200.00, $14,854,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $1,564,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (f) The appropriation for Michigan State University is $396,750,000.00, $321,516,900.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $2,413,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $39,096,200.00 for MSU AgBioResearch, and $33,723,400.00 for MSU Extension. (g) The appropriation for Michigan Technological University is $56,727,800.00, $55,927,100.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $800,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (h) The appropriation for Northern Michigan University is $55,925,000.00, $54,270,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $1,654,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (i) The appropriation for Oakland University is $73,414,700.00, $73,036,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $378,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (j) The appropriation for Saginaw Valley State University is $34,436,800.00, $34,196,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $240,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (k) The appropriation for University of Michigan â Ann Arbor is $362,353,400.00, $360,607,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $1,746,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (l) The appropriation for University of Michigan â Dearborn is $31,762,500.00, $31,513,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $248,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (m) The appropriation for University of Michigan â Flint is $26,941,300.00, $26,403,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $537,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (n) The appropriation for Wayne State University is $227,908,900.00, $227,310,200.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $598,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (o) The appropriation for Western Michigan University is $125,265,800.00, $124,489,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, and $776,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (3) The amount appropriated in subsection (2) for public universities is $1,755,308,900.00, appropriated from the following: (a) State school aid fund, $743,088,300.00. (b) State general fund/general purpose money, $1,012,220,600.00. (4) The amount appropriated for Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system reimbursement is $0.00. (5) The amount appropriated for state and regional programs is $322,100.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose money and allocated as follows: (a) Higher education database modernization and conversion, $200,000.00. (b) Midwestern Higher Education Compact, $122,100.00. (6) The amount appropriated for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Dolores Huerta â Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks program is $2,691,500.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose money and allocated as follows: (a) Select student support services, $1,956,100.00. (b) Michigan college/university partnership program, $586,800.00. (c) Morris Hood, Jr. educator development program, $148,600.00. (7) Subject to subsection (8), the amount appropriated for grants and financial aid is $770,000,000.00, allocated as follows: (a) Tuition incentive program, Â $165,800,000.00. (b) Children of veterans and officerâs survivor tuition grant programs, $2,000,000.00. (c) Project GEAR-UP, $3,200,000.00. (d) Michigan achievement scholarships, $532,000,000.00. From this amount, up to $10,000,000.00 may be used to award skills scholarships under section 248a. (e) Michigan reconnect, $67,000,000.00. (8) The money appropriated in subsection (7) for grants and financial aid is appropriated from the following: (a) Federal revenues under the United States Department of Education, Office of Elementary and Secondary Education, GEAR-UP program, $3,200,000.00. (b) Postsecondary scholarship fund, Â $232,000,000.00. (c) State school aid fund, $425,080,000.00. (d) State general fund/general purpose money, $109,720,000.00. (e) At the close of the fiscal year, state money appropriated in subsection (7) for grants and scholarships that is unspent must be deposited into the postsecondary scholarship fund created in section 236j. (9) For fiscal year 2026-2027 only, in addition to the allocation under subsection (4), from the appropriations described in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,750,000.00 for payments to participating public universities, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A public university that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting the normal cost contribution rate. As used in this subsection, âparticipating public universitiesâ means public universities that are a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that pay contributions to the Michigan public school employeesâ retirement system for the state fiscal year. (10) Subject to section 236l, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $10,000,000.00 is appropriated from the state school aid fund for a payment to a public university that participates in the MiDocs consortium to support graduate medical education programming. Sec. 236c. In addition to the funds appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 in section 236, appropriations to the department of technology, management, and budget in the act providing general appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 for state building authority rent, totaling an estimated $153,218,900.00, provide funding for the state share of costs for previously constructed capital projects for state universities. These appropriations for state building authority rent represent additional state general fund support provided to public universities, and the following is an estimate of the amount of that support to each public university: (a) Central Michigan University, $12,914,000.00. (b) Eastern Michigan University, Â $8,272,000.00. (c) Ferris State University, $9,546,000.00. (d) Grand Valley State University, Â $10,864,000.00. (e) Lake Superior State University, $2,229,000.00. (f) Michigan State University, $16,598,000.00. (g) Michigan Technological University, $5,521,000.00. (h) Northern Michigan University, $9,735,900.00. (i) Oakland University, $13,310,000.00. (j) Saginaw Valley State University, $7,820,000.00. (k) University of Michigan - Ann Arbor, $14,068,000.00. (l) University of Michigan - Dearborn, $10,725,000.00. (m) University of Michigan - Flint, Â $8,307,000.00. (n) Wayne State University, $12,322,000.00. (o) Western Michigan University, $10,987,000.00. Sec. 236d. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated under section 232(2) for university operations, for fiscal year 2026-2027 only, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $69,760,300.00 from the school aid fund for 1-time operations increase payments. These funds are intended to be used for the same purposes as the funds appropriated under section 236(2) for university operations. (2) From the amount appropriated under subsection (1), subject to sections 241a, 241b, 241c, and 244, each university is allocated the following: (a) Central Michigan University, $3,920,600.00. (b) Eastern Michigan University, $3,457,500.00. (c) Ferris State University, $2,462,700.00. (d) Grand Valley State University, Â $3,911,200.00. (e) Lake Superior State University, $595,600.00. (f) Michigan State University, $12,890,700.00. (g) Michigan Technological University,$2,242,300.00. (h) Northern Michigan University, $2,175,900.00. (i) Oakland University, $2,928,300.00. (j) Saginaw Valley State University, $1,371,000.00. (k) University of Michigan â Ann Arbor, $14,458,000.00. (l) University of Michigan â Dearborn, $1,263,500.00. (m) University of Michigan â Flint, $1,058,600.00. (n) Wayne State University, $9,113,600.00. (o) Western Michigan University, $4,991,200.00. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in section 236(2) for MSU AgBioResearch, for fiscal year 2026-2027 only, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,567,500.00 from the state school aid fund for MSU AgBioResearch. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in section 236(2) for MSU Extension, for fiscal year 2026-2027 only, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,352,100.00 from the state school aid fund for MSU Extension. Sec. 236j. (1) The postsecondary scholarship fund is created in the department of treasury for the purpose of providing scholarship awards to eligible students who attend eligible postsecondary educational institutions in this state, as provided in subsection (5). (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the postsecondary scholarship fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the postsecondary scholarship fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the postsecondary scholarship fund interest and earnings from postsecondary scholarship fund investments. (3) Money in the postsecondary scholarship fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the postsecondary scholarship fund and not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the postsecondary scholarship fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money must be expended from the postsecondary scholarship fund for the purpose of supporting state grants and financial aid allocated in section 236(7). (6) It is the intent of the legislature that the postsecondary scholarship fund serves as a funding source of the Michigan achievement scholarship. To ensure the Michigan achievement scholarship provides ongoing supports for students, it is the intent of the legislature to provide annual ongoing increases for the Michigan achievement scholarship allocated in section 236(7) and to use funds from the postsecondary scholarship fund to support the scale up to the fully implemented costs of the Michigan achievement scholarship. (7) In addition to the appropriations in section 236, if the amount of state money allocated in section 236(7)(a), (b), (d), or (e) is not sufficient to fully fund 1 or more of those awards, there is appropriated from the postsecondary scholarship fund the amount necessary to fully fund those awards. The state budget director must determine if money is appropriated from the postsecondary scholarship fund under this subsection and shall provide written notification to the standard report recipients prior to any additional appropriation described in this subsection. (8) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 only, an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 from the school aid stabilization fund is deposited into the postsecondary scholarship fund. It is intended that this deposit is funded first from unspent and unreserved state school aid fund balances appropriated under section 11, as recorded as part of the state book-closing process for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, and, if necessary, from available fund balances of other funds created under article I and deposited into the school aid stabilization fund. Sec. 236k. From the amount described under section 248(7) for marketing of the Michigan achievement scholarship and other state scholarship programs, $1,000,000.00 must be allocated for the FAFSA completion ticket to tuition incentive. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall use funds described under this section to run a promotional activity to promote completing the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) for the first time consistent with the promotional-activity exception provided for in section 372(2) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.372. The promotional activity must offer prize funds that are available to a number, chosen by the department, of Michigan residents who are selected at random in a manner that ensures geographic diversity across this state, including at least 1 recipient from the Upper Peninsula, who satisfactorily demonstrate to the department that they have completed the FAFSA for the first time. Sec. 236l. (1) Funds appropriated in section 236(10) must be paid to support graduate medical education programming. (2) Payments under this section must be made in 1 lump sum to a partnering public university identified by the department of health and human services. (3) A public university that receives a payment under this section must contribute the entire amount received to the department of health and human services, in a form and manner determined by the department of health and human services, by no later than 30 days after the payment is received. (4) The department of health and human services must use funds received to support graduate medical education programs in this state. Sec. 236s. (1) Within 30 days of the enactment of an amendatory act to this article, the house and senate shall provide to the state budget office a jointly agreed upon list of legislatively directed spending items funded by the amendatory act. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with section 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1634a. As used in this subsection, âlegislatively directed spending itemâ means that term as defined in section 364 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364(4), the department or agency administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the report and post an updated report not later than June 15 of the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded. Sec. 237b. As used in this article: (a) âCenterâ means the center for educational performance and information created in section 94a. (b) âCollege level equivalent credit examinationâ means an examination that is administered by an independent testing service and that is used by colleges and universities generally to award postsecondary credit for achievement of a particular score, and includes, but is not limited to, advanced placement examinations, the DANTES Subject Standardized Test (DSST), and college-level examination program (CLEP) examinations. (c) âStandard report recipientsâ means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on higher education, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 237c. Not later than 6 months after the state budget office issues work project letters, and again on or by April 15, the state budget office shall submit an annual report that summarizes all work project accounts to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 238. (1) Unless otherwise specified, a public university receiving appropriations in section 236 shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this article. This requirement includes transmission of reports via electronic mail to the recipients identified for each reporting requirement and placement of each required report in a single archivable location on an internet site not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the public universityâs website, the public university shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from the previous 7 fiscal years, posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. Sec. 239a. Public universities are encouraged to evaluate and pursue efficiency and cost-containment measures that maximize state funding. Public universities shall identify practices that increase efficiencies, including, but not limited to, establishing joint ventures, consolidating services, utilizing program collaborations, maximizing educational benefits through optimal class sizes and frequency of course offerings, eliminating low-enrollment and high-cost instructional programs, using self-insurance, practicing energy conservation, and utilizing group purchasing. Public universities shall also review proposed capital outlay projects to increase coordination and utilization of new facilities, renovation projects, and technology improvements. Sec. 241. Excluding section 236k, and subject to sections 236l, 241a, 241b, 241c, 241e, and 244, the funds appropriated in sections 236 and 236d to public universities must be paid out of the state treasury and distributed by the state treasurer to the respective institutions in 11 equal monthly installments on the sixteenth of each month, or the next succeeding business day, beginning with October 16, 2026. Except for Wayne State University, each institution shall accrue its July and August 2027 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. Sec. 241a. (1) All public universities shall submit higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) data and associated financial aid program information requested by and in a manner prescribed by the state budget director. For public universities with fiscal years ending June 30, these data must be submitted to the state budget director by October 15 of each fiscal year. Public universities with a fiscal year ending September 30 shall submit preliminary HEIDI data by November 15 and final data by December 15. (2) It is intended that accountability reporting for public universities will be streamlined through HEIDI. The state budget director and the center will work to combine the reporting requirements outlined in this subsection with the existing HEIDI collection cycle. All of the following must be reported to the house and senate fiscal agencies and the state budget director: (a) Each public universityâs certification of its compliance with the requirements described in subsections (4), (5), and (6). (b) The reporting requirements described in sections 241b and 241c. (3) If a public university fails to submit HEIDI data and associated reporting in sections 241a, 241b, 241c, and 244 in accordance with the required reporting schedule, the state budget director may withhold the monthly operations installments under sections 236 and 236d to the public university until those reports are submitted. If a public university does not comply with all of the requirements described in sections 241a, 241b, 241c, and 244 by the end of the fiscal year, the public university forfeits the amount withheld. The state budget director shall notify the standard report recipients at least 10 days before withholding funds from any public university. (4) No later than the first business day of November of each year, a public university shall maintain a public transparency website available through a link on its website homepage. The website must include all of the following concerning the public university and shall archive the previous versions from the prior 7 fiscal years: (a) The annual operating budget and subsequent budget revisions. (b) A summary of current expenditures for the most recent fiscal year for which they are available, expressed as pie charts in the following 2 categories: (i) A chart of personnel expenditures, broken into the following subcategories: (A) Earnings and wages. (B) Employee benefit costs, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, vision, life, disability, and long-term care benefits. (C) Retirement benefit costs. (D) All other personnel costs. (ii) A chart of all current expenditures the public university reported as part of its higher education institutional data inventory data under subsection (1), broken into the same subcategories in which it reported those data. (c) Links to all of the following for the public university: (i) The current collective bargaining agreement for each bargaining unit. (ii) Each health care benefits plan, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, vision, disability, long-term care, or any other type of benefits that would constitute health care services, offered to any bargaining unit or employee of the public university. (iii) Audits and financial reports for the most recent fiscal year for which they are available. (d) General fund revenue and expenditure projections for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year. (e) A listing of all debt service obligations, detailed by project, anticipated fiscal year payment for each project, and total outstanding debt for the current fiscal year. (f) The institutionâs policy regarding the transferability of core college courses between community colleges and the public university. (g) A listing of all community colleges that have entered into reverse transfer agreements with the public university. (h) A dashboard or report card demonstrating the public universityâs performance in several âbest practiceâ measures. The dashboard or report card must include at least all of the following for the 3 most recent academic years for which the data are available: (i) Enrollment. (ii) Student retention rate. (iii) Six-year graduation rates. (iv) Number of Pell grant recipients and graduating Pell grant recipients. (v) Geographic origination of students, categorized as in-state, out-of-state, and international. (vi) Faculty to student ratios and total public university employee to student ratios. (vii) Teaching load by faculty classification. (viii) Graduation outcome rates, including employment and continuing education. (i) An icon badge that provides statewide consistency and public visibility. For this purpose, public universities shall use the icon badge provided by the department of technology, management, and budget consistent with the icon badge developed by the department of education for K-12 school districts. It must appear on the front of each public universityâs homepage. The size of the icon may be reduced to 150 x 150 pixels. The font size and style for this reporting must be consistent with other documents on each public universityâs website. (j) A collection and report of the number and percentage of all enrolled students who complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, broken out by undergraduate and graduate/professional classifications, reported to the center and posted on its website under the budget transparency icon badge. (k) The name of the current president, the names of the city and state where the president currently resides, and the presidentâs annual salary. (l) A list of severance payments and the amounts of those payments made to former employees of the university. (5) No later than the first business day of November of each year, a public university shall develop, maintain, and update a âcampus safety information and resourcesâ link, prominently displayed on the homepage of its website, to a section of its website containing, at a minimum, all of the following information: (a) Emergency contact numbers for police, fire, health, and other services. (b) Hours, locations, telephone numbers, and email contacts for campus public safety offices and title IX offices. (c) A list of safety and security services provided by the public university, including transportation, escort services, building surveillance, anonymous tip lines, and other available security services. (d) The public universityâs policies applicable to minors on university property. (e) A directory of resources available at the public university or surrounding community for students or employees who are survivors of sexual assault or sexual abuse. (f) An electronic copy of âA Resource Handbook for Campus Sexual Assault Survivors, Friends and Familyâ, published in 2018. (g) Campus security policies and crime statistics pursuant to the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542, 104 Stat 2381. Information must include all material prepared pursuant to the public information reporting requirements under the crime awareness and campus security act of 1990, title II of the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542, 104 Stat 2381. (6) Each public university shall certify to the state budget director by the first business day of November of each year that it complies with all of the following requirements: (a) The public university participates in reverse transfer agreements described in section 286 with at least 3 community colleges in this state. (b) The public university does not and will not apply any of the following criteria when determining whether credits earned outside the public university by a student count toward a degree or certificate program offered by the public university: (i) Whether the credits were earned in a dual enrollment program that counted the credits toward high school graduation requirements. (ii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was delivered in a high school classroom, community college classroom or campus, or another location. (iii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was delivered online, in person, or hybrid. (iv) Whether other students enrolled in the course in which the credits were earned were enrolled in high school or counted the course toward high school graduation requirements. (c) The public university actively participates in and submits timely updates to the Michigan Transfer Network created as part of the Michigan Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions Officers transfer agreement. Sec. 241b. (1) No later than the first business day of November of each year, each public university that receives an appropriation in section 236 shall report its annual security report, also known as the Clery Act Report, as required under 20 USC 1092(f). Each public university shall include a title IX summary report that includes all of the following information: (a) The amounts and descriptions of all fees incurred in title IX-related civil and criminal litigation. (b) The number of title IX complaints. (c) The average length of time for investigation and resolution of title IX complaints. (d) The aggregate number of title IX cases, investigations, and complaints for each of the categories described in subparagraphs (i) to (v), subject to subparagraph (vi), as follows: (i) Cases investigated for less than 15 days. (ii) Cases investigated for at least 15 days and less than 30 days. (iii) Cases investigated for at least 30 days and less than 60 days. (iv) Cases investigated for at least 60 days and less than 90 days. (v) Cases investigated for 90 days or more. (vi) If, for any category of cases under subparagraphs (i) to (v), there is an aggregate of fewer than 5 cases investigated, the public university shall not report the aggregate number of cases and instead shall report that fewer than 5 cases were investigated. (e) The number of title IX appeals and the resolutions of those appeals. (f) The number of title IX-related complaints filed by the public university with law enforcement agencies. (2) No later than the first business day of November of each year, each public university that receives an appropriation in section 236 shall certify all of the following: (a) The public university complies with federal regulations under title IX, as required by the United States Department of Education, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) Use of medical experts that do not have an actual or apparent conflict of interest. (ii) Issuance of title IX reports to complainants and respondents that are not divergent. (iii) Notification of resources to each individual who reports having experienced sexual assault by a public university member. (iv) Consistent annual training for title IX staff and law enforcement. (b) The public university provides both of the following: (i) An in-person sexual misconduct prevention presentation or course for all freshman and incoming transfer students, which must include contact information for the title IX office of the public university. For a student who does not have any in-person credit hours on campus, the university may provide the presentation or course electronically. (ii) An online or electronic sexual misconduct prevention presentation or course for all students not considered freshmen or incoming transfer students. (c) The public university had a third party review its title IX compliance office and related policies and procedures by the end of the 2018-2019 academic year. A copy of the third-party review must be transmitted to the standard report recipients. Each public university shall have a third-party review once every 4 years and a copy of the third-party review must be transmitted to the standard report recipients. (d) The public university requires that the governing board and the president or chancellor of the public university receive quarterly reports from their title IX coordinator or title IX office. The report must contain aggregated data of the number of sexual misconduct reports that the office received for the academic year, the types of reports received, including reports received against employees, and a summary of the general outcomes of the reports and investigations. A member of the governing board may request to review a title IX investigation report involving a complaint against an employee, and the public university shall provide the report in a manner it considers appropriate. The public university shall protect the complainantâs anonymity, and the report must not contain specific identifying information. (e) If allegations against an employee are made in more than 1 title IX complaint that resulted in the public university finding that no misconduct occurred, the public university requires that the title IX officer promptly notify the president or chancellor and a member of the public universityâs governing board in writing and take all appropriate steps to ensure that the matter is being investigated thoroughly, including hiring an outside investigator for future cases involving that employee. A third-party title IX investigation under this subdivision does not prohibit the public university from simultaneously conducting its own title IX investigation through its own title IX coordinator. (f) The public universityâs president or chancellor and a member of its governing board has reviewed all title IX reports involving the alleged sexual misconduct of an employee of the public university. (3) As used in this section, âsexual misconductâ includes, but is not limited to, intimate partner violence, nonconsensual sexual conduct, sexual assault, sexual exploitation, sexual harassment, and stalking. Sec. 241c. (1) No later than the last business day of August of each year, each public university that receives an appropriation in section 236 shall submit the amount of tuition and fees actually charged to a full-time resident undergraduate student for academic year 2026-2027 as part of the public universityâs higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) data. A public university shall report any revisions for any semester of the reported academic year to HEIDI within 15 days of being adopted. (2) Payments under section 236d must be made only to a public university that certifies to the state budget director by the last business day of August of each year that its board did not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate students after September 1, 2025 for the 2025-2026 academic year and that its board will not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate students for the 2026-2027 academic year that is greater than 4.0% or $651.00, whichever is greater. For the academic year 2027-2028, the tuition and fee restraint rate for resident undergraduate students is an increase of not greater than 4.0% or $651.00, whichever is greater. It is the intent of the legislature that in the next fiscal year, the tuition and fee restraint rate will be adjusted only for the subsequent academic year. As used in this subsection: (a) âFeeâ means any board-authorized fee that will be paid by more than 1/2 of all resident undergraduate students at least once during their enrollment at a public university, as described in the higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual. A public university increasing a fee that applies to a specific subset of students or courses shall provide sufficient information to prove that the increase applied to that subset will not cause the increase in the average amount of board-authorized total tuition and fees paid by resident undergraduate students in the academic year to exceed the limit established in this subsection. (b) âTuition and fee rateâ means the average of full-time rates paid by a majority of students in each undergraduate class, based on an unweighted average of the rates authorized by the public university board and actually charged to students, deducting any uniformly rebated or refunded amounts, for the 2 semesters with the highest levels of full-time equated resident undergraduate enrollment during the academic year, as described in the higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual. (3) The state budget director shall implement uniform reporting requirements to ensure that a public university receiving a payment under section 236d has satisfied the tuition restraint requirements of this section. The state budget director has the sole authority to determine if a public university has met the requirements of this section. Information reported by a public university to the state budget director under this subsection must also be reported to the standard report recipients. Sec. 247. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for Michigan reconnect must be distributed and administered by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential pursuant to the Michigan reconnect grant act, 2020 PA 84, MCL 390.1701 to 390.1709, the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1711 to 390.1723, and the departmentâs administrative procedures for Michigan reconnect. (2) For fiscal year 2026-2027 only, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may use the funds appropriated in section 236 for Michigan reconnect to support students who are receiving awards under the temporary âARP - Michigan reconnect expansion to 21â program described in 2023 PA 119. Sec. 247a. (1) The appropriation in section 236(7)(e) may be used to support last-dollar financial assistance to eligible individuals who are at least 21 years of age and seeking associate degrees, industry-recognized certificates, or credentials. Funds expended under this section must be used to award grants to eligible institutions consistent with the Michigan reconnect grant act, 2020 PA 84, MCL 390.1701 to 390.1709, to eligible students as defined in this section, and to administer the program outlined in this section. (2) Except as provided under subsection (3), the department must develop and implement a program similar to requirements outlined in the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1711 to 390.1723. (3) To receive an initial grant under this section, an eligible individual must meet both of the following requirements: (a) Be at least 21 years of age and not more than 24 years of age. (b) Complete the application in a timely manner and in a form and manner determined by the department. (4) The department must develop program guidelines and eligibility criteria for the program and must post the information on its publicly accessible website. (5) The department may award funds under this section for eligible individuals only until the money appropriated to Michigan reconnect in section 236(7)(e) has been fully committed. Sec. 248. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for Michigan achievement scholarships must be distributed as provided in this section and section 248a, pursuant to the administrative procedures for Michigan achievement scholarships of the department. (2) As used in this section: (a) âCost of attendanceâ means expenses for a studentâs tuition, mandatory fees, and contact hours for the studentâs actual program of study; books, supplies, and equipment required for courses of instruction; housing and food costs; transportation expenses; federal student loan fees; miscellaneous expenses, including a reasonable amount for the documented cost of a personal computer, allowance for child care, or allowance for other dependent care; costs related to a disability; costs of obtaining a license, certification, or first professional credential; and reasonable costs for study abroad programs. (b) âDepartmentâ means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (c) âEligible institutionâ means a public university that receives an appropriation in section 236, a community college that receives an appropriation in section 201, a federally recognized tribal college in this state, or an independent nonprofit college or university in this state as described in section 1 of 1966 PA 313, MCL 390.991. (d) âGift aidâ includes federal Pell grants under 20 USC 1070a, tuition incentive program benefits under section 256, state tuition grants under section 252, awards received for minimum payments awarded in subsection (4), higher education expenses paid under the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1661 to 390.1679, and all other federal, state, local, or institutional aid in the form of grants, scholarships, or discounts applied only toward tuition and mandatory fees. Gift aid does not include student loans, work-study awards, qualified withdrawals made from education savings accounts to pay higher education expenses pursuant to the Michigan education savings program act, 2000 PA 161, MCL 390.1471 to 390.1486, or higher education expenses paid under the Michigan education trust program pursuant to the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442. (e) âHigh school equivalency certificateâ means that term as defined in section 4. (f) âLast-dollar payment amountâ means 1 of the following: (i) For a student attending a community college or federally recognized tribal college, an amount equal to the studentâs tuition, mandatory fees, and contact hours for the studentâs actual program of study, minus all gift aid received by the student. (ii) For a student attending a public university or an independent nonprofit college or university, or for a student enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, an amount equal to the studentâs individual cost of attendance, minus all gift aid received by the student. (g) âMinimum paymentâ means a payment for any eligible cost within the studentâs individual cost of attendance. The minimum payment must be awarded as a separate payment not included in the studentâs need-based financial aid. The minimum payment must not be reduced. (h) âSAI eligible studentâ means a student who has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and meets at least 1 of the following: (i) Received the Michigan achievement scholarship in academic year 2023-2024, was determined to have an expected family contribution of $25,000.00 or less in academic year 2023-2024, and has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the subsequent award cycles. (ii) For awards made during academic year 2024-2025 or a subsequent academic year, has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and has a student aid index number of 30,000 or less. If the federal government replaces the student aid index number with a new metric, the department shall collaborate with the state budget office and the house and senate fiscal agencies to adopt a new eligibility metric equivalent to a student aid number of 30,000 or less. (3) Subject to subsection (5), an individual must meet all of the following criteria each year to be eligible for a Michigan achievement scholarship awarded under this section: (a) Maintain residency in this state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (b) Have graduated with a high school diploma or certificate of completion or achieved a high school equivalency certificate in 2023 or after. (c) Be enrolled in an eligible institution as a full-time undergraduate student, as defined by that eligible institution, for the semester the award is received. (d) Have enrolled for the first time in an eligible institution during the 2023-2024 academic year, or a subsequent academic year, within 15 months after high school graduation or attainment of a high school equivalency certificate or have received a Michigan achievement scholarship or Michigan achievement skills scholarship in a previous academic year. For the purposes of this subdivision, participation in a dual enrollment, early college, or other similar program while attending high school does not disqualify a student from being considered a first-time enrollee. (e) Maintain satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the eligible institution in which the student is enrolled. (f) Not be in default on a federal student loan. (g) Apply for all available gift aid for each academic year in which the individual applies for a Michigan achievement scholarship. (h) For a student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a public university or an independent nonprofit college or university, or who is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, at an eligible institution, be an SAI eligible student. (4) The amount awarded to an eligible student at an eligible institution must equal 1 of the following, as applicable: (a) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a community college or federally recognized tribal college where the student is eligible for that institutionâs in-district tuition rate must be equal to the sum of the last-dollar payment amount. The amount awarded to an eligible student who is eligible for a federal Pell grant under 20 USC 1070a must include an additional amount of $1,000.00. (b) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a community college or federally recognized tribal college where the student is not eligible for that institutionâs in-district tuition rate must be the lesser of the last-dollar payment amount, or the in-district tuition and mandatory fees rate. The amount awarded to an eligible student who is eligible for a federal Pell grant under 20 USC 1070a must include an additional amount of $1,000.00. (c) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a public university or independent nonprofit university, or is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, at an eligible institution must equal the sum of following: (i) A minimum payment of $2,500.00. (ii) The lesser of $3,000.00 or the studentâs last-dollar payment amount. (d) Money awarded under this subsection for a Michigan achievement scholarship must be paid to the eligible institution for credit to the studentâs account. (5) An eligible student may receive a Michigan achievement scholarship award under this section or section 248a for a maximum of 5 consecutive academic years, starting when the eligible student enrolls at an eligible institution for the first time as described in subsection (3)(d), less any period of eligibility used for a Michigan achievement skills scholarship, and not more than 3 of which may be for attending eligible institutions that are community colleges or federally recognized tribal colleges unless the student is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121. A student may not receive an award under this section and section 248a(3)(f)(i) during the same academic term. (6) The department shall work closely with participating institutions to provide the highest level of participation and ensure that all requirements of the program are met. (7) From the funds appropriated in section 236(7) for the Michigan achievement scholarship, the department may use up to $10,000,000.00 annually for the purposes of outreach programs to raise awareness of the Michigan achievement scholarship and other state grants and financial aid allocated in section 236(7). The department shall ensure that state grants and financial aid are well publicized and that high school students are provided information on the availability of financial aid. The department may receive and expend funds received from outside sources for scholarships, marketing, or other purposes related to the Michigan state grants and financial aid. The department shall provide the necessary funding and staff to fully operate the program. (8) The department shall convene a workgroup to advise the department on the administration of the Michigan achievement scholarship. The workgroup shall include participation from the Michigan Association of State Universities and its institutional members, the Michigan College Access Network, the Michigan Community College Association and its institutional members, the Michigan Independent Colleges and Universities and its institutional members, and any other interested stakeholders and offices as determined by the department. (9) The following reporting obligations apply to the Michigan achievement scholarship program: (a) By February 15 of each year, the department shall provide a written report, organized by eligible institution, to the standard report recipients that includes the following information for the previous academic year: (i) The number of students who qualified for a Michigan achievement scholarship. (ii) The number of students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship. (iii) The average number of credits earned by students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship. (iv) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were canceled due to failure to maintain satisfactory academic progress as described in subsection (3)(e). (v) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were canceled due to a student ceasing attendance at an eligible institution. The number must not include any known transfers to another eligible institution. (vi) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were canceled due to a studentâs failure to maintain full-time status. (vii) The average Michigan achievement scholarship award per student. (viii) As applicable, a delineation of each measure described in subparagraphs (i) to (vii) by sector, including community colleges, tribal colleges, public universities, and independent colleges and universities. (b) By September 30 of each year, starting with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 and in partnership with the center, create and maintain a publicly available online dashboard that includes all of the following student success information for the previous academic year: (i) The number of students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship and completed a degree or credential by an eligible institution. (ii) Type of credentials, including a breakdown of bachelorâs and associate degrees, earned by students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship by an eligible institution. (iii) The percentage of students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship and were eligible for federal Pell grants under 20 USC 1070a. (iv) The average completion rate for students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship by an eligible institution as defined by the department. (v) The average persistence rate and credits earned for students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship by an eligible institution as defined by the department. (vi) As applicable, a delineation of each measure described in subparagraphs (i) to (v) by sector, including community colleges, tribal colleges, public universities, and independent colleges and universities. (c) Each eligible institution whose students receive awards under this section shall cooperate with the department in a timely manner to facilitate the creation of the report under subdivision (a) and (b). (10) By April 1 of each year, each eligible institution shall submit a report to the department, the state budget office, and the house and senate fiscal agencies providing information as to the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students for the immediately preceding 2 institution fiscal years. If the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students in the immediately preceding fiscal year is less than the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students in the year preceding the immediately preceding institutional fiscal year 2024-2025, the institution shall include in the report a description of any changes to the institutional financial aid during the 2 immediately preceding fiscal years. An institutionâs report of the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students pursuant to this subsection must be consistent with data most recently reported to the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System. (11) For each fiscal year, an eligible institution shall maintain and report its compliance with the following tuition restraint requirements, as applicable: (a) For an eligible institution that is a community college or a federally recognized tribal college in this state, the tuition restraint described in section 217b. (b) For an eligible institution that is a public university or independent nonprofit college or university, the tuition restraint described in section 241c. The report of an eligible institution that is an independent nonprofit college or university must include the actual tuition and mandatory fee rates adopted by the institutionâs governing body for each academic year described in section 241c. (12) The state budget director shall implement reporting requirements to ensure that an eligible institution has satisfied the tuition restraint requirements of this section. The state budget director has the sole authority to determine if an eligible institution has met the requirements of this section. (13) If an eligible institution exceeds the applicable tuition restraint level for 2 consecutive years, the state budget director may consider the institution ineligible for funding under this section in the subsequent academic year. (14) If an institution is considered ineligible for funding under this section, the state budget director shall reevaluate the status of the ineligible institution annually. (15) It is the intent of the legislature that an eligible institution will not make reductive changes to institutional grant aid offered by that eligible institution that have the goal or net effect of shifting the cost burden of those programs to the program described in this section. Sec. 248a. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for the Michigan achievement skills scholarships must be distributed as provided in this section and section 248, pursuant to the administrative procedures for Michigan achievement skills scholarship of the department. (2) As used in this section: (a) âDepartmentâ means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) âHigh school equivalency certificateâ means that term as defined in section 4. (c) âQualified occupational training programâ means that term as defined in section 13 of the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1713, or a program that provides not less than 150 clock hours of instructional time over a period of not less than 8 weeks in career-oriented skilled trades instruction in maritime trades, at an independent nonprofit institution incorporated in this state that is nationally accredited and approved for federal financial aid. (3) The department shall do all of the following: (a) Develop and implement a process by which those seeking to participate in the Michigan achievement skills scholarship as training institutions offering qualified occupational training programs must apply to the department. (b) Approve as a qualified occupational training program a program for which an application is submitted under subdivision (a) that meets all of the criteria to qualify as a qualified occupational training program, and post these criteria to the departmentâs website. (c) Ensure that an applicant under subdivision (a) is first included on this stateâs eligible training provider list before each of the applicantâs programs receives separate approval from the department as being a qualified occupational training program. (d) Require that training institutions accepted to participate in the Michigan achievement skills scholarship comply with data requests from the department as a condition of continued participation. For purposes of this subdivision, the department shall require institutions operating apprenticeship programs subject to this section to provide data that tracks relevant work experience required to verify a studentâs status as an apprentice. (e) Maintain on its website a list of all qualified occupational training program options available to potential skills scholarship recipients. (f) Award skills scholarships, subject to all of the following: (i) A skills scholarship is a grant not to exceed $2,000.00 per year to contribute to tuition costs for a qualified occupational training program at a training institution, both of which are approved under this section, for a training program participant who meets the requirements of subparagraph (ii). A skills scholarship must not exceed the full amount of the tuition charged for the training program. A program participant may receive a skills scholarship under this section for a maximum of 2 academic years. (ii) To receive the skills scholarship described in subparagraph (i), a qualified occupational training program participant must meet all of the following: (A) Be a resident of this state for at least the immediately preceding year. (B) Have graduated with a high school diploma or certificate of completion or achieved a high school equivalency certificate in 2023 or after. (C) Have enrolled for the first time in a qualified occupational training program during the 2023-2024 academic year, or a subsequent academic year, within 15 months after high school graduation or attainment of a high school equivalency certificate or have received a Michigan achievement scholarship or Michigan achievement skills scholarship in a previous academic year. For the purposes of this subdivision, participation in a dual enrollment, early college, or other similar program while attending high school does not disqualify a student from being considered a first-time enrollee. (D) Not have previously earned an associate or baccalaureate degree. (E) Not have previously earned a degree, certificate, or other credential using a skills scholarship awarded under this section. (F) Timely complete a Michigan achievement skills scholarship application in a form and manner determined by the department. (iii) The department may award skills scholarships under this section only until money appropriated to the Michigan achievement skills scholarship has been fully committed. (g) Inform each recipient of a skills scholarship that the recipient will remain eligible for the Michigan achievement scholarship under section 248 for a maximum of 5 years, less any years of eligibility used for a skills scholarship awarded under this section, to pursue an associate degree, baccalaureate degree, or occupational certificate upon completion of a certification course of study in a qualified occupational training program. (h) By February 15 of each year, provide a written report, organized by qualified occupational training programs, to the standard report recipients that includes the following information for the previous academic year: (i) The number of program participants who qualified for a Michigan achievement skills scholarship. (ii) The number of program participants who received a Michigan achievement skills scholarship. (iii) The average Michigan achievement skills scholarship award, per program participant, delineated by qualified occupational training program. (4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), the department shall promulgate rules to implement this section pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (5) It is the intent of the legislature that a training institution will not make changes to scholarship or financial aid programs offered by that training institution that have the goal or net effect of shifting the cost burden of those programs to the program described in this section. A training institution shall not do either of the following as a result of an individualâs receipt of a scholarship under this act: (a) Adjust tuition rates or tuition discounts. (b) Change its tuition costs. Sec. 249. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for the children of veterans and officerâs survivor tuition grant programs shall be supported with revenue from the restricted account created in section 5 of the children of veterans tuition grant act, 2005 PA 248, MCL 390.1345. As provided in section 5 of the children of veterans tuition grant act, 2005 PA 248, MCL 390.1345, unexpended funds remaining in the restricted account at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the general fund. (2) The funds appropriated in section 236 for the children of veterans and officerâs survivor tuition grant programs shall be deposited into the restricted account described in subsection (1), as required in section 5 of the children of veterans tuition grant act, 2005 PA 248, MCL 390.1345. (3) Funds deposited into the restricted account under subsection (2) for the children of veterans and officerâs survivor tuition grant programs are appropriated and available for allocation as required in the children of veterans tuition grant act, 2005 PA 248, MCL 390.1341 to 390.1346. Sec. 256. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for the tuition incentive program must be distributed as provided in this section and pursuant to the administrative procedures for the tuition incentive program of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (2) As used in this section: (a) âPhase Iâ means the first part of the tuition incentive program defined as the academic period of 80 semester or 120 term credits, or less, leading to an associate degree or certificate. Students must be enrolled in a certificate or associate degree program and taking classes within the program of study for a certificate or associate degree. Tuition will not be covered for courses outside of a certificate or associate degree program. (b) âPhase IIâ means the second part of the tuition incentive program that provides assistance in the third and fourth year of 4-year degree programs. (c) âDepartmentâ means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (d) âHigh school equivalency certificateâ means that term as defined in section 4. (3) An individual must meet the following basic criteria and financial thresholds to be eligible for tuition incentive program benefits: (a) To be eligible for phase I, an individual must meet all of the following criteria: (i) Be less than 20 years of age at the time the individual graduates from high school with a diploma or certificate of completion or achieves a high school equivalency certificate or, for students attending a 5-year middle college approved by the Michigan department of education, be less than 21 years of age when the individual graduates from high school, or be considered a special education pupil at the time the individual graduated from high school as described in section 6(4)(l)(i). (ii) Be a United States citizen and maintain residency in this state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (iii) Be at least a half-time student, earning less than 80 semester or 120 term credits at a participating educational institution within 4 years of high school graduation or achievement of a high school equivalency certificate. All program eligibility expires 10 years after initial enrollment at a participating educational institution. (iv) Meet the satisfactory academic progress policy of the educational institution attended by the individual. (b) To be eligible for phase II, an individual must meet either of the following criteria in addition to the criteria in subdivision (a): (i) Complete at least 56 transferable semester or 84 transferable term credits. (ii) Obtain an associate degree or certificate at a participating institution. (c) To be eligible for phase I or phase II, an individual must be financially eligible as determined by the department. An individual is financially eligible for the tuition incentive program if the individual was eligible for Medicaid from this state for 24 months within any 36 months prior to completion of high school or achievement of a high school equivalency certificate. The department shall accept certification of Medicaid eligibility only from the department of health and human services for the purposes of verifying if a person is Medicaid eligible for 24 months within any 36 months prior to completion of high school or achievement of a high school equivalency certificate. Certification of eligibility may begin in the sixth grade. (4) For phase I, the department shall provide payment on behalf of a person eligible under subsection (3). The department shall only accept standard per-credit hour tuition billings and shall reject billings that are excessive or outside the guidelines for the type of educational institution. (5) For phase I, all of the following apply: (a) Payments for associate degree or certificate programs must not be made for more than 80 semester or 120 term credits for any individual student at any participating institution. The department shall not do either of the following: (i) Adopt or apply any total semester-credit or term-credit maximum that is less than the 80 semester-credit or 120 term-credit maximum provided in this subdivision. (ii) Adopt or apply any per-semester or per-term credit maximum for a student whose semester-credit or term-credit load will not result in exceeding the total 80 semester-credit or 120 term-credit maximum provided in this subdivision. (b) For persons enrolled at a Michigan community college, the department shall pay the current in-district tuition and mandatory fees. For persons residing in an area that is not included in any community college district, the out-of-district tuition rate may be authorized. (c) For persons enrolled at a Michigan public university, the department shall pay lower division resident tuition and mandatory fees for the current year. (d) For persons enrolled at a Michigan independent, nonprofit degree-granting college or university or a Michigan federal tribally controlled community college, the department shall pay mandatory fees for the current year and a per-credit payment that does not exceed the average community college in-district per-credit tuition rate as reported by the last business day of August for the immediately preceding academic year. (6) A person participating in phase II may be eligible for additional funds not to exceed $500.00 per semester or $400.00 per term up to a maximum of $2,000.00 subject to the following conditions: (a) Credits are earned in a 4-year program at a Michigan degree-granting 4-year college or university. (b) The tuition reimbursement is for coursework completed within 30 months of completion of the phase I requirements. (7) The department shall work closely with participating institutions to provide the highest level of participation and ensure that all requirements of the program are met. (8) The department shall notify students in an age-appropriate manner of their financial eligibility for the program any time after the student begins sixth grade. (9) Except as otherwise provided in sections 13(c) and 17 of the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1713 and 390.1717, each institution shall ensure that all known available restricted grants for tuition and fees are used before billing the tuition incentive program for any portion of a studentâs tuition and fees. (10) The department shall ensure that the tuition incentive program is well publicized and that eligible Medicaid clients are provided information on the program. The department shall provide the necessary funding and staff to fully operate the program. (11) The department shall collaborate with the center to use the P-20 longitudinal data system to report the following information for each qualified postsecondary institution: (a) The number of phase I students in the most recently completed academic year who in any academic year received a tuition incentive program award and who successfully completed a degree or certificate program. Cohort graduation rates for phase I students must be calculated using the established success rate methodology developed by the center in collaboration with the postsecondary institutions. (b) The number of students in the most recently completed academic year who in any academic year received a Pell grant at the reporting institution and who successfully completed a degree or certificate program. Cohort graduation rates for students who received Pell grants must be calculated using the established success rate methodology developed by the center in collaboration with the postsecondary institutions. (12) If a qualified postsecondary institution does not report the data necessary to complete the reporting in subsection (11) to the P-20 longitudinal data system by October 15 for the prior academic year, the department shall not award phase I tuition incentive program funding to otherwise eligible students enrolled in that institution until the data are submitted. (13) By May 14, 2027, the department must compile a report, and submit that report to the standard report recipients, that includes data and trends regarding students who are eligible for phase I or phase II awards under this section and who are also eligible for the Michigan reconnect program as outlined in section 247, or the Michigan achievement scholarship as outlined in section 248, or both. Using state scholarship data from preceding fiscal years, the report shall recommend changes to the tuition incentive program that would improve coordination among state financial aid programs, reduce ongoing costs and state financial aid scholarship duplication, increase student access to postsecondary education, improve on-time completion of postsecondary credentials and degrees, and advance the statewide postsecondary attainment goal described in sections 226e and 275j of this act. The department must coordinate with stakeholders from public and private institutions of higher education in this state and other relevant stakeholders. Sec. 263. (1) Included in the appropriation in section 236 for fiscal year 2026-2027 for MSU AgBioResearch is $2,982,900.00 and included in the appropriation in section 236 for MSU Extension is $2,645,200.00 for Project GREEEN. Project GREEEN is intended to address critical regulatory, food safety, economic, and environmental problems faced by this stateâs plant-based agriculture, forestry, and processing industries. âGREEENâ is an acronym for Generating Research and Extension to Meet Environmental and Economic Needs. (2) The department of agriculture and rural development and Michigan State University, in consultation with agricultural commodity groups and other interested parties, shall develop Project GREEEN and its program priorities. Sec. 263b. Included in the appropriation in section 236 for fiscal year 2026-2027 for MSU AgBioResearch and MSU Extension is funding for the Agricultural Climate Resiliency Program. The Agricultural Climate Resiliency Program is intended to address environmental sustainability of Michigan agriculture and promote the protection and efficient use of Michiganâs water resources. Sec. 264. Included in the appropriation in section 236 for fiscal year 2026-2027 for Michigan State University is $80,000.00 for the Michigan Future Farmers of America Association. This $80,000.00 allocation must not supplant any existing support that Michigan State University provides to the Michigan Future Farmers of America Association. Sec. 268. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, it is the intent of the legislature that funds be allocated for unfunded North American Indian tuition waiver costs incurred by public universities under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253, from the state school aid fund. (2) By January 15 of each year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall annually submit to the standard report recipients a report on North American Indian tuition waivers for the preceding academic year that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The number of waiver applications received and the number of waiver applications approved. (b) For each public university submitting information under subsection (3), all of the following: (i) The number of graduate and undergraduate Native American students enrolled each term for the previous academic year. (ii) The number of North American Indian tuition waivers granted each term, including to continuing education students, for the previous academic year. (iii) The monetary value of the waivers granted each term for the previous academic year. (iv) The number of graduate and undergraduate students attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver who successfully transfer to a 4-year public or private university, or complete a degree or certificate program, separated by degree or certificate level. (3) By January 1 of each year, a public university that receives an appropriation in section 236, or a tribal college receiving pass-through funds under section 269, 270, or 270c, shall provide to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential any information necessary for preparing the report detailed in subsection (2), using guidelines and procedures developed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may consolidate the report required under this section with the report required under section 223, but a consolidated report must separately identify data for public universities and data for community colleges. Sec. 269. For fiscal year 2026-2027, from the amount appropriated in section 236 to Central Michigan University for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $96,700.00 must be paid to Saginaw Chippewa Tribal College for the costs of waiving tuition for North American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is the intent of the legislature that Saginaw Chippewa Tribal College provide the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential the necessary information for the college to be included in the report required under section 268. Sec. 270. For fiscal year 2026-2027, from the amount appropriated in section 236 to Lake Superior State University for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $465,000.00 must be paid to Bay Mills Community College for the costs of waiving tuition for North American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is the intent of the legislature that Bay Mills Community College provide the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential the necessary information for the college to be included in the report required under section 268. Sec. 270c. For fiscal year 2026-2027, from the amount appropriated in section 236 to Northern Michigan University for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $112,200.00 is to be paid to Keweenaw Bay Ojibwa Community College for the costs of waiving tuition for North American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is the intent of the legislature that Keweenaw Bay Ojibwa Community College provide the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential the necessary information for the community college to be included in the report required under section 268. Sec. 275k. (1) Not later than December 1 of each year, each university that receives an appropriation in section 236 that, in the current or previous academic year, serves or has served as an authorizing body shall submit a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the state budget director, and the department of education containing, at a minimum, all of the following information, as applicable: (a) A list of all of the schools currently authorized. (b) A list identifying any schools that were closed or lost their authorization in the current or previous academic year. (c) The academic performance of each school currently authorized, including whether a school is identified by the department of education as a partnership school. If a school is identified as a partnership school under this subdivision, the authorizing body shall include a description of corrective actions in the schoolâs partnership agreement, the duration of the partnership agreement, and an assessment of progress toward improvement. (d) The total number of fees, reimbursements, contributions, or charges permitted under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, that are assigned to each school currently authorized in a single academic year. (e) A financial report of the authorizing bodyâs use of fees, reimbursements, contributions, or charges collected or retained under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502. This report must include all of the following, at a minimum: (i) The total amount of fees collected or retained under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, by the authorizing body for the authorizing bodyâs most recent fiscal year. (ii) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on compensation for faculty and staff employed primarily to meet the functions of an authorizing body. For the purpose of this subparagraph, an employee is presumed to be primarily employed to meet the functions of an authorizing body if that employee spends more than 50% of the employeeâs time on those activities. (iii) The number of positions, organized by job title, associated with expenditures reported under subparagraph (ii). (iv) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on contractual services to meet the functions of an authorizing body. (v) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on other overhead costs to meet the functions of an authorizing body. (vi) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were transferred to another operating unit within the university. (vii) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on activities other than functioning as an authorizing body, including a list of those activities and the amount associated with each activity. (f) An executive summary section that provides relevant summary data for reporting requirements under subdivisions (a) to (e). (2) A report submitted under this section must be in a format that meets accessibility standards for viewing on the internet under the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, Public Law 101-336. (3) A report submitted under this section must be published and updated through a link on the homepage of the public universityâs website. (4) In addition to the reporting requirements under this section, each authorizing body that receives an appropriation under section 236 shall adopt a facilities policy ensuring that any structures or other property vacated by a public school academy that ceases operation not contribute to blight in the surrounding neighborhood or community in which the school had previously operated. (5) As used in this section, âauthorizing bodyâ means that term as defined in section 501 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.501. Sec. 276. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Dolores Huerta â Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks future faculty fellowship program that is intended to increase the pool of academically or economically disadvantaged candidates pursuing faculty or administration careers in postsecondary education in this state. Preference may not be given to applicants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage applications from applicants who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the graduate student, faculty, or administration populations. Each public university shall apply the percentage change applicable to every public university in the calculation of appropriations in section 236 to the amount of funds allocated to the future faculty fellowship program. (2) Each public university shall administer the program in a manner prescribed by the department of labor and economic opportunity. The department of labor and economic opportunity shall use a good-faith effort standard to evaluate whether a fellowship is in default. All of the following apply to the program: (a) By June 15 of each year, public universities shall report any anticipated unexpended or unencumbered program funds to the department of labor and economic opportunity. Encumbered funds are those funds that were committed by a fellowship agreement that is signed during the current fiscal year or administrative expenses that have been approved by the department of labor and economic opportunity. (b) Before September 1 of each year, unexpended or unencumbered funds may be transferred, under the direction of the department of labor and economic opportunity, to a future faculty fellowship program at another public university to be awarded to an eligible candidate at that public university. (c) Program allocations not expended or encumbered by September 30, 2028 must be returned to the department of labor and economic opportunity so that those funds may lapse to the state general fund. (d) Not more than 5% of each public universityâs allocation for the program may be used for administration of the program. (e) In addition to the appropriation for fiscal year 2026-2027, any revenue received during prior fiscal years by the department of labor and economic opportunity from defaulted fellowship agreements is appropriated for the purposes originally intended. Sec. 277. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Dolores Huerta â Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks college day program that is intended to introduce academically or economically disadvantaged schoolchildren to the potential of a college education in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Public universities should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the student population. (2) Individual program plans of each public university must include a budget of equal contributions from this program, the participating public university, the participating school district, and the participating independent degree-granting college. College day funds must not be expended to cover indirect costs. Not more than 20% of the university match may be attributable to indirect costs. Each public university shall apply the percentage change applicable to every public university in the calculation of appropriations in section 236 to the amount of funds allocated to the college day program. (3) Each public university shall administer the program described in this section in a manner prescribed by the department of labor and economic opportunity. Sec. 278. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Dolores Huerta â Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks select student support services program for developing academically or economically disadvantaged student retention programs for 4‑year public and independent educational institutions in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the student population. (2) An award made under this program to any 1 institution must not be greater than $150,000.00, must have an award period of no more than 2 years, and must be matched on a 70% state, 30% college or university basis. (3) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall administer the program described in this section. Sec. 279. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Dolores Huerta â Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks college/university partnership program between 4-year public and independent colleges and universities and public community colleges, which is intended to increase the number of academically or economically disadvantaged students who transfer from community colleges into baccalaureate programs in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the transfer student population. (2) The grants must be made under the program described in this section to Michigan public and independent colleges and universities. An award to any 1 institution must not be greater than $150,000.00, must have an award period of no more than 2 years, and must be matched on a 70% state, 30% college or university basis. (3) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall administer the program described in this section. Sec. 280. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Dolores Huerta â Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks visiting professors program, which is intended to increase the number of instructors in the classroom to provide role models for academically or economically disadvantaged students. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Public universities should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the student population. (2) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall administer the program described in this section. (3) The amount allocated to each public university is $11,184.00 and is subject to an award period of no more than 2 years. Each public university receiving funds for fiscal year 2026-2027 under this section shall report to the department of labor and economic opportunity by April 15, 2027 the amount of its unobligated and unexpended funds as of March 31, 2027 and a plan to expend the remaining funds by the end of the fiscal year. The amount of funding reported as not being expended may be transferred, under the direction of the department, to another public university for use under this section. Sec. 281. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is funding under the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Dolores Huerta â Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks initiative for the Morris Hood, Jr. educator development program, which is intended to increase the number of academically or economically disadvantaged students who enroll in and complete K-12 teacher education programs at the baccalaureate level and teach in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the teacher education student population. (2) The program described in this section must be administered by each state-approved teacher education institution in a manner prescribed by the department of labor and economic opportunity. (3) Approved teacher education institutions may and are encouraged to use select student support services funding in coordination with the Morris Hood, Jr. funding to achieve the goals of the program described in this section. Sec. 282. (1) Each institution receiving funds for fiscal year 2026-2027 under section 278, 279, or 281 shall provide to the department of labor and economic opportunity by April 15, 2027 the unobligated and unexpended funds as of March 31, 2027 and a plan to expend the remaining funds by the end of the fiscal year. Notwithstanding the award limitations in sections 278 and 279, the amount of funding reported as not being expended will be reallocated to the institutions that intend to expend all funding received under section 278, 279, or 281. (2) Funds received for the purpose of administering programs under sections 278, 279, and 281 must not be used for direct financial aid or indirect financial aid. However, a public university may provide academic incentives to motivate participating students as approved by the department. As used in this subsection: (a) âDirect financial aidâ includes, but is not limited to, scholarships, payment of tuition, stipends, and work-studies. (b) âIndirect financial aidâ includes, but is not limited to, transportation, textbook allowances, child care support, and assistance with medical premiums or expenses. ARTICLE IV Sec. 295. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026 are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026 and any subsequent financial closeout period. Sec. 295a. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section. Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately reappropriated for the following purposes: (a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and safety employees at the department of corrections. (b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and safety employees at the department of state police. (2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting provisions of Public Law 117-2 must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and reappropriated under subsection (1). (3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees not later than 10 business days after making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification must include the authorized program under which funds were originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount reallocated to each program or purpose. Enacting section 1. (1) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending on school aid under article I of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772, as amended by 2025 PA 15 and this amendatory act, from state sources for fiscal year 2025-2026 is estimated at $18,693,813,800.00 and state appropriations for school aid to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2025-2026 are estimated at $17,245,994,700.00. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending on school aid under article I of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772, as amended by this amendatory act, from state sources for fiscal year 2026-2027 is estimated at $19,390,174,600.00 and state appropriations for school aid to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2026-2027 are estimated at $17,908,356,700.00. (2) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources for community colleges for fiscal year 2026-2027 under article II of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1801 to 388.1830, as amended by this amendatory act, is estimated at $496,663,500.00 and the amount of that state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2026-2027 is estimated at $496,663,500.00. (3) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources for higher education for fiscal year 2026-2027 under article III of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1836 to 388.1891, as amended by this amendatory act, is estimated at $2,606,632,800.00 and the amount of that state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2026-2027 is estimated at $0.00. Enacting section 2. Sections 11y, 11aa, 11bb, 23g, 25g, 27k, 35e, 41, 41b, 55, 61d, 97k, 99, 99aa, 99ee, 99mm, 107a, 147g, and 164j of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1611y, 388.1611aa, 388.1611bb, 388.1623g, 388.1625g, 388.1627k, 388.1635e, 388.1641, 388.1641b, 388.1655, 388.1661d, 388.1697k, 388.1699, 388.1699aa, 388.1699ee, 388.1699mm, 388.1707a, 388.1747g, and 388.1764j, are repealed. Enacting section 3. (1) Sections 11, 22a, 22b, 26a, 26d, 27b, 31c, 51a, 51c, 51e, 56, 62, 104, 147a, 147c, 147e, and 201h of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1611, 388.1622a, 388.1622b, 388.1626a, 388.1626d, 388.1627b, 388.1631c, 388.1651a, 388.1651c, 388.1651e, 388.1656, 388.1662, 388.1704, 388.1747a, 388.1747c, 388.1747e, and 388.1801h, as amended by this amendatory act, if granted immediate effect pursuant to section 27 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, take effect on enactment of this amendatory act. (2) Except as otherwise provided for those sections listed in subsection (1), the remaining sections of this amendatory act take effect October 1, 2026. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor